1*
WATER-DROPS.
BY
MRS. L. H. SIGOURNEY.
THE TWINS.
We with our needles fashion'd the same flower;
Both wrought one sampler, sitting on one cushion,
Both warbled the same song,both in one key,
As if our hands, our hearts, voices and minds,
Had been incorporate.
Shakspeare
.
In
the environs of one of the large towns of
New-England
,
a pleasant dwelling attracted the eye of the
traveller
.
It was a kind of Gothic cottage, whose face of
brown stucco, and pointed windows, were adorned with
clustering vines. Its lawn of green turf was smoothly
shaven, while occasional borders, and circles of dark,
weedless mould, gave nutriment to a multitude of flowers.
The angles formed by the building were wrapped in
shrubbery; the damask-rose and syringas mingled their
fragrance, and the corcoris-japonica waved its globes of
gold. To the slight columns clung the climbing rose
and the graceful American ivy, while near the well in
the background, a dense willow, nourished by perpetual
moisture, ever drank, and drooped. The inclosure was
a deep hedge of lilacs, in whose rich spikes of flowers
the white and purple alternated. At the gate, a lofty
elm stood sentinel, towering upwards, whence its strength
came, and dispensing from its gnarled wide-spread arms,
protection and shade. Such was the rural haunt, amid
the luxuriance of favoring seasons, while here and there
an evergreen, skilfully disposed, provided with a wise
foresight for the nakedness of winter.
This abode of simple elegance was furnished with
reference both to comfort and taste. The interior was in
harmony with its outer robes. With no pretensions to
ostentation, it had yet one treasure that neither wealth
could purchase, nor soulless nature in its proudest glory
boasttwin-sister babes, alike, and exceedingly
beautiful
.
As they lay asleep in their double-headed cradle,
one polished brow seemed a reflection of the other. The
smile of waking innocence gave the same curve to their
ruby lips, and revealed the first pearly teeth, seemingly
formed in the same mould.
Placed in the verandah on some fine summer's day, in
their little cushioned car, the shrill song of surrounding
birds brought to their large, blue eyes, the same sweet
wonder; and two pair of tiny hands were clapped with
one impulse of delight, at the nurse who danced before
them.
Side by side, their round feet patted about the nursery,
and with their arms around each other, they learned to
balance their timid, yet eager steps, when permitted to
tread on the green turf, like newly-fledged birdlings, at
their first flight from the cage. Together they learned
to shape their infantine articulations, and thrilling was
the melody of the word
mamma
, to the fond heart that
responded to those sweetly blended tones.
No wonder that gentle mother regarded those exquisite
beings, with a tenderness bordering on idolatry. To
watch the hourly development of her twin rose-buds, the
color and cluster of each incipient curl, their features
quickening as the dawn of intellect advanced, the
verisimilitude
in form and movement that deceived other
eyes, and almost bewildered her own, was an
over-payment
of delight. Her extreme solicitude during the ills
incidental to infancy, was rendered more agonizing, from
the circumstance that they were the sole survivors of
several dear ones, who had entered this fair and
changeful
existence, only to take a sudden farewell.
The father, whose manners had been roughened by a
life-long intercourse with the boisterous sea, where he
had passed every grade, from cabin-boy to the command
of a princely vessel, found his whole nature breathed
upon, and softened, by the influence of this double
paternity
.
As he glided over the rushing waves, he counted
the days and hours that must divide him from that home,
which was as the light-house to the storm-driven mariner,
the star of hope on life's tremulous ocean. Those
fairy forms hovered around him in their exceeding beauty,
as living pictures on the crested billow, and amid the
hoarsest roar of the tempest, their tones lingered in his
heart, like the murmur of the Zenaida dove.
His periods of return were signalized by lavish gifts to
them, and to their mother. With the liberality natural
to his profession, the most hard-earned gains were
valued
but as the means of their happiness. He studied
the unspoken wishes of his wife, and knowing her delight
in the beauties of nature, strove to make her habitation
and surrounding grounds more and more of a paradise.
She often endeavored to temper his profusion by a wise
regard for the future; but he deemed this free
expenditure
a legitimate expression of his love, and gloried in its
exercise.
As Rosa and Lilian sprang from infancy to childhood,
it was sweet to see them clasping with their delicate
hands his large brown fingers, and leading him with
hurried
steps to their own little garden; or seated at close
of day, with their white arms entwining his neck, and
their pure, polished cheeks resting on his bronzed brow.
Childhood advanced, and two lovely creatures might
be seen, wending their way to school. Always together,
arm in arm, or hand linked to hand, always attired alike,
it would even seem that each golden curl, clustering
around their ivory necks, had been trained by careful
nature
to observe the same rule of equity. Side by side,
they pursued the same studies. If there was difficulty in
the task, they assisted each other; if reward, they were
joint partakers. Thus, they grew together, in the words
of the bard of Avon.
Like to a double cherry, seeming parted,
But yet an union in partition.
They bent over one page, they wrought out the same
problem, their pencils tinted the same landscape, their
piano breathed in duets; they had no idea of a separate
employment, or a solitary joy. In all the pursuits of
knowledge, and toils of education, they put forth a double
strength, through this perfected sympathy.
When the pleasant season of school-day intercourse
was over, and they gracefully assumed those lighter
domestic cares, which were to relieve a mother in her
delicate health, they were still kindred-hearted, lighting
up the habitation with a double smile; their voices, like a
music-tone, always in unison. Whatever they performed
was with the whole, cheerful heart; and their surpassing
beauty was heightened by this happy development of
feminine character and duty.
Thus glided away nineteen cloudless years,and then
the trouble came. Like the thunder-bolt, and the
sweeping
rain, fell the stroke of orphanage. Shipwreck buried
the father in the deep, and the stricken wife, enfeebled
by previous disease, was nable to brave the sudden
shock of so fearful a sorrow. She lingered a few weeks,
and sank beneath the clods of the valley.
Alas, for Rosa and Lilian! Ever near the couch of
the sufferer, rendering every service that affection could
prompt, by night or day, while breath remained,they
wished, in the first bitterness of grief, to be gathered into
her bosom, and sleep beside her, where the weary are at
rest. But as time slowly unveiled his healing influences,
the power of entire sympathy to soothe sorrow, became
also apparent. Communion in grief dispelled the
rankling
anguish, and softened it into that tender melancholy
which is the nurse of holy thought.
The seasons, weighed down by affliction, moved heavily.
Yet gradually the bereaved ones resumed an interest in
their daily duties, and in the soothing intercourse of
friendship and benevolence. Hitherto, their existence
had known no undivided thought, or reserved sentiment.
The period had come, when this peculiar and entire
union was to be modified. Love ventured on the
experiment
.
With his usual arrogance he entered the
sanctuary
,
with his train of dreams and fancies, and hung up
his own effigy in its most sacred shrine.
A youth, of an impulsive and wild character, drew
nearer and nearer to his own heart, one of those recluse
and contemplative beings. It would seem that opposites
had so combined, as to form an attachment of rare fervor
and effervescence.
The forsaken sister learned by degrees the hard lesson,
that another was preferred to herself. She could not but
perceive that her presence was an interruption to the
lovers, and that the bosom so long exclusively her own,
had admitted a guest which could tolerate no rival. She
arraigned her own selfishness, and condemned it. She
desired to rejoice in her sister's new happinessif
happiness
it was. Yet to her it seemed rather as a passionate
excitement, awakened by an uncongenial,possibly an
unworthy object, and she wept her first, lonely tears.
One evening, she sate long in the recess of her window,
to which the white rose had climbed, looking in, with her
countless family of young buds, like a curious and familiar
friend. The rich moonlight lay like a curtain upon dale
and hillock, touching the masses of foliage with
enchantment
,
and making every leaf that quivered in loneliness,
transparent.
From a lower apartment came the voices of the lovers,
sometimes interrupted, sometimes in recitative; one rapid
and exulting, the other tender as the murmur of the
stock-dove.
It was late ere Rosa entered the chamber. Then, she
folded her waiting sister in a close embrace.
Oh Lilian, Lilian, forgive me. It is not now with us
as in times past, and the fault is mine. When Arthur's
footstep is heard, I forget all beside. When he speaks,
I hear no other sound. When he is gone, his words keep
possession, and his image lingers, shutting out all
surrounding
things. At morn I awake, and his name is first
in my prayer, then yours, then my own. Methinks my
soul hath escaped, and his hath taken its place.
She paused, in the rush of emotion, and bowed her
flushed cheek to that of her sister, and held her breath
to listen, but there was no reply.
Lilian, sometimes, since this has come upon me, you
have spoken and I have not answered, or I fear me, have
answered amiss. Your voice put to flight trains of
thought, that were like ladders of roses, where angels
descended. Is it my weakness, Lilian? or a new strength
which has been revealed in me? I feel that it can never
be again with us, as in the days that were, when only
your arm was around me, on the cradle-pillow, and at
our mother's grave. Sometimes I feel a pang, as if I
had forsaken you. And yet, I repent not. Ah! how can
I make reparation to you,so long my other self?
Lilian raised her face from the fair neck of her sister,
where she had hidden it, their tresses of pale gold
intermingling
like tendrils from the same vine. It was pale,
but of a saintly mildness, for the struggle was past.
So it must be,so it ought to be. If you are to
walk with Arthur, the path of this checkered life, it is
fitting that he be henceforth your more than sister, and
your next to God. If I have ever repined, when you
seemed first to put me from you, that is past. Selfish
and sinful should I indeed be, if your happiness were
not my own. But are you assured that this new path
leadeth to happiness? that this guide unto death, is
wisely chosen?
Lilian! and there was a solemnity in her tone,
deepening
almost to sternness, Lilian, such a doubt you have
before spoken. Let it be uttered no more. For
henceforth
,
where he goeth, will I go; and where he dieth, will
I be buried; his people shall be my people, and his God
my God,yea! if he have no God, I will have none also.
The listening sister shuddered, but spoke not. She
knelt long in her accustomed orison, and laid herself
down by Rosa's side, but that night she slept not.
It was deemed expedient by the friends of Arthur,
that he should pass a year at the south, in the
prosecution
of some important business, ere the completion of
his marriage. The parting of the lovers was trying, and
tumultuous with emotion. Perpetual and diffuse epistles
seemed their only relief.
Oh Lilian! dearest, here is the most perfect letter
from the adored. Listen, while I read a few passages.
And yet I can more rapidly tell you its purport. We
must go to him.
Go to him!
Yes, Lilian, yes. He is so miserable. He cannot
survive longer alone. He is pining away at heart.
He has been absent nearly half his probation. Think,
in a few months he will return. It is improper, and
impossible for us to go to him.
Call nothing impossible, that Love wills. His
business
will probably detain him another year. Let me
write, and give him permission to come on for us. Let
me say that we will accompany him back, and make his
wilderness an Eden.
Rosa, my sister, write him to be patient. You surely
cannot be serious?
Lilian, you must not so love this abode, and the flowers
that you are forever training. Arthur will find us a home
equally beautiful at the sunny south. I take no pleasure
in the things that I once thought so beautiful, for how
can I be happy, while he is an exile and desolate.
It was touching to see the twin-hearts, which but one
passion had ever separated, still soothing each other, and
striving to harmonize their widely diverging sentiments.
Like a stream suddenly parted, one was rushing on, under
the sparkling sunbeam, it knew not whither; the other
turning, in sadness, back to the shaded fountain where
they were as one. But in all their communion, it became
more evident that one, through the infusion of an earthly
love, was becoming troubled and wayward; while the
other sought to be a humble student of that which is
divine.
A letter, with a black seal. It was in the hand of the
venerable Pastor who had laid their mother in the grave,
and regarded with christian tenderness her orphan dear
ones. His step was slow, and his voice hesitating, as he
inquired for Lilian.
Yes, and for Rosa too, said a merry voice, as a fair,
young creature bounded in beside him. So hasty,
beautiful
being, to drink the dregs of bitterness! They might,
perchance, have been softened for thee, by oozing through
the crucible of thy kindred heart.
Ha! raise her there, from the deadly swoon. Bend
over her, sister-spirit. Lift up thy soul in prayer, thou
pitying man of God.
See, the water revives her. But with piercing shrieks,
and hands clasped in spasms, she faints again. Oh
misery
!
Days and nights pass. And the only sound from
those pale lips, that darkened chamber, is the frantic cry,
He is dead,
dead
.
Yes. He had fallen in a duel, spurred on by sudden
wrath, and the wine-frenzy. Months fled, and at length
the physical strength of the bereaved one triumphed.
She came forth once more, but how changed. The
wrinkle of despair was on her brow. She had suffered,
but not submitted. He, who had taken away the idol,
was to her, as a foe.
On the sympathizing sister it would seem that the
burden of years had been suddenly laid. Every trace
of color had faded from cheek and lip. Harrowing
anxiety had absorbed every feeling of her nature, except
that which communed in devotion with her Father above.
A childlike spirit spoke from the pale brow, which was
continually turned in watchful tenderness to one, that,
clouded and darkened, evinced little reciprocity, and no
resignation.
Rosa, dearest, hear the birds, how they pour out the
very soul of melody. Or shall I sing for you, one of
those simple airs that we used to play together?
There was, for me, but one voice of music. It is
silenced, and I am deaf to melody.
Oh, look to God. He hath comfort for the
sorrow-stricken
.
Was it not He who smote down my heart's only
prop? And say you, He hath comfort to offer? He
hath taken away the lone star by which I steered. The
taper that I held ever in my hand, is dashed into
darkness
.
Are the glories of his own Heaven the brighter?
Poor Lilian shrank away at her words. Madness, and
the spirit of defiance seemed to have been the fruit of her
chastisement. More widely than ever apart, flowed the
stream of life of the two lone sisters, who at first, like
kindred drops, were mingled into one.
Our good Pastor has waited long for you, this
morning
,
dear Rosa. He has been often here to inquire for
you since you have been able to leave your room. Will
you not see him now?
Excuse me to him. I am not in spirits for
conversation
.
He will surely expect an interview. His interest in
the departed, as well as in us, require this attention.
Crimson flashed over the face of Rosa, dyeing her
forehead
,
even to the roots of the golden hair.
Interest in the departed! If by this, you mean in
Arthur, I know that he rebuked him, and that he never
forgave him. Neither will I.
His warning was in kindness. He feared
Nay, he numbered him with riotous drinkers of wine.
And what if he was? Whoever lifted against him, the
voice of blame,
I hate
. Rather would I be a partaker of
his fault, who was as my own soul, than in their pride
of sanctity, who frowned upon him.
Her tones, and gestures, her excited and unfeminine
manner, shocked the meek-hearted sister. But alas! they
announced no discovery. Her participation in the frailty
of her fallen lover, was already written on her brow.
Years slowly departed, and many comforts vanished
from the habitation of the sisters. Their table was less
bountiful. The waiter was dismissed, and the gardener
who had so long tended those beautiful grounds, once
the parents' pride.
In their place, wrought a gentle being, somewhat
bowed by time, but more by sorrow. In the illnesses of
Rosa, she was also the nurse. And the post was no
sinecure. Her forbearance, her watchfulness, the
self-denying
spirit which says thy will be done, were but
in too frequent requisition. Lightly as a dream she glided
about, though in her heart was a rankling arrow. She
fain would have hidden her wound, and its anguish. She
flattered herself that it was a secret. Alas!
Mistress Lilian, said the old servant, the only one
whom they retained, you are so pale, and eat so little.
But to be sure, there is not much to tempt your appetite,
nowadays. I'm often thinking of the good old times,
when my master came home from sea, and the
chinaoranges
were as plenty as blackberries, and the
pineapples
,
and the tamarinds, and the chickens. Mercy on
me, I think I could dress such a dinner as you would eat,
if I had but the things. Sad changes I 've seen in my
day, Mistress Lilian.
We must expect changes, you know, if we live long
in a changing world.
And why do ye wear that poor, threadbare gown
and hood, that look as if they came out of the ark. What
would the lady, my old mistress, have said, could she
have lived to see this day,she who would always have
you dressed in the best, from your cradle?
I have little need to dress now, I go out so seldom.
Besides, I have told you that we are not able to afford
what we once could.
Oh! but ye 're always able to save something for the
poor. And wherefore is it that you cannot afford
yourself
the comforts you 've been used to, so feeble as you be,
and needing them so much. Ah, wherefore, Miss Lilian?
And wherefore is it that so much strong drink goes to
yonder chamber? I would there were fewer full decanters
and more food.
And the faithful creature wept as if her heart would
break.
It is not for myself that I care, Miss Lilian, it is not
for myself. But when I hear the continual call for what
2
does harm, and you working and waiting from morning till
night, so loving and so patient, like a very angel, never
giving a cross look to them that's destroying you, and
trying all the time to hide the sword in your vitals, I cry,
when I ought to sleep.
Midnight, in the chamber of the twin-sisters. And a
fearful, invisible form was there also, whose shaft is never
launched in vain. There were wild gaspings for breath,
groans and snatches of lethargic slumber.
Then a voice of piercing entreaty, thrilling and tender
as a quivering harp-string.
Oh! look to Him, who forgiveth all sin. Turn to the
Lamb of God. Rosa! Rosa! pray!
And from the old gray-haired servant, burst forth a
cry, Pray! pray!
A slow opening of the glassy eyes. They seemed to
regard nothing distinctly. Then the heavy lids closed,
to be lifted no more.
Sister! say, with me, Jesus! Saviour! have mercy
on me.
There was no reply.
Press my hand, beloved! if you think of the blessed
Redeemer.
No movement.
The lips of the living were joined to those that were
to speak no more. Long was that last kiss, but
unreturned
.
There was a horror of deep anguish, when those
twin-souls parted.
The lonely-hearted knelt beside the couch of the loved
and lost. She laid her face on the marble bosom. Sobs
were heard, and a low voice of supplication. Then all
was still.
Morning dawned, and they would fain raise the mourner
who knelt there so long. They would fain have raised
her,but their hands clasped a form of marble. The
chastened and peaceful spirit had gone home. And the
bitter weeping of the old, white-haired servant, alone
broke the silence of the death-chamber.
THE SUCCESSFUL ADVOCATE.
Father,father, storms are sweeping,
Snows are drifting wild and drear,
Wintry winds to conflict leaping,
Do not leave us lonely here,
Half in fear, and half in gladness
Eyes with tearful lustre bright,
Still that voice implored in sadness,
Father, go not forth to-night.
So the father staid, and with childish glee
His little daughter climbed his knee.
Dearest father, what a pleasure
Thus thy smiling face to see,
Lo, the babe, our blessed treasure,
How he wondering looks at thee:
Mother's brow is bright with gladness,
Gentler seems the howling wind,
Home hath neither gloom, nor sadness,
While thou 'rt seated here so kind.
And the father bent with features mild
And pressed the lips of the loving child.
Father, father, mother weepeth,
Burdened with a secret care,
Every night, before she sleepeth
Is thy name upon her prayer:
She, that cup of poison dreadeth
Which thy path with thorns hath sown,
Like an angry fiend it treadeth
On her comforts, and our own.
And the father took the pledge, whose sway
Was joy to the home where his treasures lay.
WATER.
The
thirsty flowrets droop.
The parching grass
Doth crisp beneath the foot, and the wan trees
Perish for lack of moisture. By the side
Of the dried rills, the herds despairing stand,
With tongue protruded. Summer's fiery heat
Exhaling, checks the thousand springs of life.
Marked ye yon cloud sail forth on angel wing?
Heard ye the herald-drops with gentle force
Stir the broad leaves? and the protracted rain
Waking the streams to run their tuneful way?
Saw ye the flocks rejoice, and did ye fail
To thank the God of fountains?
See the hart
Pant for the water brooks. The fervid sun
Of Asia glitters on his leafy lair,
As fearful of the lion's wrath he hastes
With timid footsteps through the whisp'ring reeds.
Quick plunging 'mid the renovating stream,
The copious draught inspires his bounding veins
With joyous vigor.
Patient o'er the sands,
The burden-bearer of the desert clime,
The camel, toileth. Faint with deadly thirst
His writhing neck of bitter anguish tells.
Lo! an oasis, and a tree-girt well,
And mov'd by powerful instinct, on he hastes,
With agonizing speed, to drink, or die.
On his swift courser, o'er the burning wild
The Arab cometh. From his eager eye
Flashes desire. Seeks he the sparkling wine
Giving its ruby color to the cup?
No! to the gushing spring he flies, and deep
Buries his scorching lip, and laves his brow,
And blesses Allah.
Christian pilgrim, come!
Thy brother of the Koran's broken creed
Doth teach thee wisdom, and with courteous hand
Nature, thy mother, holds the crystal cup,
And bids thee pledge her in the element
Of temperance and health.
Drink and be whole,
And purge the fever-poison from thy veins,
And pass in purity and peace, to taste
The river flowing from the throne of God.
DIVINE AID:
Shall
the form the Almighty moulded
For the creature of His care,
Shall the spirit he enfolded
In such casket frail and fair,
Stain the beauty He imparted,
Through an appetite of shame?
Leave affection broken-hearted,
Shuddering o'er a tarnished name?
Oh! forbid it, Thou who givest
Armor to the tempted soul,
Thou, who still in glory livest,
While eternal ages roll:
Through this brief and dark probation
Keep us from such evil free
Be our refuge aud salvation,
Till we find our home with Thee.
APPLES OF SODOM.
Oh! what is life thus spent? and what are they
But frantic, who thus spend it?
Cowper
.
The
heir of a noble house grew up to manhood. His
person was lofty, and his step commanding and proud.
He had been nurtured in halls of learning, and all that
wealth could lend to intellect was his. He dwelt in a
stately mansion, and many waited for his smile.
In his ample library, were gathered the wisdom of
ancient sages, and the varied knowledge of modern times.
Tomes, enriched by the skill of the engraver, and gay in
silk and gold, strewed his tables. There he sometimes
lingered, till the lamps grew pale, and the fire in his
burnished
grate faded.
But, as he sate in his deep chair of velvet, with his
feet upon an embroidered ottoman, he sometimes dozed
over the open page. For a wine-cup was beside him
there.
Once he read, from a classic book, of the apples of
Sodom. But deep sleep came upon him, and falling, he
lay upon the rich carpet. His servants bore him to his
2*
couch, and when his head sank in the deep, down pillow,
he murmured something like Apples of Sodom.
Afterwards, when he slept long among the books, or
his feet failed in the hall, and they laid him in his bed,
as one without strength, they said to each other, Our
master hath eaten the apples of Sodom. But beyond
this, they spake not, for they loved the heir of that
ancient
house where they had so long been fed.
A fair, young creature was seen in the lofty rooms of
that princely abode. At her word, the marble vases
glowed with fresh flowers, and guests, robed in rich
apparel, gathered round the costly board. At her word,
the steeds moved gracefully in the proud chariot, for she
bore over that household the authority of a wife.
Yet was there something at her heart, that gnawed
like a secret worm. Of this, she spake not. But the
green leaves of hope withered, and the garlands of joy.
She lay upon a silken couch. Perfumes breathed
around her. The light of the silver lamp was shaded by
the heavy folds of silken curtains, and the steps gliding
around her, upon the thick, and radiant carpet, gave no
sound. Then the wail of a weak infant was heard,and
the soul of the young mother departed.
The master of the mansion wept; but with his tears
were drops of wine. The holy fruits of sorrow he
gathered
not, for in his hand were the apples of Sodom.
Yet the little feet of the child at his side, made music in
his heart, and he saw with pride that the dark curls round
the pure forehead were like his own.
The boy grew in strength and in beauty. His heart
reached out slight tendrils for something to love, and took
hold both of the evil and the good. Ere the eyes of the
mind were fully opened, the quick passions had put forth
broad, dark leaves to drink up the sunbeams.
When he erred, and deserved reproof, or when he did
well, and needed encouragement, there was no father,
save a bloated form in the wine-trance. He became a
youth, and flattery spake to him soft things.
At his nod, servants went and came, and when his
splendid equipage rolled along the pavement, the gazing
crowd said that he was happy. But they knew not, that
for the undisciplined spirit there is no happiness.
Years rolled on. And in the house of strangers,
whence issued wild shrieks, and exulting shouts without
cause, and the loud laughter of the maniac, was the son of
the drunkard. Bolts and bars restrained him, and the
glory of his clustering locks was shorn.
He raved wildly, calling his servants to his aid, and
uttering maledictions because they came not. At
intervals
,
he was quiet, and wrote upon the walls of his cell,
incoherent thoughts. There, amid broken and blotted
lines, might be traced out,
Apples of Sodom
.
The father sate in his lonely halls. He scarcely
mourned for his lost son. An equal madness was upon
him, and a greater sin; for they were voluntary. The
habit, which like a tyrant ruled him, and been his own
choice. He had himself forged the chains, that were
dragging him to the lowest hell.
He sate in his lonely halls. Friends had forsaken him,
for he had shown kindness to none. The white hairs
of age were upon him, yet had he not become wise.
Wealth was still his, but he enjoyed it not. Neither
gave he to the poor, for a depraved appetite had eaten
up his sympathies.
The weakness of age came upon him. He was a
driveller
,
and full of disease. His old servants were dead, and
the new mocked him, and stole his substance. His dim
eyes discovered not their thefts, but he trusted them not,
and dwelt with them as among enemies.
None pitied him, or said, Poor old man! for his
vice had made him an abhorrence. Memory fled away;
so that the names of his wife, or child, woke no image in
his soul. Yet he forgot not the wine-cup. There it
stood, ever near him, and he drowned in it the last light
of life.
He died. And the bloated corpse scarce retained the
form of humanity. They bore him to his tomb, with the
pomp of mourning; with steeds slowly pacing, and
nodding
their sable plumes: for he was the heir of a noble
house. Yet, in that long procession, none remembered
aught that he had done for the comfort of the sorrowful,
or to cause his name to be gratefully remembered among
men.
They laid down the dead, in the tomb with his fathers.
And methought, from their coffins issued a hollow voice,
Strength was thine, and manly beauty; wealth, and
learning, and love, and the joys of paternity; length of
days, and all that the world covets.
Yet hast thou come unto us as with the burial of a
beast, for whom none weepeth. Yea, thou didst choose
to pare the Apples of Sodom, and feed on their ashes all
the days of thy life. So hast thou found bitterness at the
latter end.
ONLY THIS ONCE.
Numbers x. 17.
Only this once:
the wine-cup glowed,
All sparkling with its ruby ray,
The bacchanalian revel flowed,
And Folly made the madness gay.
Then he, so oft, so deeply warned,
The sway of conscience rashly spurned,
His promise of repentance scorned,
And coward-like, to guilt returned.
Only this once:
the tale is told,
He wildly quaff'd the poisonous tide;
With more than Esau's frenzy sold
The birth-right of his soul, and died.
I do not say that breath forsook
The clay, and left his pulses dead,
But Reason in her empire shook,
And all the life of life was fled.
Then angel eyes with pity wept,
When he, whom Virtue fain would save,
His sacred vow so falsely kept,
And strangely chose a drunkard's grave.
Only this once:
Beware! beware!
Gaze not upon the blushing wine;
Repel temptation's siren snare,
And prayerful seek for strength divine.
DEATH'S CHOICE.
The
shadowy monarch, on his throne of skulls,
Sate, wearied and displeased.
My cheerless task
Since he of Eden felt a brother's hate,
Down to the brow that blanches as I speak,
Hath known no respite. Would that there were
one
With whom to trust my cares awhile, and snatch
One moment of repose. Ho! ye who wait!
Give notice that with him most worthy found
By previous deeds, to waste the race of man,
The King of Terrors will delight to share
The glory of his kingdom.
Mighty winds,
Swollen high to earthquake violence, and tones
Of many waters, like wild, warring seas,
Proclaimed the edict, while the lightning's spear
Wrote it in flame on every winged cloud:
Yea, with such zeal the elements conspired
To publish the decree, methought there lurked
In each, some latent, lingering hope, to win
The promised regency.
The Passions came,
Throned on their storm-clouds, and with varied voice
Thundering, or eloquent, as best beseemed
Their several natures, boasted how to quell
Life's feeble springs.
But to their claims, stern Death
Gave credence cold.
Next, fleshless Famine stalked,
Followed by fierce, unpitying Pestilence,
Still ever in their ear a mournful sound,
The weeping of the nations.
Loudly shriek'd
A martial trump, and on his bannered car,
War, like a sovereign, came. Unnumbered spoils
Were strewed around him, and the blood of men
Flowed, as a river, 'neath his chariot wheels.
His eagle eye the promised honor scanned,
As an undoubted right. But still pale Death
Pondered and spake not, till, with haughty pride
The candidate withdrew, and trembling Earth
Shrank at his kindled wrath.
There was a pause,
As if none dare in that foiled champion's steps
Essay to tread.
At length, a bloated form
Moved slowly on, with mixed and maddening bowl.
But ere the footstool of the throne he pressed,
Death, with a father's fondness hasting down,
Embraced, and in the seat of empire placed.
Great was the wonder, but none dare gainsay:
For with a fearful shout, all Nature's foes,
Diseases, passions, wars and sins, confessed
Intemperance their king, and at his feet
Their boasted, time-cemented trophies, cast.
V VOBIS.
[1]
[1]
Woe unto you.
V Vobis!
ye whose lip doth lave
Too freely in the sparkling wine,
Regardless, though that passion-wave
Blot from your soul Heaven's light divine:
V Vobis!
heed the warning cry,
Fly! ere the leprous taint is deep;
Fly! ere the hour of doom is nigh,
And pitying angels cease to weep.
V Vobis!
ye who fail to read
His Name, that shines where'er ye tread,
The Alpha of our infant creed,
The Omega of the sainted dead:
It glows where'er the pencill'd flowers
Their tablet to the desert show,
Where'er the mountain's rocky towers
In shadow wrap the vales below.
Where roll the starry worlds on high,
In glorious order, strong and fair;
In each red letter on the sky
The Comet writes, 'tis there! 'tis there!
'Tis graved on Ocean's furrowed brow,
On every shell that tints the shore,
And where the solemn forests bow,
V Vobis! ye who scorn the lore.
V Vobis!
all who trust in earth,
Who lean on reeds that pierce the breast,
Who drain the foaming cup of mirth,
Or seek ambition's storm-wreath'd crest,
Who early rise, and late take rest,
In Mammon's mine the careworn slave,
Who find each phantom-race unblest,
Yet shrink reluctant from the grave.
THE WIDOW AND HER SON.
Care, and peril, instead of joy,
Guilt and dread shall be thine, rash boy.
Lo! thy mantling chalice of life
Foameth with sorrow, and madness, and strife.
It is well. I discern a tear on thy cheek,
It is well. Thou art humble, and silent, and meek.
Now, courage again! and with peril to cope,
Gird thee with vigor, and helm thee with hope.
Martin Farquhar Tupper
.
A group
of villagers surrounded an open grave. A
woman, holding two young children by the hand, was
bowed down with grief. There seemed to be no other
immediate mourners. But many an eye turned on them
with sympathy, and more than one glistened with tears.
In a small, rural community, every death is felt as a
solemn thing, and in some measure, a general loss. The
circumstances that attended it, are inquired into, and
remembered
;
while, in cities, the frequent hearse scarce
gains a glance, or a thought, from the passing throng.
On this occasion it was distinctly known, that Mr.
Jones, the carpenter of the village, who was that day
buried, had led a reproachless life, and that his death,
by sudden disease, in the prime of his days, would be an
unspeakable loss to his wife, and little ones. Pitying
kindness stirred in the hearts of those honest people,
and whatever service their limited means allowed, was
promptly rendered. It was the earnest desire of the
widow, to keep, if possible, the cottage where they had
resided since their marriage; and which was the more
dear, from having been built by the hands of her
husband
.
They respected her diligence and prudence, and
at their seasons of fruit-gathering and harvest she was
not forgotten. But as her health, which had been worn
down by watching and sorrow, returned, her energies
also were quickened to labor, that she might bring up
her children without the aid of charity: and her efforts
were prospered.
In the course of a few years, it was thought advisable
for her daughter, who was ingenious with the needle, to
go to a neighboring town and obtain instruction in the
trade of a dressmaker. Richard, who was two years
younger, remained with his mother, attending in winter
the village-school, and at other periods of the year,
finding
occasional employment among the farmers in the
vicinity. It was seen by all, how much the widow's
heart was bound up in him, and how she was always
devising means for his improvement and happiness.
But as Richard grew older, he liked the society of
idle boys, and it was feared did not fully appreciate, or
repay her affection. He was known to be addicted to
his own way, and had been heard to express contempt
for the authority of women. There were rumors of
his having frequented places where liquors were sold;
yet none imagined the disobedience and disrespect which
that lonely cottage sometimes witnessed, for the mother
complained only to her God, in the low sigh of prayer.
She was not able to break his intimacy with evil
associates
,
and, ere he reached his eighteenth year, had too
much reason to believe him a partaker in their vices.
It was supposed that she was unacquainted with his
conduct, because she spoke not of it to others, and
continued
to treat him with tenderness. But deep Love,
though sometimes willing to appear blind, is quick-sighted
to the faults of its object. It may keep silence, but the
glance of discovery, and the thrill of torture, are alike
electric.
The widowed mother had hoped much from the return
of her daughter, and the aid of her young, cheerful
spirit, in rendering their home attractive. Her arrival,
in full possession of her trade, with the approbation of
her employers, gave to her lone heart a joy long
untasted
.
Margaret was an active and loving girl, graceful
in her person, and faithful to every duty. Her industry
provided new comforts for the cottage, while her
innocent
gayety enlivened it.
The widowed mother earnestly besought her
assistance
,
in saving their endangered one from the perils that
surrounded him; and her sisterly love poured itself out
upon his heart, in a full, warm flood. It would seem
that he caught the enthusiasm of her example; for he
returned with more of diligence to his former labors,
while his intervals of leisure were spent at home. When
his mother saw him seated by their pleasant little hearth,
sometimes reading to Margaret, while she plied the
needle, or occasionally winding her silks, and arranging
the spools in her work-table, their young voices mingling
in song, or laughter, she felt how powerful was the
influence
of a good sister, and lifted up her soul in praise
to the Rock of their salvation. Somewhat more of filial
respect and observance she might have desired, but was
content that her own claims should be overlooked, might
he only be rescued. Months fled, and her pallid cheek
had already resumed the tinge of a long-forgotten
happiness
.
One day, when spring made the earth beautiful, on
entering suddenly Margaret's little chamber, she surprised
her in a passion of tears.
My daughter! My dear child!
Oh, mother! I wish you had not come, just now.
Tell me, are you sick?
No, not sick. Only my heart is broken.
Can you not trust me with your trouble?
Long and bursting sobs followed, with stifled attempts
at utterance.
Mother, we have been so happy, I cannot bear to
destroy it all. Richard,my poor brother.
Speak! what has he done?
Hiding her face in her mother's bosom, she said in
broken tones,
You ought to know,I must tell you. It cannot
longer be concealed that he often comes home late, and
disguised with liquor. I tried to shut out the truth from
myself. Then I tried to hide it from others. But it is
all in vain.
Alas! I thought he was changed, that your blessed
hand had saved him. Tell me what you have
discovered
.
I would fain spare you. But I have seen enough,
for weeks past, to destroy my peace. Last night, you
had retired before he came. He entered with a reeling
step, and coarse, hateful words. I strove to get him
silently to his bed, lest he might disturb you. But he
withstood me. His fair blue eyes were like balls of fire;
and he cursed me, till I fled from him.
The mother clasped her closer to her heart, and bathed
her brow with tears.
Look to Him, my child, who ordereth all our trials.
Night after night, have I spent in sleepless prayer for the
poor, sinful boy.
Ah! then you have known it long. Mother, you have
been too indulgent. You should warn and reprove him,
and give him no rest, until he repent and forsake his
sin.
All that was in my power to do, has been faithfully
done. I have not spared him. But he revolted. He
3
despised my woman's voice, my motherly love. I forbore
to distress your young heart with all that I might have
revealed. I feared to damp the courage on which my
hopes were built. I told you freely of his danger from
evil associates, but relied on the power of your love too
much, too fondly. Yet you have been an angel to him,
and to me.
Mother, I will myself rebuke him. I will speak for
you, and for God.
Margaret, may He give you wisdom. Should your
brother's mind not be in a right state, your words will be
hurled back upon your own head. Sometimes, I have
poured out my whole soul in reproof. Then, again, I
have refrained, to save him from the sin of cursing his
mother. Yet speak to him, Margaret, if you will. May
God give power to your words. Still, I cannot but fear
lest you take a wrong time, when his feelings are
inflamed
with intemperance.
Be at peace, in this, dearest mother, I will not
broach such a subject but at a fitting time.
The mother had little hope from the intended appeal
of her daughter. Indeed, she shrank from it, for she
best knew the temper of her son. Yet she humbled
herself
to go to the vender of liquor, and beseech him to
withhold it from him, in the name of the widow's God.
Margaret drooped in secret, but spoke cheering words to
her brother, with an unclouded brow. One day, he had
aided her in some slight operation in the garden, with
unwonted kindness. She fancied that she saw in his eye,
the reviving spirit of better days. Throwing her arm
around his neck, she said,
Brother Richard, you can be
so
good. How I wish
it were always thus.
Always to be working under your orders, I suppose.
No doubt, that would be quite pleasing. All you women
like to rule, when you can.
Not to rule, but to see those we love rule
themselves
.
Is that what you tell Will Palmer, when he sits here
so long, watching you like a cat, and looking as wise as
an owl? If you should chance to marry him, you'd tell
him another tale, and try all ways to rule him yourself.
Now, Miss Mag Jones, tell the whole truth: why is that
same deacon that is to be, here forever?
I will not hide anything from you, dear Richard,
who have known my thoughts from my cradle. We shall
probably be married in the autumn, and then
And then, what?
Oh, brother! then, I hope you will do all in your
power to comfort mother, when I shall not be here.
Not be here! Do you expect to move to Oregon, or
sit on the top of the Andes, with this remarkable
sweetheart
of yours?
We shall not leave this village. But when I have a
new home and other duties, I hope you will be daughter
and son both, to our poor mother. Remember how hard
she has worked to bring us up, how she has watched us
in sickness, and prayed for us, at all times. Her only
earthly hope is in us; especially in you, her son.
Margaret, what are you driving at?
Oh, Richard! forsake those evil associates, who are
leading you to ruin. Break off the habit of drinking, that
debases, and destroys you. For the sake of our widowed
mother, for the sake of our father's unblemished memory,
for the sake of the sister, who loves you as her own
soul
For the sake of what else? Bill Palmer, I presume.
Is there never to be an end to these women's tongues?
So it has been these three years; preach, preach, till I
have prayed for deafness. I have had no rest, for
Mrs. Jones's eternal sermons; and now you must needs
come to help her, with your everlasting gab.
The young girl heeded not that his eyes flashed, and
that the veins of his neck were swollen and sanguine.
Throwing off the timidity of her nature, she spoke slowly,
and with solemn emphasis, as one inspired.
If you have no pity on the mother who bore you, no
tender memory of the father who laid his hands on your
head, when they were cold in death; no regard for an
honest, honorable reputation; at least, have some pity on
your own undying soul, some fear of the bar of
judgment
,
of the worm that never dies, and seek mercy while
there is hope, and repent, that you may be forgiven.
I tell you what, I'll not bear this from you. I know
something to make fine words out of, too. Your mother
has been slandering me, prohibiting the traffic in liquor,
I understand: for aught I know, you were her
spokesman
.
Wise women! as if there was but one place on
this round world, where it is sold. Hypocrites you are,
both of you! making boast of your love, and publishing
evil against me. Look out, how you drive a man to
desperation. If you see my face no more, thank
yourselves
!
And with a hoarse imprecation, he threw himself over
the garden fence, and disappeared. That night there was
agonizing grief in the pleasant cottage, tears, and
listening
for the feet that came not. Then, were days of vain
search, and harrowing anxiety, closed by sleepless
watchings
.
Alas! for the poor mother's heart! What had
the boy been left to do? what! Had not his sister
been too severe? Would that her reproaches had been
less sharp to his sore heart, or that she had taken a better
time, when he might have been more patient. Thus
travailed the yearning heart of the mother, with the old,
blind Eden-policy,
vain excuse
.
Again another tide of struggling emotion. Would he
but come, even as he had so often done, with unequal
steps, and muttered threatenings. Would he only
come
,
that the Love which had nursed his innocent infancy,
might once more look upon his face. Then swept
terrible
thoughts over the mother's soul, images of reckless
crime, and ghastly suicide. But she gave them not
utterance to the daughter who sate beside her, working
and weeping. For she said, the burden of the child is
already greater than she can bear.
Yet he, who was the cause of all this agony, hastened
night and day from the quiet spot of his birth, towards
the sea-coast, boiling with passion. He conceived
himself
to have been utterly disgraced by the prohibition of
his mother to the seller of liquors, not feeling that the
disgrace was in the sin that had made such prohibition
necessary. He wildly counted those who most loved him,
as conspirators against his peace; for vice, to its other
distortions of soul, adds the insanity of mistaking the
best friends for enemies.
Full of vengeful purpose, and knowing that his mother
had long dreaded lest he should choose the life of a sailor,
he hurried to a seaport, and shipped on a whaling voyage.
As the vessel was to sail immediately, to be absent more
than three years, and he entered under a feigned name,
it gave him pleasure that he should thus baffle pursuit or
discovery.
Let them trace me, if they can, said he; and
when I get back, I'll sail again, without seeing them.
They may preach now as long as they please, but I'll be
out of their hearing.
Thus, in the madness of a sinful heart, he threw
himself
upon the great deep, without a thought of kindness
towards man, or a prayer to God. Yet he was
ill-prepared
for the lot of hardship he had chosen,the coarse
fare, the iron sway, the long night-watch, and the
slippery shroud in the tempest. To drown misery in
the daily allowance of liquor, was his principal resource,
when at first the sea-sickness seized him, and afterwards,
when his sea-sins sank him still lower in brutality. Vile
language, bad songs, and frequent broils were the
entertainments
of the forecastle; while the toilsome duties of
a raw sailor before the mast, were imbittered by the
caprices of the captain, himself a votary of intemperance.
A stronger shadowing forth of the intercourse of
condemned
spirits could scarcely be given, than the fierce
crew of that rude vessel exhibited, shut out, for years,
from all humanizing and holy influences. Yet strange to
say, the recreant, who had abused the indulgences of
home and the supplications of love, derived some benefit
where it could least have been anticipated. Indolence
was exchanged for regular employment, and he learned
the new and hard lesson of submission to authority; and
whenever a lawless spirit is enforced to industry, and the
subjugation of its will, it must be in some degree a gainer.
So, with the inconsistency of our fallen nature, the soul
that had spurned the sunbeam, and hardened under the
shower, was arrested by the thunderblot, and taught by
the lightning.
In the strong excitement and peril of conflict with the
huge monarch of the deep, he gained some elevation,
by a temporary forgetfulness of
self;
for that one image,
long magnified and dilated, had closed the mind to all
ennobling prospects, and generous resolves. The
deadlights
of the soul had been so long shut in, that the
first ray that streamed through them, seemed new and
wonderful.
Accident and ill-fortune protracted their voyage,
several
months beyond its intended limits. While pursuing
a homeward course, some seasons of serious reflection,
when not under the sway of intemperance, came over
Richard Jones. For he was not utterly hardened; and
prayers continually rose up from his forsaken home, that,
if yet in the land of the living, he might repent, and find
hope. Conscience, at times, wrought powerfully, so that
he dreaded to be alone, or turned as a refuge to the vile
revelry of comrades whom he despised.
Once, as he paced the deck in his midnight watch,
while the vessel went rushing onward through the deep,
dark sea, solemn thoughts settled heavily around him.
Here, and there, a star looked down upon him, with
watchful, reproving eye. He felt alone, in the presence
of some mighty, mysterious Being. Early memories
returned
;
the lessons of the Sabbath-school, the plaintive
toll of the church-bell, the voice of his mother, as seated
on her knee, she taught him of the dear Saviour, who
took the children to his breast, and blessed them.
A few drops of rain, from a passing cloud, fell upon
his head. In the excitement of the reverie, he gasped,
These are
her
tears! Yes! Just so they felt on my
forehead, when she used to beseech me to forsake the
foolish, and live, and go in the way of understanding.
He leaned over the vessel's side. The rain-drops
ceased, and the phosphorescence of the waters was like
a great lake of fire. The billows rose, tossing their
white crests for a moment, and then sank into the
burning flood. He watched them till his brain grew
giddy. Presently, a single faint moonbeam shot through
the cleft of a cloud. As it glimmered over the surge,
he thought a face loomed up, and gazed on him,a
fair young face, paler than marble. A hand seemed
to stretch itself out, arms to bend in an embracing
clasp, a floating death-shroud gleamed,and all was
lost forever.
Oh, Margaret! oh, my sister! he shrieked, just so
she looked when she adjured me, in the name of God, to
have pity on my poor mother, and on my own soul.
As if he had witnessed her funeral obsequies, he wept
in remorseful grief. His watch closed. In horror of
spirit, he retired, but not to sleep. Even the hardened
men who surrounded him forbore to jeer, when they
heard him moan in anguish, Oh, Margaret! oh, my
sister!
These strong and painful impressions scarcely wore
away during the brief remainder of the voyage. When
he saw in dim outline, the hills of his country gleaming
amid the clouds, a new joy took possession of his soul.
And when his feet rested again on the solid earth, and
3*
he received his wages, his first thought was to hasten
and share them with those whom he had so recklessly
forsaken.
Will you come to my house, sir? said a man, upon
the wharf, near him. Good accommodations, sir, for
sailor gentlemen. Everything, first cut and first cost.
Where is your house?
Near by. Here, boy; take this fine young man's
chest along. I'll show you the way, sir. The favorite
boarding-house for all jolly, noble-spirited tars.
It was evident that he was now in the power of a
land-shark. Alas! for all his hopes: the struggles of
conscience, the rekindling of right affections.
Temptation
,
and the force of habit, were too strong for him.
Almost continually intoxicated, his hard earnings
vanished
,
he knew not how, or where. It was not long ere
his rapacious landlord pronounced him in debt, and
produced claims which he was unable to meet. His
chest with all its contents was seized, and he, miserably
clad, and half bewildered, was turned into the streets,
by his sordid betrayer.
As the fumes of prolonged inebriety subsided, horrible
images surrounded him. Smothered resolutions, and
pampered vices, sprang from the seething caldron of his
brain, frowning and gibbering like ghostly tormentors.
Monstrous creatures grinned and beckoned, and when he
would have fled, cold slimy serpents seemed to coil
around and fetter his trembling limbs.
Still, with returning reason came a deeper misery.
He desired to die, but death fled from him. Covering
his face with his hands, as he sate on the ground, in the
damp, chill air of evening, he meditated different forms
of suicide. He would fain have plunged into the sea,
but his tottering limbs failed him. Searching for his
knife, the only movable that remained to him, he
examined
its blunted edge, and loosened blade, as if
doubting
their efficiency. Thus engaged, by the dim light of
a street-lamp, groans, as if the pangs of death had
seized him, burst from his heaving breast. Half
believing
himself already a dweller with condemned spirits,
he started at the sound of a human voice.
Thee art in trouble, I think.
The eyes once so clear in days of innocence, opening
wide and wild, glared with amazement on the calm,
compassionate brow of a middle-aged man, in the garb
of a Quaker. The knife fell from his quivering hand,
and sounded on the pavement. But there was no
answer
.
Thee art in great trouble, friend!
Friend! Friend!
Who calls me
friend?
I have
no friends, but the tormentors to whom I am going.
Hast thou a wife? or children?
No, no; God be thanked. No wife, nor children.
I tell you there are no friends left, but the fiends who
have come for me. No home, but their eternal fires.
Shoals of them were here just now,ready!
aye, ready!
and he laughed a demoniac laugh.
Poor, poor youth! I see thee art a sailor.
I was once. What I am now, I know not. I wish
to be nothing. Leave me to myself, and those that are
howling around me. Here! here! I come: and he
groped aimlessly for his lost knife.
The heart of the philanthropist yearned as over an
erring brother. The spirit of the Master who came to
seek and to save the lost, moved within him.
Alas! poor victim. How many have fallen, like
thee, before the strong man armed. Sick art thou, at
the very soul. I will give thee shelter for the night.
Come with me, to my home.
Home! Home?
shouted the inebriate, as if he
understood him not. And while the benevolent man,
taking his arm, staid his uncertain footsteps, he still
repeated, but in tones more humanized and tender,
Home! your home?
What!
me a sinner?
until a burst
of unwonted tears relieved the fires within.
And as that blessed man led him to his own house,
and laid him upon a good bed, speaking words of
comfort
;
heard he not from above that deep, thrilling
melody
,
I was sick, and ye visited me, in prison, and ye
came unto me. Inasmuch as ye have done it unto one
of these, ye have done it unto me?
With reviving day the sinful man revived; humbled
in heart, and sad. Subdued by suffering, and softened
by a kindness, which he felt to be wholly undeserved,
he poured out a fervent prayer for divine aid in the
great work of reformation. He was glad to avail
himself
,
without delay, of the proposal of his benefactor, to
enter on service in a temperance ship ready to sail
immediately
for the East Indies.
I am acquainted with the captain, said the good
man, and can induce him to take thee. I am also
interested
in the vessel, and in the results of her voyage.
A relative of mine, goes out as supercargo. Both of
them will be thy friends, if thou art true to thyself.
But intemperance bringeth sickness to the soul, as well
as to the body. Wherefore, pray for healing, and strive
for penitence, and angels who rejoice over the returning
sinner, will give thee aid.
Self-abasement, and gratitude to his preserver, swelled
like an overwhelming flood, and choked his utterance.
All men have sinned, my son, though not all in the
same way. But there is mercy for every one that
sorroweth
,
and forsaketh the evil. God hath given me the
great happiness to help some who have fallen as low as
thee. Thank Him, therefore, and not the poor arm of
flesh. May He give thee-strength to stand firm on the
Rock of salvation.
Broken words, mingled with tears, struggled vainly
to express the emotions of the departing sailor. His
benefactor once more shaking him heartily by the hand,
bade him farewell.
Peace be with thee, on the great waters. And
remember
to strive and pray.
A new world seemed to open upon the rescued one.
Of the quietness and order that pervaded a temperance
ship, he had no anticipation. There were neither
quarrels
nor profanity, so common among the crew, nor
arrogance
,
and capricious punishment, on the part of those
in power. Cheerful obedience, and just authority
prevailed
,
as in a well-regulated family. He was both
surprised
and delighted to find his welfare an object of
interest with the officers of the ship, to receive kind
counsel from them, and to be permitted to employ his
brief intervals of leisure with the well-chosen volumes
of a seaman's library.
Still it was not with him, as if he had never sinned.
Not all at once could he respire freely in a pure
atmosphere
.
Physical exhaustion, from the withdrawal of
stimulants to which he had been long accustomed,
sometimes
caused such deep despondence, that life itself
seemed a burden.
Cherished vice brings also a degree of moral obliquity.
Every permitted sin lifts a barrier between the clear
shining of God's countenance, and the cold and frail
human heart. Perverted trains of thought, and
polluted
remembrances still lingered with him, and feelings
long debased, did not readily acquire an upward
tendency
.
Yet the parting admonition of his benefactor to
strive and pray
, ever sounded in his ears, and became
the motto of his soul. By little and little, through
faithful obedience, he obtained the victory. His
improvement
was noticed by others, before he dared to
congratulate himself; for humility had strangely become
a part of his character, who once defied all laws, human
and divine. His countenance began to resume the
ingenuous
expression of early years, and the eyes, so long
fiery, or downcast, looked up with the clearness of hope.
Blessings on the temperance ship! he often
ejaculated
,
as he paced the deck in his nightly watch, and
eternal blessings on the holy man, who snatched me
from the lowest hell.
At his arrival in a foreign port, he was watchful to
avoid every temptation. His friend, the supercargo,
took him under his especial charge, and finding him much
better educated than is usual with sailors, gave him
employment
of a higher nature, which was both steady and
lucrative. His expenses were regulated with extreme
economy, that he might lay up more liberally for those
dear ones at home, whose images became more and more
vivid, as his heart threw off the debasing dominion of
intemperance, and its host of evils.
The returning voyage was one of unmingled
satisfaction
.
Compunction had given place to a healthful virtue,
whose root was not in himself.
Why is this? he often soliloquized: why should
I be saved, while so many perish? How have I deserved
such mercy, who willingly made a beast of myself, through
the fiery draught of intemperance? Oh, my mother! I
know that thy prayers have followed me,they have
saved me.
With what a surpassing beauty did the hills of his
native land gleam upon his eye, unfolding before him,
like angels' wings. He felt also, that an angel's mission
was his to the hearts that loved him, and which he in
madness had wounded. Immediately on reaching the
shore, he began his journey to them. Stopping his ears
to the sounds of the city, where he had once sunk so
low, he hurried by its haunts of temptation, less from
fear, than from sickening disgust.
Autumn had ripened its fruits, without sacrificing the
verdure of summer. It was the same season that, seven
years before, he had traversed this region. But with
what contrasted prospects, and purposes! How truly
has it been said, that no two individuals can differ more
from each other, than the same individual may, at
different
periods of life, differ from himself.
Richard Jones scarcely paused on his way for sleep, or
for refreshment. He sought communion with none. The
food of his own thoughts sufficed. As he drew near the
spot of his birth, impatience increased almost beyond
endurance. The rapid wheels seemed to make no
progress
,
and the distance to lengthen interminably.
Quitting
the public vehicle, which did not pass that secluded
part of the village where his parental cottage was situated,
he sought it in solitude. It was pleasant to him to
come thus unknown, and he meditated the rapturous
surprise
he was about to create.
Those rocks! that river! can they be the same? The
roof! the very roof! and the maple that shaded it.But
the garden-fence, the gate, are broken and gone. Where
is the honeysuckle that Margaret trained? He was about
to lift the latch,to burst in, as in days of old. But
other thoughts came over him, and he knocked gently, as
a stranger; again, more earnestly.
Who is there?
It was a broad, gruff accent. He opened the door; a
large, coarse woman stood there, with sleeves rolled above
her red elbows, toiling at the wash-tub.
Does the Widow Jones live here?
The Widow who?
why, Lord, no. I live here myself,
to be sure.
The quivering lips, and parched tongue, scarcely
articulated
,
Where is Margaret Jones?
How should I know? I never hearn o' such a one,
not I. Tho' I've been here, and hereabouts, this two
year, I reckon.
A horror of great darkness fell upon the weary
traveller
.
He turned from the door. Whither should he go?
There was no neighboring house, and had there been, he
would fain have hidden his misery from all who had ever
known him. Instinctively he entered the burial-ground,
which was near by. There was his father's grave with
its modest stone, where he had been so often led in
childhood
.
By its side was another, not fresh, yet the sods
were imperfectly consolidated, and had not gathered
greenness. He threw himself upon it,he grasped a
few dry weeds that grew there, and waved in the rising
blast.
This is to be
alone
in the world! Oh God! I have
deserved it; I was her murderer! but I dreamed not of
such misery!
Long he lay there, in his tempestuous grief, without
being sensible of a faint hollow sound, heard at regular
intervals. It was the spade of the sexton, casting up
earth and stones from the depth of a grave, in which he
labored. Even his deaf ear caught the voice of anguish,
as he finished his work. Coming forward, he stood in
wonder, as if to illustrate the description of the poet:
Near to a grave that was newly made.
Lean'd the sexton thin, on his earth-worn spade,
A relic of by-gone days, was he,
And his locks were as white as the foam of the sea.
Starting at that withered effigy, which in the dim haze
of twilight seemed more like a ghost than a man, he
exclaimed,
Did you ever hear of a middle-aged woman, called
the Widow Jones?
Hear of her!
I know'd her well, and her husband
too. An honest, hard-working man he was; and when
he died, was well spoke of, through all this village.
And his wife?
Why everybody pitied her, inasmuch as her husband
died so sudden, and left leetle, or no means behind, for
her and the children.
There were children, then?
Yes, two on 'em. She worked hard enough, to
bring 'em up, I guess. I remember the funeral, as if
'twas only yesterday. I stood just about where you do
now; and I used this spade, the very first time it ever
was used, to dig that same grave.
With a convulsive effort, as when one plucks a dagger
from his breast, he asked faintly,
When did she die?
Die? mercy on you! Why, I don't s'pose she's dead
at all. Sure, I should have been called on to dig the
grave, if she had died: that's sartain. I've had all the
business of that sort, in these parts, as you may say, for
this forty year, and better. There did once come a
person
from the North country, and try to undersell me.
But he did'nt do his work thorough. His graves caved
in. He couldn't get a living, and so he went off. I'll
show ye one of the graves of his digging, if you'll just
came along,
Tell me, for God's sake! if the Widow Jones still
lives?
Why, man! what's the matter on ye? you're as
white as the tomb-stones. I tell ye, she's alive, for
aught I know to the contrary. She moved away from
here, a considerable time ago. It an't so well with her,
as 'twas in days past.
Grasping the sexton strongly by the arm, he
demanded
,
Where is she to be found?
Oh Lord! help! help! the man will murder me, I
verily believe. Did ye ever hear of what was called the
stone-house? just at the hither eend of the next village,
after you cross a bridge, and go up a hill, and turn to
the right, and see a small cluster of buildings, and a mill,
and a meetin'-house? Well, she lives there in a kind of
a suller-room, for I was a telling you, I expect, she an't
none too well off.Goodness! the creature is gone as if
he wanted to ride a streak o' lightning, and whip up. He
is demented, without a doubt. What a terrible risk I've
run! Deliver us from crazy men, here among the tombs.
How awful my arm aches, where he clutched it.
While the garrulous sexton made his way to his own
dwelling, to describe his mysterious guest, and imminent
peril of life; the supposed maniac was traversing the
intervening space with breathless rapidity. Lights began
to glimmer from the sparsely-sprinkled dwellings. The
laborers, returning from toil, took their evening repast
with their families. Here and there, a blazing hearth
marked the chillness of advancing autumn.
Rushing onward towards a long, low building of gray
stone, which appeared to have many tenants, he leaned a
moment against its walls, to recover respiration, and
bowing down, looked through an uncurtained window in
its gloomy basement. By the flickering light of some
brush-wood, burning in the chimney, he saw a woman
placing the fragments of a loaf upon a table, beside which
sate two young children. She was thin, and bent; but
having her head turned from him, he was unable to see
her features. Could that be
her;
so changed? Yet.
the
come in
, that responded to his rap, was in a tone
that thrilled his inmost soul.
Have you any food to bestow? I have travelled far,
and am hungry.
Sit down, sir, here at the table. I wish I had
something
better to offer you. But you are welcome to our
poor fare.
And she pushed towards him the bread and the knife.
He cut a slice, with a trembling hand. The youngest
child, watching the movement, whispered, with a
reproachful
look,
Granny! you said I should have two pieces to night,
'cause there was no dinner.
Hush, Richard! said the little sister, folding her
arms around his neck.
The returning wanderer with difficulty maintained his
disguise, as he marked the deep wrinkles on that brow,
which he had left so comely.
Have you only this broken loaf, my good woman? I
fear the portion I have taken, will not leave enough for
you and these little ones.
We shall have more to-morrow, sir, if God will. It
was not always thus with us. When my dear daughter
and her husband were alive, there was always a
sufficiency
for the children, and for me. But they are both
dead, sir; the father, last year, and she, when that boy
was born.
Had you no other children?
Yes, sir. One, a son, a dear and most beautiful boy.
Long years have passed, since he went away. Whether
he is in the land of the living, God only knows.
Her suppressed sob was changed to surprise and
resistance
,
as the stranger would fain have folded her in his
arms. Then, kneeling at her feet, and holding her thin
hands in his, he said,
Mother! dear mother! can you forgive me all?
There was no reply. The sunken eyes strained wide
open, and fixed. Color fled from the lips. He carried
her to the poor, low bed, and threw water upon her
temples
.
He chafed the rigid hands, and in vain sought for
some restorative to administer.
Wretch that I am! Have I indeed killed her?
And then the shrieks of the children grew shrill and
deafening,
The strange man has killed grandmother!
But the trance was brief. Light came to the eye, and
joy to the heart, known only to that of the mother who,
having sown in tears, beholds suddenly the blessed,
unexpected
harvest.
Do I live to see thy face? Let me hear thy dear
voice once more, my son.
But the son had vanished. At his return came
supplies
,
such as that poor, half-subterranean apartment
had never before witnessed; and ere long, with those
half-famished children, they partook of a repast, whose
rich elements of enjoyment have seldom been surpassed
on this troubled earth.
What a good, strange man! said the satisfied boy.
We must not call him the strange man any more,
but our uncle, said little Margaret; so he told me
himself.
Why must we say so?
Because he was dear mother's dear brother, just as
you are mine. Did not you see that he cried, when
grandmother told him she was dead?
Well, I shall love him for that, and for the good
supper he gave us.
Have you here my father's large Bible? asked the
son of the widow. She brought it forth from its sacred
depositary, carefully wrapped in a towel. Tears of
rapturous
gratitude chased each other along the furrows,
which bitter and burning ones had made so deep, as she
heard him, with slow and solemn utterance, read that
self-abasing melody of the Psalmist: Have mercy upon
me, O God, according to thy loving-kindness; according
to the multitude of thy mercies, blot out my
transgressions
.
This was the Psalm, that during his brokenness of
spirit, on the deep waters, had been his comforter; and
now he seemed to breathe into its eloquent words, the
soul of penitence and devotion. At its close, he kneeled
and poured out a fervent prayer to the God of their
salvation
;
and the sleep which fell that night upon all the
habitants of that lowly abode, was sweet as an angel's
smile.
The daily efforts of Richard Jones, for the comfort of
his mother, were beautiful. Her unspoken wishes were
studied with a zeal, which feels it can never either fully
repay, or atone. For her sake, and for that of the little
orphans intrusted to their care, he rejoiced at the gains,
which, through the friendship of the supercargo, he had
been enabled to acquire in a foreign clime, and which to
their moderated desires were comparative wealth.
But amid the prosperity which had been granted him,
he still turned with humility to the memorials of his
wasted years. In his conversations with his mother, he
frankly narrated his sins; and while he went down into
the dark depths whither intemperance had led him, she
shuddered, and was silent. Yet, when he spoke of the
benefactor who had found him in the streets, ready to
become a self-murderer, she raised her clasped hands,
and with strong emotion besought blessings on him who
had saved a soul from death. They felt that it is not
the highest and holiest compassion to relieve the body's
ills; but to rescue and bind up the poor heart that hath
wounded itself, and which the world hath cast out, to be
trodden down in its unpurged guilt.
He was not long in discovering how the heart of his
mother yearned after that former home, from which
poverty had driven her. On inquiry, he found that it
might be obtained, having been recently tenanted by
vagrant people. The time that he devoted to its
thorough
repair was happily spent. Its broken casements
were replaced, and its dingy walls whitened. The fences
were restored, with the pretty gate, over whose arch he
promised himself, that another season should bring the
blossoming vine that his lost sister had loved.
He sought also, in various places, those articles of
furniture which had been disposed of through necessity,
and which he had valued in earlier days. Soon the old
clock, with a new case, merrily ticked in the corner, and
the cushioned arm-chair again stood by the
hearth-stone
.
Near it was poor Margaret's work-table, with a
freshly-polished surface, on which he laid, when about
to take possession, the large family Bible bearing his
father's name.
Bright and happy was that morning, when leaning on
his arm, the children walking hand in hand beside them,
neatly apparelled, the widowed mother approached the
home endeared by tender recollections, and whence, poor
and desolate, she had gone forth. As she paused a
moment
at the door, the overflowing, unutterable emotion,
was gratitude for the restored virtue of the being most
4
beloved on earth. It would seem that congenial thoughts
occupied him, for drawing her arm more tenderly within
his own, he said: Lo! this thy son was
dead
, and is
alive
again, and
was lost, and is found
.
THE ANTIDOTE.
Man
press'd a cluster in his cup,
The grape, with ruby glow,
How high its sparkling foam leaped up!
But ruin lurked below.
A direr draught a demon gave,
With fiercer venom fired,
The tempted drank the burning wave,
Till reason's light expired
The weeping skies a crystal shed,
As pity's tears distil;
It mantled at the fountain's head
And in the gushing rill:
It bore a spell to heal his wound,
His fever-thirst to calm,
And lured him with a silver sound
To taste its trickling balm.
In trembling penitence he bowed,
He laved the leprous stain,
And those pure tear-drops from the cloud
Restored his health again.
THE WATER-BEARER.
I saw
a child, who towards his cottage-home
Two water-buckets bare. The winding path
Was steep and rocky, and his slender arm
Taxed to its utmost power. Awhile he paused,
Setting his burden down, just where the way
Grew more precipitous, and wiped his brow
With his worn sleeve, and breathed refreshing draughts
Of the sweet air, while still the summer sun
Flamed o'er his forehead.
Then, another boy,
Who, 'neath a poplar, in a neighboring field,
Sate playing with his dog in cool repose,
Uprising from that grassy nook, came forth,
And lent a ready hand to aid the toil.
So on they went together, grasping firm
The heavy buckets with a right good will,
While their young voices blended, clear and glad.
And as the bee inhales from humblest flower
Sown by the wayside, honey for her hive,
I treasured up a lesson; and when eve
Called home the laboring ox, and to its nest
Warned the sweet bird, and closed the lily's cup,
I took my little son upon my knee,
And told him of the water-bearer's toil,
And of the friendly helper.
When his eye
Grew large, and bright, and strongly fixed on mine,
Taking the story to his inmost thought,
I said,Drink thou the water from the spring,
That God hath made, and not the fiery cup
Of evil men, that burns the shrinking soul.
My gentle child, be pitiful to all,
For in thy heart are seeds of sympathy,
Whose buds are virtues and their fruit for heaven.
And when thou art a man, my blessed one,
Keep thy fresh spirit open to the woes
Of foreigner and stranger, of the race
Darken'd by Afric's sun, or those sad tribes
The red-brow'd people of the wilderness,
Lone exiles from those streams and forest-glades
That erst they call'd their own.
With ready hand
Help whosoe'er thou canst.
So, mayst thou find
Succor and love, in thine own hour of need,
If on thy heart, as on a signet-ring,
Is grav'd that precept from a Rock divine,
`Bear one another's burdens, and fulfil
The law of Christ.'
DRINKING SONG.
Drink
, friends, the parting hour draws nigh,
Drink, and forget your care;
The sultry summer noon is high,
Drink, and your strength repair.
Spare not, there's plenty, take your fill,
We have a vineyard proud,
A reservoir on vale and hill,
A fountain in the cloud.
Our flowing bowl is large, you see,
Lift high the song of cheer;
Our hearts are warm, our hands are free,
Drink deep, and never fear.
Our father Sun, the example gives,
Our mother Earth, also,
He drinketh sly, above the sky,
She jocuned drinks below.
Pledge, friends, pledge deep before we part,
To absent wife, or daughter,
Or bright-eyed maid, who rules your heart,
Drink deep, but only water.
THE PATRIARCH.
This earth doth yield
More than enough,that temperance may be tried.
Milton
.
In
the days of old, there dwelt a Patriarch toward the
rising sun, among the mountains of Asia. Many, and
sore troubles had he seen, and stood faithful, when all
around him fell, and were punished.
He was a tiller of the earth, and when it had brought
forth its fruits, he with his wife and children fed thereon,
and blessed the Lord.
And it came to pass, after he had cast in his seeds,
and the rain had watered them, and they put forth
abundantly
,
each after his kind, that there came up a plant
exceeding fair, and of a very tender green.
And as he visited it in the morning, when the dews
had hung a pearl upon the point of every young leaf, lo!
it lifted up tendrils, like the hands of a little child, that
reacheth and gropeth after some pleasant thing.
Then he set a prop near it, and guided thereunto the
wandering shoots, for he said, Peradventure its heart is
weak, and it needeth that some one should train it in the
right way.
So it grew and became a vine, and stretched out
interlacing
boughs, making a goodly shadow.
And as he diligently regarded it, there appeared
clusters
of fair grapes, hiding among the branches. Then
the master of the vine smelled a sweet savor, and called
together his household, and they marvelled at its beauty.
Deeper and deeper these clusters blushed, as the sun
looked upon them, and when they were fully ripe, rich
moisture trickled from their bursting pores, and fell upon
the ground.
When the Patriarch pressed some of them, the sweet
blood flowed freely, and fermented, and he drank thereof.
But, behold! his wisdom departed from him, and he lay
uncovered within his tent.
Then were his children affrighted, and spake one to
another, not knowing what these things should mean.
And the youngest son mocked, and derided, saying,
Lo! he who reproveth our folly, hath himself become
altogether vain. Doth it not behoove him who warneth
others, that he take heed unto his own ways?
Then his elder brethren answered, Hold thy peace!
He that revileth his father, God shall judge.
So they took a garment, and reverently covered the
Patriarch, walking backwards, that they might not look
upon his frailty.
And they sate down mournfully near the door of the
tent, and the two elder brethren communed together,
saying,
How great was our father! and how was he
honored
of God, inasmuch as he hid not from him, the
flood that was to drown the whole earth.
When all flesh had corrupted itself, he alone was
found pleasing to his Maker, and with eloquent words
did he patiently warn a world that was filled with
violence
.
Yea! and through his faith were we saved, when the
fountains of the great deep were broken up, for he alone
found grace to guide the lonely ark over the billows,
where slept the world of the ungodly.
To him alone did the dove bring the first green
token
from the abating waters; when all who had escaped
the deluge, came forth, as from a prison, upon this
Ararat.
But now, because he hath drank of the fruit of the
vine, behold! he lieth sick and powerless, as the babe
that is newly born. Who knoweth whether he is not
now to die?
And they lifted up their voices and wept.
Then were their hearts comforted: as though some
good angel breathed upon them, Lo! the Patriarch
shall not die. The glory of his reason shall return unto
him, and he will repent himself, and as the bow
enlighteneth
the cloud, so shall his righteousness be renewed.
And it came to pass, that when he awoke from his
trance, he called for his elder sons, and blessed them.
4*
But he uttered a malediction on him, who had mocked
at his father in the hour of his adversity and shame.
Thus knew the Patriarch the evil that dwelt in the
vine, which his own hands had reared. He learned, in
bitterness and scorn, what was taught us from the
beginning
,
of the curse that lay hidden in the cluster which
doth seem so fair.
Moreover, a Holy Book that his eyes had never looked
upon, doth instruct us, saying, Look not upon the wine
when it is red, when it giveth its color in the cup, when
it moveth itself aright; for at the last, it biteth like a
serpent, and stingeth like an adder.
THE VINE.
The
vine hath beauty rare,
We train its tender shoot,
We twine it round the trellis fair,
And praise its fragrant fruit,
Yet there's a secret vein
Of poison near its bower,
And he will find it to his pain
Who tampers with its power.
So, from life's earliest morn,
While we like shadows pass,
Beneath the rose-cup lurks the thorn,
The adder in the grass,
Be ours the lore of Heaven,
Clear mind and cloudless view,
To share the Eden it hath given,
And shun the serpent too.
MOSES IN MIDIAN.
Why
art thou here, amid the streams and flocks,
Oh, foster-son of Egypt! rear'd in all
The luxury of courts? Is there no nerve
Of strong ambition in thy secret soul?
Didst never think, 'twere sweet to be a king?
Or that her love who drew thee from the Nile,
Fill'd with compassion for the babe that wept,
Might to her other bounties add a crown?
But yet thou seem'st content with rural charms,
Nor wears thy brow a trace of wrinkling care
Or rootless expectation. Thy young heart's
Requited love, and the free intercourse
With Nature in her solitude and peace,
Her fringed fountains and heaven-haunted dells,
Give thee full solace.
And when twilight gray
Leadeth thy lambs to fold, or trembling stars
Look from their chambers on the sleeping founts
With tender eye, perchance thy hand doth strike
The solitary lyre, or weave in dyes
Of sable and of gold, his wondrous fate
Who drank so deep of sorrow and of joy,.
The man of Uz.
For Poesy doth dwell
With pastoral musing, and the tuneful lore
Of birds and brooks. And who feeleth that
olian harp within him, hath no need
Of the inspiring wine-cup, or the gong
Of the great, pompous world.
Spake not the voice
Of Midian's gushing waters to thine ear,
Prelusive of the honors and the toils
Awaiting thee? Came there no darkened dream
Of desert wanderings? of a manna-fed
And murmuring host? of thine own burdened heart
Bearing alone, the cumbrance and the strife
Of mutinous spirits, when the wrath of God
Burned fierce among them, and avenging Earth
Opening her mouth, prepared their living tomb?
Oh! linger still, amid the groves and streams,
And to green pastures, fed by gladsome rills,
Lead on with gentle crook thy docile sheep,
While yet thou may'st. With holy Nature make
Close fellowship, and woo the still, small voice
Of inspiration, to thy secret soul,
In lonely thought. So shall it gather strength
To do the bidding of Omnipotence,
And walk on Sinai, face to face, with God.
THE TWO DRAUGHTS.
There's
a draught that causeth sadness,
Though of mirth it seems the friend;
To the brain it mounts in madness,
And in misery hath its end.
To the household hearth it creepeth,
And the fire in winter dies;
There a lonely woman weepeth,
While the famished infant cries.
Bloated form and brow it bringeth,
Limbs that totter to and fro,
And at last, like scorpion, stingeth
To an agony of woe.
Round the victim's feet it weaveth
Snares, that blind his eyes in gloom;
Sin it sows, and shame receiveth,
Frowns of hate, and deeds of doom.
Bitter words of strife it teacheth,
Striketh kind affections dead;
Even beyond the grave it reacheth,
To the judgment bar of dread.
Hath not life enough of sorrow,
Sickness, mourning, and decay,
That we needs must madly borrow
Thorns to strew its shortening way?
There's a draught that heaven distilleth,
Pure as crystal, from the skies;
Freely, whosoever willeth,
May partake it, and be wise.
LOUISA WILSON.
Was I not, that hour,
The lady of his heart?princess of life?
Mistress of feast and favor?Could I touch
A rose with my white hand, but it became
Fairer at once?
And is it not my shame
To have caus'd such woe myself, from all that joy?
Miss Barrett
.
What
! still a prisoner to this odious influenza?
said a bright belle, as she gayly glided into the chamber
of her friend.
Not exactly ill, Julia; but then such a hideous
swollen
face, as you see, makes it quite impossible to appear.
I think my nose has grown large, too; don't you? And
this chill, cheerless November weather, makes it no great
trial to keep house.
Oh! but you might have put on a thick, green veil,
and wrapped yourself up in furs, just to have gone to
church, and seen the wedding of Frederick Wilson and
Louisa.
Is it possible! It is only a few days since I heard
of the return of Frederick Wilson, from Europe. What
a march they have stolen!
Not much of a stolen march, dear Emma. They
have been engaged full three years. Indeed, so long did
he stay on his travels, that many thought the marriage
would never take place at all.
Come now, lay aside your muff, and mantilla, and be
the good Samaritan, and tell me all about it. Yes,
please! What was the possible need of their being in
such a remarkable hurry?
I believe it was understood that the event would take
place immediately after his arrival; and they wished to
be established in their city-home before the winter.
Well, they might at least have given information of
the hour of their nuptials, to some of their old
acquaintance
.
Though, I presume, a little mystery gives a
wonderful
zest to matrimony.
Their plan was to leave for their journey, in the
morning cars; and by appointing the ceremony at an
early hour, they hoped to avoid a dense crowd, and so
kill two birds with one stone.
Expert archers, without a doubt.Did Louisa look
well?
Beautifully, as you know brides always do. She
wore a fair muslin, fine as a thought, and white as the
driven snow. It was fitted perfectly to her graceful
form, and her neck, and delicately rounded arms, were
like alabaster. Her flowing, bridal veil, was confined
above her sunny curls with pure jasmine and the
orange-flower
.
She wore no other ornament.
Why, who would have expected such remarkable
plainness from her? Has she turned Quaker?
No. It was the taste of the bridegroom, who is, I
suppose, a trifle more infallible than ever, from having
visited so many of the European courts.
I should think he would have become so accustomed
to splendor and elegance abroad, as to require it the
more at home.
They say it has rather led him to admire simplicity.
At any rate, Louisa never looked so well in her life with
those downcast eyes, their long fringes resting on her
glowing cheek, and that sweet air of dependence on him,
which is so winning. I understand he has brought her
the most magnificent things; sets of pearl, and diamonds,
and so forth, which will be worn at the parties, in the
high circles where they are to move.
I wonder if the old aunt who brought her up, will
be urged to make her appearance there?
She has been invited to take her residence with them,
but declines. Her age makes a quiet home more
agreeable
.
Perhaps Louisa might be ashamed of aunty's country
manners, among her new, fashionable friends.
Oh, Emma, I can never think her so heartless.
Nor I. But go on with your description of the
wedding, my dear creature. And pray, disencumber
yourself of those immense indian-rubbers, and take the
other velvet rocking-chair. There, now we shall be so
cozy.
Fred Wilson, you know, was always a jewel of a man,
so high-bred, so refined. He is still more polished by
foreign travel, which his wealth gave him every
advantage
of making both improving, and extensive. I never
thought him so handsome as this morning; his intellectual
features were lighted up with such a beaming happiness,
like one who has gained a priceless treasure. Then, he
responded so touchingly, `till death us do part!' It
was both solemn and beautiful. I caught a glimpse of
the group at the church-door, while he was throwing her
cashmere round her, with perfect tenderness, as if he
feared the slightest visiting of the rude air for his
precious
one. Every creature pressed forward, to get a
view of her, as she stepped into her coach, and there was
such a rush that I was glad to escape.
I never thought, for my part, Louisa more beautiful
than several others of our acquaintance, whom I could
name.
Perhaps not. But then she is exceedingly graceful,
and shows, in all she says and does, her accomplished
education. Then, you know, there is something so
fascinating
about a bride, leaving as she does all the sacred
spots of early recollection,the play-places, and
playmates
of her childhood, the hearth-stone, where she was
trained and sheltered as a tender blossom,to make to
herself a new home, to trust in new friends, to endure
new trials, supported only by his love who was once to
her as a stranger, but is now to be more than all the
world besides: there is in this something sublime, yet
sad, even to tears.
Bless me, Julia, you are right eloquent. Did our
good clergyman preach a sermon on the occasion, and
you take notes, for the benefit and behoof of all spinsters?
Was there a crowd at this pathetic ceremony?
Yes, notwithstanding it was at the early hour of
eight. Directly in front of me, were the three tall
Misses Astor, through whose interstices I was obliged to
gather, by skilful dodging, almost all that I saw; for, you
know, to look over their shoulders would be impossible
to any but a son of Anak. They had made their
toilet in a hurry, and could not wholly conceal, under
their smart, new hats, their hair
en papillote
. Here and
there was a heavy sprinkling of ancient maidens, who, I
think, had left breakfast uneaten, and were wanting it.
Even the fat, red-faced tavern-keeper waddled there, and
the lame lady over the way; and scores of boys hung
upon the columns and tops of pews like monkeys, though
the sexton did all in his power to keep them down.
Everybody looked good-natured and animated. Indeed,
it was a scene altogether worth going out for, this raw
morning. I am sorry you should have made choice of
such a time to wear a kerchief.
You are so kind, Julia, to come and amuse me with
your nice descriptions, that I believe I have lost nothing.
Indeed, I may have a clearer idea of the whole than if I
had been there myself; for your perceptive powers are
vastly better developed than mine. I declare, I feel
quite recovered from my inapposite illness, by your
entertaining
talk.
Thus renovated and cheered, the two friends started
upon a little tongue-race, alternately spurring and
outstripping
each other, with exuberant fluency, and girlish
spirits. Louisa passed the usual anatomical process,
which the respective positions of engagement and
matrimony
involve. Minute points were scanned, not from
censoriousness, but from the habit of analysis common
to the tact, and rapid movement of the female mind.
The catalogue of faults was, however, on the present
citation quite moderate; the most prominent one seeming
to be a sort of variation of mood and manner, not
exactly
amounting to caprice, but verging at times towards
the extremes of sprightliness, and taciturnity. Finally,
with the good feeling common to their happy season of
life, they summed up the whole, with a preponderance
of agreeable properties, and a reiteration of their full
sense of her good fortune, in gaining a companion and an
establishment so eligible; and an admission, that in
person
and education she was qualified to be an ornament to
both. This bridal gave similar materials for delineation
and discussion in other circles, throughout the township,
and an acceptable subject for sundry letters, between fair
and young correspondents; after which it gave place to
other bubbles on the wave of life, and fell into the shadow
of things that were.
In the meantime, Frederick Wilson, and his young
wife, had become somewhat domesticated in their new
home. It comprised every element of comfort, with the
embellishments of taste. Its owner found a new impulse
in rendering it worthy of the chosen of his heart, and
was but too happy to hear her praise the mansion and
grounds of which he had made her the mistress, and the
works of art, with which the spacious apartments were
decorated. Nor was she an ungrateful recipient of his
tenderness and liberality; but repaid them with the
fulness
of a susceptible heart, glorying in its first love. He
viewed her as the purest pearl from ocean's deepest
cell, and she turned to him as the flower to the sun,
confiding, and constant. Congeniality of taste heightened
the pleasure of their intercourse;the same book, the
same picture, the same music delighted them, and the
claims of society were met, and discharged, with a
kindred
satisfaction. He was charmed at the admiration
which her courteous manners and brilliant conversation
elicited, and she took pride in a husband, who, to every
manly accomplishment, added the good sense of prizing
more highly his own native land, after that comparison
with others, which is sometimes so perilous to patriotism.
Matrimonial life opened for them with an Eden splendor,
and it was long ere any shadow darkened amid its
bowers.
The first drawback to their felicity, was a species of
nonchalance or indifference,
not on the part of the
husband
,
but the wife
. Expecting a warm participation in
whatever interested him, this change vexed his
sensibility
.
He recalled every minuti of his own deportment,
fearing there might have been involuntary remissness,
and redoubled his assiduity to discover and gratify her
wishes. But these periods of abstractedness or stupor,
which originally occurred at long intervals, grew more
frequent, sometimes alternating with a mirth apparently
as causeless, and equally ungrateful. He became
apprehensive
that her nervous system was unhinged, and
anxiously summoned medical skill to her aid.
These apparent caprices did not impair warmth of
heart, or vivacity of intellect, but were in painful contrast,
as the cloud with the sunbeam. To the earnest inquiries
of her husband, she was accustomed to speak lightly,
as of constitutional headaches, severe, but temporary.
Exceedingly did he dread their recurrence,especially,
when the glance of any other observer was added to his
own; for such was the sensitive nature of his love, that
he shrank at the thought that the slightest reproach
should fall upon its object, and hoarded her praises as
the miser his gold.
Thus passed away the first year, and a portion of the
second of their matrimonial life. Louisa was amiable to
all around, benevolent to the poor, and devoted to the
happiness of her husband, with the exception of the
variations
of manner which have been mentioned. These, he
could not but apprehend, had a different, and deeper
source than the physical indispositions under which they
were sheltered. His penetration was not so far
hoodwinked
as to mistake the fact, that they were in some
measure dependent on volition. His continued fear was,
that the same misgiving might spring up in the mind of
others; and he spread out, as it were, his whole being to
guard her from suspicion, until the effort was agony.
At length, with the frankness which was a part of his
nature, and the tenderness due to a wife, he warned her
of the fault to which he believed her to be addicted, and
set forth its inevitable consequences, with feeling, and
emphasis. Her reply was a reiterated assurance, that
she had used only a stimulating medicine, prescribed by a
physician, for the nervous headaches to which, from early
childhood, she had been subject; and passed into such
emotions of resentment, and passionate grief, that he
almost shuddered at the step he had taken, and fervently
hoped that his suspicions might have been groundless.
In retirement, Louisa's conscience keenly smote her.
She wept, and lay upon the earth. She detested herself
for her duplicity, and determined no longer to wreck the
peace of the husband whom she loved. She resolved to
forsake a habit on which she could not reflect without
abhorrence, and mourned that she had not possessed
sufficient
moral courage to acknowledge it, and implore his
aid in its extirpation.
The eagle eye of the husband detected the change that
ensued with unspeakable gratitude. Louisa was now all
that he could desire. Her fine mind and large heart,
seemed enfranchised from a hateful bondage. Whatever
could be devised for her happiness, was sedulously
obtained
,
and her unspoken wishes studied. He said,
mentally, How can I ever efface from her affectionate
heart the suffering I have inflicted, or reward her for the
struggle she has so successfully endured? and he literally
overwhelmed her with the fulness of his love. She too
exulted in that love, and in being worthy of it. She felt
that she had achieved a victory; and secretly despised
those who, being in like manner enslaved, did not
resolutely
break their chains.But let him that thinketh he
standeth, take heed!
Pleasant would it be to linger on this period of
conjugal
felicity. But the evil habit, of which we have
spoken, is like the strong man armed, and though Love
may wrestle with it, till the break of day, it will scarcely
prevail, unless it take hold of the strength of
Omnipotence
.
Frederick and Louisa both enjoyed refined society,
and were qualified to adorn it. From the earliest date
of their marriage they had discharged its claims, with a
disposition both to receive and impart happiness. In
those fashionable parties which require elaborate dress
and preparation, their position obliged them sometimes
to mingle, and their reception was always flattering. But
5
their principal social delight, was to surround their table
with a few chosen friends, where the flow of soul was
not impeded by the ice of ceremony. These pleasant
gatherings had been gradually laid aside, during the
domination of Louisa's tyrant foe. For though she had
always maintained sufficient caution to appear well on
public, and formal occasions, it was sometimes the reverse
in those visits which involved less restraint. She more
slightly armed herself, where the inspection was more
concentrated and critical.
Sometimes, Frederick had been compelled to meet
their invited guests, with the excuse of her having an
excruciating headache; and though he loathed to lend
his aid to what he deemed deception, and felt like a
divided being, while discharging alone the requisitions of
hospitality, still he considered it a duty to protect the
reputation
of his wife, and was thankful when she did not,
by her presence, overthrow it. Now, that this reign of
terror was over, he indulged with a buoyant heart in his
favorite social entertainments; while his fair, kindred
spirit, presided with her characteristic elegance and grace.
One fine morning in summer, he came in, remarking
that he had met acquaintances from a distant city, to
whom he wished to show attention; and if she had no
other engagement, would invite them to a quiet cup of
tea, with a few of their neighbors and more intimate
friends. She concurred with an affectionate zeal in his
plans, and arranged on the mantel-pieces, with exquisite
taste, a variety of vases, filled with rich flowers from
their garden and conservatory. She busied herself to
see that everything was in order, and proposed, what
she knew would please him, to pour out the tea with her
own hand, at a table in the parlor where they should
assemble. He was partial to this mode, from the principle
of dispensing with ceremony, wherever it was possible,
and also from early recollection, having been accustomed
thus to see his mother entertain her friends; and knew
that on Louisa's part this was a submission to his
preference
,
which he did not fail to appreciate.
Their guests arrived at an early hour, and were
admiring
the paintings and statuary that decorated the lofty
apartments, and inhaling the balmy air through the long
windows, opening upon a colonnade, whose pillars were
clasped by clustering vines, and adorned with blossoming
shrubbery. Frederick hastened to summon Louisa, and
was startled to find her not only in dishabille, but,
with the headache
.
He begged that he might excuse her, and advised, by
all means, that she should remain in her room. But she
was bent on descending, and by a strong effort, in which
she excelled, managed to welcome her visitants, with
tolerable grace. Yet those who were well acquainted
with her, could not fail to detect in her sleepy eyes, and
causeless repetitions in discourse, that she was not
herself
.
The tea-equipage was brought in. And now, the
simple mode of presenting it, which he had accepted as
a favor, was a new source of apprehension. Seating
herself
at the table, behind her splendid service of silver, she
filled the cup nearest to her, and continued pouring,
pouring
,
pouring, until the overflowing tray discharged its
superfluous
beverage upon the rich carpets. The agonized
husband affected not to observe it, and talked with his
friends rapidly, and at random. An elderly lady, a
distant
relative of his mother, quietly approaching, begged
to relieve her of the office, on account of her
indisposition
.
No, no, I thank you. I am fond of pouring out. I
am quite used to it, I assure you.
Frederick, springing to her side, exclaimed,
I hope you will allow Mrs. Carlton to take your
place.
I have myself, said that lady, in a low, soothing
tone, been so troubled with severe nervous headaches
in my youth, as to be nearly blind; and quite too
tremulous
for any effort like this.
But I have no headache now,no,just none at all.
I insist on helping my friends to refreshments, myself.
It is such a great,a very great,great,pleasure,
indeed
.
Frederick led her unwillingly to a sofa, where she half
reclined against one of its pillows. The servant, having
his tray restored to order, through the care of Mrs.
Carlton
,
commenced to serve the company, and was about
passing her, when she siezed his arm with a sudden sweep,
calling out,
Here, bring me a cup. Why do you pass me by?
I'll have you to know, that I'm your mistress.
Then she fell into an immoderate fit of laughter, while
her husband, pale, and in torture, half persuading, and
half compelling, took her to her own room. At his
return he attempted no apology, and the guests, after a
few ineffectual efforts to converse and be at ease, excused
themselves, and departed.
Mrs. Carlton lingered awhile, after all others had gone,
and motioning towards a boudoir, said in a low, gentle
voice,
My dear Mr. Wilson, your mother's blood is in my
veins. I love you, and I love your wife. Can I be of
use to either of you?
Oh, no! at least I do not see how. These terrible
headaches are destroying her nervous system. She has
had them from early youth. I have applied to the best
physicians, but they give no relief.
Have you applied to the Great Physician?
Frederick
Wilson, I admire your conjugal tenderness and
constancy
.
But their utmost ingenuity cannot blind others
to a fault so palpable. I have long been aware of it.
Absolve your noble mind from the penance of this vain
disguise, which the eye of even the commonest servant
can penetrate.
Why do you seek to draw such a confession from
me?
That I may soothe the anguish that is eating away
your existence, and, if possible, help you both.
Pacing the room, with rapid and disordered steps, he
at length paused opposite to her, repeating half
unconsciously
,
Help us! help us! How can that be?
She took his hand in hers, and drawing him to a seat
by her side, said with maternal kindness,
Can you feel willing to confide in me so far as to say
whether you have ever spoken to Louisa of her destructive
habit?
I have.
Freely, and firmly, as a husband should?
Freely, and firmlyoh, yes. And she seemed to
have reformed. It is now a long,long time since aught
of this kind has occurred. I thought she was my own
blessed angel again. Oh, my God!
He covered his face with his hands, but through his
convulsed fingers the oozing tears found their way. The
sympathizing friend waited till the emotion had subsided,
and he exclaimed,
If you can do anything for us, do it, in Heaven's
name!
My dear Frederick, my heart bleeds for you. I am
old, and have seen something of the world. I know how
hard it is for a victim to escape these toils of the tempter.
The warmest affections, the highest talents, the most
indomitable pride, have been set in array against them,
and fallen. Believe me, you are not the person to
manage
this matter. Will you leave it to me?
You have my everlasting gratitude for this heavenly
benevolence. I put myself under your control.
Then I shall require you to obey implicitly. I know
you wish to visit your estates in a distant county. Leave
the house early in the morning, without seeing Louisa.
I will remain with her, and watch over her during your
absence. My lone widowhood will enable me so to arrange
my family, that none will sustain injury. I feel this effort
to save her to be all-important.
But how will you explain the circumstance of my
departure?
I will inform her that you have left on business,
grieved to the heart, by her perseverance in error. If
necessary, I will even suggest that your return may
depend
on her conduct.
My dear Mrs. Carlton, you are too severe. You
will drive her to desperation.
Have you not seen the futility of temporizing
measures
?of
appeals to all the native emotions, and forms of
tenderness? I repeat to you, that I love Louisa, both
for your sake and her own. My feelings have been
strongly drawn out to her, from some personal resemblance
she bears to the last darling daughter, whom Heaven
took from my embrace to its own. I promise you to be
kind, and to apprise you constantly by letter of our
progress
.
Do you trust to me?
I do.
Entirely?
Without reserve. May God forever bless you.
And now, my son, try to snatch a brief rest. May
He, who alone can give success to our endeavors, be with
us both.
The bright morning rose upon the departing husband,
and the faithful friend by the bedside of the inebriate.
Reason returned slowly, and then she was advised by
Mrs. Carlton to remain quiet, as if a sufferer from acute
disease. She took care that proper nourishment was
administered, and towards evening drawing the curtain,
said,
How are you now, dear Louisa? You know you
have been quite ill, and I am here to see to your
comfort
.
Ill! You here!Where is Frederick?
He left home this morning.
Left! My husband gone!Where?
On business, among his distant estates, which you
know he has long wished to transact.
Very singular, indeed. When is he to return?
There is some uncertainty about it. Perhaps the
time may depend somewhat upon you.
What can you mean? leaping from the bed. What
sort of language is this to me? I am sure you were
never deputed by him to treat me in this remarkable
manner.
Dear Louisa, you have many accomplishments, and
virtues. I admire them, and love you. But I am
constrained
to say, that you are under the dominion of a
fearful habit, that wrecks your husband's peace, and your
own reputation. Strive to arouse yourself.
Arouse myself? Indeed!that I will do. And in
the first place, leave me directly; or I will inform my
husband of your intrusion, and strange behavior.
I am here by his permission. What I say to you,
has his sanction.
Either you are false, or I am most wretched.
Pitying her distress, Mrs. Carlton would fain have
drawn her to her bosom.
Let me be your comforter, my poor child. You have
never known a mother's care from your infancy. I will
be your mother. I will aid in restoring you to the
respect of those who love you, and to your own. Confide
in me.
But she repulsed her, exclaiming that her husband had
deserted her, and she would have no other false friend, but
desired to die. Days passed, in which Mrs. Carlton was
resolutely shut from her presence, seeing no shadow of
success to her experiment, and had she not been the
possessor
of singular perseverance, would have despaired.
She remained in the house of the unhappy woman,
regulating
the servants, and laboring invisibly for her welfare.
5*
Notwithstanding her vigilance, in forbidding the access
to her apartment of anything that could intoxicate, it was
evident that she was in possession of some secret hoard
by which she was kept in a state of partial stupefaction.
Finding all appeals to her understanding and affections
alike fruitless, while reason was thus dethroned, and
knowing
her mind to be much under the influence of
imagination
,
she conceived a design of calling that powerful
element to her aid.
The dusk of a summer twilight deepened, as Louisa
reclined
upon her couch, apparently emerging from a long,
dream-like reverie. She alternately dozed and mused,
until the darkness of night gathered. Partially raising
herself to ring for lights, her eye was arrested by a
circular
spot of ineffable brightness on the pannel of the wall
opposite her bed. It burst forth exactly between the
portraits of her father and mother,trembled, expanded,
and became stationary. In its centre appeared a form,
tall, commanding, and wrapped in a long, dark mantle.
Its features were stern, and the glance of its piercing
eyes seemed the reproof of a spirit. Then a long bony
finger was raised, and moved with a warning gesture;
while from lips that seemed immovable came forth slow,
solemn intonations, every one sinking like molten lead
into her soul:
Beware!Beware!
The cup looks fair,
But its dregs are woe, and care:
Ruin,ruin,and despair.
Shuddering she closed her eyes, pressing her hands
tightly over them. When she ventured to withdraw the
screen, the vision had departed. She rested upon her
pillow and trembled.
A strain of dulcet music, strange and wild, floated
along. A gush of perfume filled the room. Again, that
circle of almost ineffable brightness. It overspread the
curtain that shaded the full-length portrait of her mother.
From its centre glided a female form, clad in flowing
robes, with a countenance of radiant and solemn beauty.
For a moment it seemed inclined to hover with a
tremulous
motion; then stood still; and, as if the dead canvas
had awoke to life and sound, uttered slowly, analyzing
every syllable,
Daughter!Repent! and do the first works, or
else
Ere those deep, impressive, unearthly tones had ceased,
she sprang from the couch,but all was darkness. She
stretched out her arms, as the fair being faded,
Oh, mother! Mother, stay! Hear me promise. I do
repent. I will try to do the first works. Blessed mother,
return to your unworthy child.
Her cry of terror brought Mrs. Carlton to her side,
whose neck she eagerly clasped, hiding her face, with
sobs, in her bosom.
Oh, dear, dear friend! I have been warned by
unearthly
beings. A fair,and a fearful form. One was
like the picture of that mother who died before my
remembrance
.
She spoke to me holy words. The other
was so stern! His voice still sounds in my ears
`Woe and care, woe and care,
Ruin,ruin,and despair!'
In these how madly have I plunged. Who will save me?
Oh! that I had some one to love me.
The pitying friend soothed her, promising to be a
mother and a guide. She now passed from the extreme
of aversion to that of childlike, enthusiastic attachment.
Unreserved confidence followedfree confessions, and
emphatic resolutions of amendment.
Alas, dear friend! this fearful habit dates from early
years, when wine was associated with hospitality as an
element of happiness. My loneliness as an orphan,
without
brother or sister, and the secluded habits of the aunt
with whom I resided, made me exceedingly delight in
those few social and festive seasons that varied the
monotony of our life. In these entertainments wine was
always prominent. I heard no odium attached to it, and
tasted and admired. Thus, even in childhood, was laid
the foundation of my shame.
The long three years' absence of the lover whom I
adored were darkened with fears lest he might never
return
,
or at least, with an unchanged heart. In these
periods of depression wine was my comforter. I even
ventured to tamper with the fire of ardent spirits. Then
I first learned its power of excitement and the reaction
that follows. Whether any penetrated my secret, I know
not; but the variation of manner thus caused, my young
companions designated as caprice and a fitful
temperament
.
With this sin on my soul, I dared to enter the holy
bands of wedlock; not without a solemn vow to forsake
it, and innumerable struggles to keep that vow. How
false that vow,how vain those struggles,he best knows
whom most I love. But the shame, the deception, the
misery, the self-loathing, are scanned only by the Eye that
readeth the spirit.
Days were spent in salutary conversations, during
which the venerable lady strove to impress the absolute
need of humility before God, and of trusting in Him for
that guidance and support, without which nothing is
strong, nothing is holy. She commiserated but did not
repress those searchings of heart, without whose
discipline
she felt that reformation might be rootless.
Earnestly
did she labor to impress that fear of the Almighty,
which is the beginning of wisdom.
She spoke of sinners' lost estate,
In Christ renew'd, regenerate,
Of God's most blest decree,
That not a single soul should die,
Which turn'd repentant with the cry,
Be merciful to me.'
This indefatigable friend held daily communications
with the absent and anxious husband, respecting every
stage of their progress, and at length wrote, with a hand
tremulous from joy,
Dear Frederick,
Louisa is worthy of you.Return.
E.
Carlton
.
The wings of the wind seemed to have brought the
summoned one. The meeting is not a subject of
description
.
It can be imagined only by those who know the
full force of the words,
repentant! forgiven!
and
beloved
!
Mrs. Carlton returned to her abode, full of gratitude
for the privilege of this labor of friendship, and for its
blessed results. Ardent attachment, and the most filial
attentions from those whom she had thus been permitted
to serve were a part of her recompense, and brightened
her declining years. Scarcely a day was allowed to pass
without visit or message to the loved neighbor and
benefactress
.
One evening, while a chill storm was raging violently,
Mr. Wilson entered.
My dear friend, I had not expected any one to dare
this dark conflict of the elements for my sake.
Did you suppose we could allow your birthday to
pass without recognition? I assure you, I had hard work
to keep Louisa from accompanying me, notwithstanding
the tempest.
Opening a basket, he produced a cap and collar,
elegantly
wrought by her hand, and a magnificent boquet,
where camellias of the richest hues, and the mystic
passion-flower
with its waving tendrils, and the heliotrope
and tuberose breathing over the dahlias a cloud of
perfume
,
and the crimson spire of the sage, and the white
bosom of the artemisia, were strongly contrasted with
the background of evergreen on which they reposed.
Ah! such beautiful tributes of art and nature should
be for the fair and the flourishing, rather than for those
in the winter of their days. I cannot but wonder how
dear Louisa should thus have kept in mind the date of
my birth.
There is a tablet in both our hearts, running thus:
`Let not the day be writ,
Love will remember it,
Untold, unsaid.'
How much am I indebted to you both, for the
unremitting
kindness that cheers the evening of my days.
Oh, dear Mrs. Carlton, you have no imagination of
the treasure I now possess in her. She is so gentle, so
radiant with intellectual life,so earnest to efface the
memory of the past, so full of all good works, that I can
never adequately speak her praise, or my happiness.
Heaven be praised! She is indeed a lovely, talented
being, and most dear to us both. May her feet ever
stand firm upon the unfailing Rock.
Did you ever perfectly explain to me, the cause of
that sudden transition from aversion to delight in your
society, which occurred during my painful absence?
Perhaps I may need your pardon for the course
pursued
in this particular, though certainly not for the
motive that prompted it. Her antipathy to me was so
great, and the stupor in which she lay so continued, that
I was ready to despair of gaining an opportunity to serve
her. I cast about for the best means that remained to
me, and not without misgiving, made a selection. None
can be much with her, and not perceive that imagination
is a prominent feature in her mind; and as the reasoning
powers were almost constantly dormant, I seemed driven
to make an appeal to that. A little device with the
magic lantern, which, had her intellect been unclouded,
she would have detected in a moment, wrought effects
surpassing my anticipation. It gave access to her
presence
,
from which I had before been excluded, and pitying
Heaven did the rest.
How far do you suppose she is aware of the measure
to which you resorted?
I doubt whether she has more than a dreamy
remembrance
of the scene. Sometimes, I have thought I
would confess the whole to her and implore her
forgiveness
.
But she has never made any allusion to it, and I
have thought it better to fortify her virtue, than to stir
up the dregs of indistinct and harrowing recollection.
Possibly, my conscience has not always been perfectly
satisfied to have thus invoked stratagem; but the case
was a peculiar one, requiring peculiar measures. Forgive
me, if I have erred through excess of zeal to arrest the
wanderer and save the lost.
We can never thank you as we ought, for all you
have done for us.
If I have been the means of any good, thank not
me, but Him from whom all good proceedeth. But the
whole of this life is a warfare, my dear young friend, and
it is never safe to lay aside that fear which drives us to
trust in Omnipotence.
All your counsel is to us most precious.
You are both to me as children; you seem to stand
in the places of those whom our Father has taken from
my house and heart, to whom I hasten. Your beautiful
wife is truly attractive, highly endowed, and full of love
to you; but in this our state of discipline and danger,
possibly she is not armed with that strong heart which
foils temptation by perfect trust in an arm Divine.
Teach her to expect difficult duty, and let it be your care
to gird her up for it by deepening her piety.
I feel the force of all you say, our blessed mother,
so we speak of you to each other. Indulge us in that
sweet appellation.
Pressing his hand between both of hers, she added,
solemnly and affectionately,
None may boast, my son, the seeds of evil habit are
dead, never more to quicken. Yet is there something
almost converting in maternal love, that, watching over a
helpless being, nourishing and guiding an heir of
immortality
,
feels its own infirmity, its own inadequacy to the
great work, and pours itself out in utter abandonment,
seeking refuge where only it can be found,
above
. I
rejoice that at length such hopes are hers,are yours;
may God crown and render them effectual. I have been
led to say more than I intended, for advancing age warns
me that this birthday may be my last. Should it so
prove, let this be my parting charge to our dear one:
to put forth all her energies, to guard every avenue of
danger, to resist every wile of the tempter; yet not to
rely on any earthly helper, but cling ever closely to the
Hand that was pierced.
Little could it then have been supposed, while there
was such a lingering of the health and even the beauty
of early years, around this inestimable friend, that her
parting intimation would so soon be verified. Yet ere
another moon had filled its horn, Frederick Wilson,
himself deeply mourning, was called to console his
weeping wife, who bent over the lifeless form of one
who had been to both as a mother.
She has gone to the angels, he said.
To the angels, husband, in whose joy even on earth
she partook, over the sinner that repenteth.
After the funeral obsequies, it was to them a
mournful
satisfaction to devise and erect a monument, which
should consult both the simplicity of her taste and the
impulse of their gratitude. The green turf where her
form reposed was surrounded by a beautiful inclosure,
and planted with her favorite flowers. At its entrance a
willow swept the ground with its long, drooping wands,
and over the arched gate crept the ivy, and the clematis
with its blue pendulous blossoms. In the centre rose a
plain stone of the purest marble. Its only inscription
was the name, with the simple dates of birth and death;
and beneath, cut deeply into the heart of the stone,
Gone home.
On the reverse, two hands, exquisitely sculptured,
sprang from the marble, sustaining a vase, with the
words
Bring flowers
, enwreathed with acanthus leaves,
while its frequent supply of fresh water and the fairest
flowers, attested the constancy with which the memory
of the dead was cherished.
The loss of the hand that had steadily probed her
follies, and fostered her virtues, was sincerely deplored
by Louisa. Scarcely had the sadness in some measure
passed away, ere she was called to become a mother.
When she saw her husband press long and earnestly the
velvet lip of their first-born, and dividing between it and
herself his tearful, enraptured blessings, she felt more
than repaid for all the apprehension and agony with
which a Being of wisdom hath encompassed the entrance
of that holy relationship.
The ruling desire of Frederick Wilson's heart was
consummated in the first wail of that feeble infant. Not
only had his native love of children led him to repine
that their union for years had been thus unblessed, but
he had secretly depended on the force of maternity to
dispel the only shade that darkened the history of his
wife. Often had he said mentally, while conflicting
with her depraved habit, Were she but a mother!
those cares and joys would be her salvation.
And now the blessing was granted, he was never
weary of watching the tender nursling of their hopes,
regarding every movement of the tiny limbs, and
anticipating
the volitions of a mind that was to live forever.
It gave him pleasure to believe that it would have the
mother's eye of sparkling blue, and to trace the
rudiments
of his own noble forehead amid its imperfectly
developed features. It was interesting to see him so
absorbed by this new affection. He was peculiarly
gratified
that it was a daughter, that its companionship with
the mother might be more entire and its influence more
permanent. He hailed it as the little angel that had
stepped into the troubled pool, to heal the hearts that
waited to be whole. It was his first thought at waking,
his last when he lay down; and it even had part in his
dreams, tinging them with the hue of its own sweet
helplessness
.
The only alloy to his felicity was the physical
weakness of Louisa. Some infirmity of constitution left
her longer languid and a prisoner than was expected.
Both physician and nurse recommended the free use of
tonics, to restore her decaying appetite and strength.
Tonics involving stimulants!
Did they not understand or perceive the baleful fires
they were rekindling? But he who did both understand
and perceive, interposed, though at the eleventh hour.
He forbade all use of what could intoxicate, or its entrance
into his house.
Louisa was astonished at the spirit which he had
manifested
.
She felt it great unkindness to withhold what
she believed she needed, as a restorative to health and
the means of affording nourishment to her babe. She
became silent and resentful, and was unappeased by his
anxious inquiries or affectionate treatment. One evening,
while she supposed him to be absent from home, she
imagined herself to be alarmingly feeble and in danger of
syncope. She therefore directed the nurse to go forth
silently, and purchase some of the prohibited beverage,
while, propped in her easy chair, she lulled the infant on
her bosom.
Poor innocent! she murmured, hard that thou
must pine for thy natural food, and thy sick mother
suffer, because a cruel father denies the medicine that
would restore us.
Ere the return of the nurse, her husband entered.
What met his horror-struck eyes?
His darling child in the fire, and the mother hanging
over the arm of her easy chairasleep!
It seems that after the departure of the nurse she had
drawn nearer the fire, resting her feet upon the fender.
But as the opium-trance deepened, they had slidden from
their support, and the precious burden from her arms.
Fortunately, the wood was nearly consumed, and being
closely wrapped in flannels, its clothes had not ignited.
One fair cheek was scorched by the hearth where it lay,
but a hand and arm which it had thrust forth from its
envelope, came in contact with red coals and decaying
brands, and was burned to a crisp.
The agony of the father, as he caught the child to his
breast, was indescribable.
Woman! See your own work!the fruit of your
accursed, wilful wickedness!
A consultation of surgeons pronounced amputation
above the elbow indispensable to life, and it was done.
The sufferings of the poor babe, and the hazardous illness
that followed, taught the bitterness of remorse to the
wretched mother. Its cries of anguish, and her husband's
stern adjuration, Woman! see your own work! haunted
her perpetually.
It was long ere that child was out of danger, or the
offended husband propitiated. But as health returned
to its pallid brow, he began to look on the wasted form
of his wife with commiseration. His heart was touched
with pity, and alive to tender remembrance; but the
respect that is essential to true love had fled forever.
This she perceived, and no longer desired to live. The
idea that he despised her took possession of her
imagination
,
and poisoned the springs of life. The love that had
for years been the pole-star of her existence had shrouded
itself. She was not content to gather up the scatered
coals from its forsaken altar, and be thankful they were
not wholly extinguished; and quicken them with the
breath of the patient heart, and pour incense upon them
that might have ascended to heaven. No; she could
be satisfied only with its first fervor, and that could
return
no more. She no longer put forth any effort to
resist, scarcely to disguise her infirmity. She desperately
strove to drown her sorrow in the blood of the grape; to
consume it in the fire of distilled liquors; to stagnate it
in the sleep of the poppy. Her husband ceased to oppose
the current of her depraved appetite. This, also, appeared
to her unkindness, for she construed it into indifference.
Maternal love, in her nature, seemed an element of
secondary power. It had fallen on an ill-prepared,
perverted
soil. It had come up like a plant under the
storm-cloud
,
blighted ere it could take deep root. The lisping
word
mother
,that talisman of all tender emotion,
sometimes awoke a thrilling, delicious tear, but that lost
arm was a perpetual reproof, bringing anew the sound
of those terrible words, Woman! see your own work!
Short and sad was the remaining annal of her days.
One morning in the midst of her lofty parlor, she fell,
and rose not. She was borne to her chamber and bed,
where she breathed heavily, but spoke not. Long did
her coach, which she had ordered, stand in waiting at her
gate; for none of those who had hurried in and out,
physicians, neighbors or domestics, remembered to say to
the coachman,
The mistress is dead!
In an inner room, haggard with grief, sat the
disconsolate
husband, his mutilated child upon his knee. At the
deep sound of the funeral bell, he put the little one from
him, that he might kneel for the last time amid the voice
of prayer, by her side whom prayer would no longer
avail, and look for the last time on that bloated,
discolored
face, once so beautiful.
As years passed on it was touching to see that
melancholy
man, in his rich saloon, his spacious garden or his
favorite library, ever holding by her only hand his only
child, ever breathing into her ear precepts of wisdom,
ever pouring, as it were, the whole wealth of a sorrowing,
loving spirit into her tender bosom. From no effort of
duty or work of benevolence did he withdraw himself,
but the brightness of existence was gone forever; and in
his most cheerful moments, he was as one who had seen
the idol of his youth borne away by some black-winged
monster into outer darkness.
SCORN NOT THE ERRING.
Scorn
not the erring,though her name
Should dregs of deep abhorrence stir;
Even though the kindling blush of shame
Burns deep on Virtue's cheek for her.
Judge not,unless thy lip can tell
What wily tempter, fierce and strong,
Did the unguarded soul propel
To ruin's hidden gulf along.
The downward road, how fearful steep!
The upward cliff, how hard to climb!
He
only knows, whose records keep
The nameless, countless grades of crime.
Scorn not the erring,thou whose heart,
In purpose pure is garnered strong:
Claims penitence with thee no part?
Doth pride to mortal man belong?
For by thy follies unforgiven,
Wert thou at death's dread hour accused,
Even thou might at the gate of heaven
In terror knock,and be refused.
6
THE TOMB OF CECILIA METELLA.
AT ROME.
Here sleep'st thou, wife of Crassus?
Thy proud tomb
O'ermastereth Time,mocking with mighty walls,
And Doric frieze, and knots of sculptured flowers,
His ill-dissembled wrath.
Soft, drooping shades,
The dark, columnar cypress, the fair leaves
Of the young olive, and the ivy wreath
Close clustering, lend their tracery to enrich
Thy sepulchre. Yet hast thou left no trace
On History's tablet; and in vain we ask
Yon voiceless stones of thee.
Was hoarded wealth
Thine idol, like thy husband's? Didst thou vaunt
His venal honors, and exalt the power
Of the triumvir,in thy purple robes
Presiding at his feasts,to every lip
Pressing the goblet, even while Rome was sick
With pomp and revel?Or in secret cell,
To thy Penates breath the pagan prayer
In trembling, for his sake?Or last in weeds
Of solitary widowhood, deplore
His breathless bosom pierced by Parthian darts?
There is no record on you massy walls,
Of thy last deeds. Even thy sarcophagus
Is rifled, and the golden urn that locked
Thy mouldering ashes, proved but fitting bribe
For the bold robber.
Thy Patrician dust
How doth it differ from the household slave's,
Who, 'neath thy bidding, at the distaff wrought?
Or doomed to sterner toil, in ponderous vase
Bore the cool Martian waters for thy wine?
How vain to question thus thy gorgeous tomb,
False to its trust!
The thick-ribb'd arch of rock
Lays claim to immortality; but dust,
Man's dust
, must yield each element a part,
To pay Creation's loan. Nor can he cling!
To the brief memory of his shadowy race,
Save through his deeds.
Oh woman!nurse of man!
Make not thy bed beneath the imposing arch,
Or sky-crowned pyramid. Enshrine thyself,
With all thy buried virtues, in the heart
Of him who loves thee. Be thine epitaph
The graces of thine offspring, and the thanks
Of those who mourn.
So shalt thou miss the pomp
Of this world's triumph, and thy noteless grave
Be glorious at the resurrection morn.
THE UPAS TREE.
There
sprang a tree of deadly name,
Its poisonous breath, its baleful dew,
Scorched the green earth, like lava-flame,
And every plant of mercy slew.
From clime to clime its branches spread
Their fearful fruits of sin and woe,
The prince of darkness loved its shade,
And toiled its fiery seed to sow.
Faith poured her prayer at midnight hour,
The hand of zeal at noonday wrought,
And armor of celestial power
The children of the Cross besought.
Behold! the axe its pride shall wound,
Through its cleft boughs the sunbeams shine,
Its blasted blossoms strew the ground,
Give glory to the Arm Divine!
And still Jehovah's aid implore,
From isle to isle, from sea to sea:
From peopled earth's remotest shore,
To root that deadly Upas Tree.
A WALK IN CHILDHOOD.
There was a time, when meadow, grove and stream,
The earth, and every common sight,
To me did seem
Apparelled in a wondrous light,
The glory, and the freshness of a dream!
Wordsworth
.
When
my years were few, I loved to sit under the
shadow of gray rugged rocks, and listen to the falling
waters. I learned to know where the first violets sprang,
and where the lily of the valley hid behind its broad
leaf; and where the forest nuts ripen, when the frost
sparkles upon the earth.
I saw the squirrel putting acorns in his nest for the
winter, and where the bee stores the essence, which
singing
,
she wins from the flowers. I sought to draw forth
the kindness of domestic animals, and to know the names
of the birds that yearly built in my father's trees.
But of my own race, who have the gift of reason, with
dominion over the beasts of the field and the fowls of the
air, I knew little; save of the parents who nurtured me,
and the few children with whom I had sometimes played
on the summer turf.
I said, If the plant that flourishes only a few days
is happy, and the bird that bears to its young a single
broken cherry, and the poor lamb that has no friend but
its mother; how much happier must they be whom God
hath made to rule over them, and who are surrounded
by good things like a flowing river, and who know that
when they seem to die, it is but to live forever.
So I desired to turn away from the herbs of the field,
and look more attentively upon the ways of men. Once,
I was permitted to walk abroad, when the dews of the
morning were fresh upon the grass, and all the things of
nature seemed beautiful, and full of love.
A group of children were in the streets. Methought
they were unwashed, and unfed. They clamored loudly,
with idle tongues. I asked them why they went not to
the schools, where knowledge was gathered. But they
mocked at me, and hasted away.
Two neighbors met each other. They were called
friends; but they spake loud, and angry words. Then
they quarrelled, and I was frightened at the blows they
dealt.
I saw a man with a fiery face. He was tall, and
strongly built, like the oak among the trees. Yet were
his steps unsteady as those of the tottering babe. He
lifted up a hoarse foolish song, like a creature without
understanding. Then he reeled, and fell heavily, as one
dead. I marvelled that no hand was stretched to raise
him up.
Again I walked forth, by the silent valley where the
dead repose. A coffin was let down into an open grave.
8
At its brink stood a widowed woman, with her little
ones. They looked sad, and bowed with trouble; yet,
methought, on their shrivelled brows the marks of famine
were deeper set than the seal of sorrow for the dead.
Then I asked in my wonder, What made the parents
not pity their children when they hungered, nor call
them home when they were in wickedness? What made
the friends forget their first love? and the strong man
fall down senseless? and the young die before his time?
Then a voice answered, Intemperance! And there is
mourning in the land because of this.
So I returned to my home sorrowing. And had God
given me a brother or sister, I would have thrown my
arms around their neck, and entreated, Touch not your
lips to the poison-cup; but let us drink the pure water,
which God hath blessed, all the days of our lives.
I SAW A LITTLE GIRL.
SONG FOR CHILDREN.
I SAW a little girl,
With half uncovered form,
And wondered why she wandered thus
Amid the winter storm.
They said her mother drank of that
Which took her sense away,
And so, she let her children roam
Unheeded, day by day.
I saw them take a man
To prison for his crime,
Where solitude, and punishment,
And toil divide the time.
And as they led him through the gate
Unwillingly along,
They told me 'twas intemperance,
That made him do the wrong.
6*
I saw a woman weep,
As though her heart would break;
They said her husband drank too much
Of what he should not take.
I saw an unfrequented mound,
Where weeds and brambles wave;
On which had fallen no mourning tear,
It was the drunkard's grave.
They said these were not all
The risks the intemperate run,
For there was danger, lest the soul
Be evermore undone.
Since crystal water is so sweet,
And beautiful to see,
And never leads to harm or woe,
It is the drink for me.
THE DEATH OF KING EDMUND.
The
Saxon Edmund, reigned o'er Albion's isle,
Nine centuries since.
Scarce had the ruddy bloom
Of seventeen summers ripened on his cheek,
Ere he was called to try the toils that wait
A ruler of rude men. Though his young heart
At times, remembered with a thrill of pride
His grandsire Alfred,justly styled
the Great
,
Yet was it idly wont to rest its claim
More on ancestral virtues, than its own,
Boastful of buried glory. Still, he earned
From his barbaric dynasty, the name
Of
the Magnificent
, and the fierce crews
Of pirate Danes, vexing the British shores,
Confessed his prowess; while his penal codes
Peopled the gibbets with those robber hordes
Who long had foraged on the rifled wealth
Of weaker neighbors.
Thus, the years flowed on,
Till the seventh winter saw the envied crown
Still on his brow. Once, at a royal feast
Around his board, the warriors, and the thanes
He gathered; while with savage mirth they drain'd,
The mighty goblet, smiting on their shields
In chorus, as the scalds some favorite lay
Uplifted, of old heroes.
Deep, the king
Drank of the flowing mead, and gazing round
In fiery exultation, fixed his eye
Amid the distant dimness of the hall,
Upon a banished outlaw.
Hence! he cried,
Dar'st thou to scorn my sentence, and return?
Hence, from my sight!
But still, the muffled man
Moved not, and scowling 'neath his bushy locks
With careless credence, or defiance cold,
Gave insolent regard.
So, from his seat
The frantic monarch leaping, mad with wine,
Closed with the ruffian, though a dagger flash'd
Like lightning, and the royal bosom felt
The keenness of its point.
One moment, high
Spouted the red heart's blood,the next, there lay
A frowing corse.
Thus, Saxon Edmund fell,
Whom men called king, but Wisdom deems a slave
To appetite and passion. He who boasts
His liberty, yet wears their secret chain,
Doth bow to darker servitude and shame
Than even the serf he scorns.
Giver of grace,
Instruct us with our earliest years to blend
Meekness and temperance, and so 'scape the snare
Of keen remorse, and guilt that hath no hope.
OLD ALCOHOL.
A SONG.
Old
Alcohol's the foe
Of virtue, and of man,
He lays his victims low,
We'll fly him while we can,
And seek the rill
That gushing flows,
The antidote
For all his woes.
Old Alcohol's the friend
Of sin, despair, and death,
Let us his fetters rend,
And shun his burning breath,
And seek the rill
That gushing flows,
The antidote
For all his woes.
THE EMIGRANT BRIDE.
Fare ye well! Fare ye well!
To joy and to hope it sounds as a knell;
Cruel tale it were to tell
How the emigrant sighs farewell!
Tupper
.
Two, rather antique-looking people were conversing
cozily, towards the close of a vernal day. The
bowwindow
where they sate looked out upon lawn and
garden, and was partially shaded by the twining
convolvulus
,
which at dewy morn was redolent of its
deepblue
and crimson bells.
Brother, did you ever think our Susan had some
thoughts she did not reveal?
What kind of thoughts?
Why, has it never crossed your mind, that she might
be in love?
In love?
The child!
What can you be dreaming
about, sister Sibyl?
Child indeed! Eighteen next candlemas, Mr
Mortimer
.
If I am not mistaken, her mother was younger,
when she stood at the altar with our brother. Perhaps
I might say, when she led him there, for he was utterly
bewildered, and blinded by the love of her.
She was truly lovely. But tell me, whose image
your imaginings have coupled with our pretty niece?
Whose image? why, the young spark, Henry Elton,
of course. A fine match, upon my word; he having
nothing, or next to nothing, and of no family, as you
may say. I always thought Susan ought to marry some
nobleman. And so she might, with a proper ambition.
Such sights of money as you have lavished on her
education
too, playing on the spinet and working tent-stich.
Of what great use will such fine things be, when she is
the wife of so very undistinguished a personage? I
think she is ungrateful to you,indeed, to us both.
It is most probable that your fancy outruns all fact.
Still, if your suspicions prove true, I should regret it, not
so much for the reason you have given, as that the young
man has some spice of wildness, and want of
consideration
,
which might affect the happiness of the poor girl.
Shall I speak to her?
Oh mercy, my dear brother! not for the world. You
men are always so hasty. Such matters need the utmost
tact and delicacy. The young heart is an exquisite harp,
which few can play upon, without disordering its strings.
Trust that to me. There she is, coming from her walk,
and that very Henry Elton with her, to be sure! Have
the goodness, brother, to leave the room. No time like
present time, as the proverb says.
A fair girl was seen approaching the house, the rich curls
of auburn hair escaping from under her hat, and shading
neck and shoulder. By her side was a graceful young
man, who bore upon his arm her basket of wild flowers.
A ramble in the green lanes of merry England had given
them new spirits, and their voices, mingled with
occasional
laughter, rang out joyously. Her companion took
leave, and she entered with a light step,
See, aunt, these fresh violets, and this,
Bless me! Miss Mortimer. I suppose it is highly
decorous to walk with your hat untied, and to chatter so
long at the gate with a gentleman.
Amazement seized the young creature, a moment since
so gay.
Miss Mortimer!
This was always an epithet
of great displeasure. What could have happened? The
full, blue eyes, which just before had sparkled like
saphires, dilated, and with lips slightly parted, and foot
advanced, she stood, checked and silent,a song-bird
startled by the thunder.
Do you know that everybody is talking of your
familiarity with that Henry Elton, and of his awful
dissipation
too? Your uncle, and all,
My dear aunt!
Yes! dear aunt, indeed! Your uncle is not quite
blind, nor deaf either. Poor man! he might have had
higher hopes for his favorite brother's daughter. So
liberal too, as he has always been,no expense spared.
It is a burning shame, to show no more regard to his
feelings.
I assure you, aunt!
You need not assure me at all,I'm able to assure
myself. But if you do not see fit to give up Henry
Elton, and mate yourself with some titled person, or one
more fitting for our family, it will not be so well for you,
I can assure you of that. It will not be difficult to find
one who will show more gratitude to us, for lesser favors.
You need not take the trouble to answer me.
The surprise of the listener gave way to a rush of
other feelings. The color deepened in her pure Saxon
complexion, but she replied not; though the compression
of her bright lip, proved that it cost some effort to be
silent. Henceforth a new subject occupied her
meditation
,
and the floating filament and shadow of a preference, became a fixed thought.
Miss Sibyl lost no time in reporting to her brother,
that Susan was deeply in love, and desperately bent on
having her own way.
I could see it in every movement. She is her
mother over again,whom I never could bear. Her
father, too, had a right obstinate temper. Considering
he was only a half-brother, I have sometimes wondered
at your partiality for his daughter. I am sure our own
dear sister would be glad to give us her Euphemia, who
would not make us half the trouble that Susan has.
This matter had been hinted before by the adroit lady,
but her brother's heart still continued to turn to his
orphan protg. Yet having always maintained towards
her a reserved and dignified manner, she was not aware
of his attachment, and native timidity prevented her
approaching
him with freedom. Mutually
misunderstanding
each other, constraint deepened into apparent
coldness
,
and diffidence was mistaken for pride. The blight
of a joyless home fell on the spirit of the young girl, and
she grew careworn, before her time.
Days passed away on leaden feet, and the early flowers
for whose birth she had waited, withered unnoticed in
their turfy beds. At the foot of the pleasant garden of
the Mortimers, was a summer-house. The full moon,
looking through its vines and lattice-work, saw it not
untenanted. Two persons were discoverable, with heads
declined, as if in conversation more profound than the
gayety of youth would prompt. Suddenly, one starts
into action, genuflection, gesture, such as excited feeling,
or eloquence inspire. It might be seen that he has an
auditor absorbed, and not unmoved.
The pantomime, though protracted, has a close. Of
its scope and result, somewhat may be gathered by the
bearing of the parties, as they issue from the bower.
Moving slowly through the long lines of shrubbery, the
manner of one is earnest, tender, and tinctured with the
power of prevalence. The other leans heavily on his
arm, her fair brow inclining towards his; and as they
reach the porch where they are to separate, her clear,
lustrous eye gazes steadfastly into his, as if to gather one
more assurance, that the image of her own love is fully
reflected there.
A ship rides at anchor on an English coast. The night
is rayless, and winds moan with a hollow sound. The
midnight watch is called; but the captain still lingers on
deck, as if engaged in some preparation for his expected
departure at early morn.
The tramp of flying steeds is heard on the shore. Then
the dash of an oar,a boat has put forth into the thick
darkness. Soon a group, muffled in cloaks, ascend the
deck of the vessel. One seems exhausted, and is
supported
by a stronger arm. Then, by the dull red light
of the binnacle, a cavalier stands forth with uncovered
head, and by his side a vision of beauty. The melody of the
marriage service trembles strangely upon that bleak,
midnight
air. Hands are joined,
Till death us do part
.
What a place,timid and tender creature! for vows
like these,the rough ship, and the tossing sea. None
of thy kindred blood near to bless thee, or soothe the
pulsations of thy fluttering heart!
Safe from all persecution!Mine own forever!
Well-timed words, young bridegroom. They bring a
faint rose-leaf tinge over cheek and brow, so deadly pale.
The benediction of the priest fell, like oil upon the
troubled waters; and throwing himself, with his
attendants
,
into the waiting boat, he rapidly regained the
shore.
The next morning beheld the ship, and her
companions
,
with unfurled sails leave the harbor of Plymouth.
Cloud and blast had passed away with night, but were
replaced by a dense fog. So they still hovered, like
half-wakened sea-birds, lazily along the coast.
At midday, a barge was seen approaching. With a
buoyant movement it skimmed the waves, now rising
half upright upon some crested billow, and anon, sinking
gracefully into the intermediate vale of waters.
Among the many who watched its progress, none
testified such overwhelming anxiety as Henry Elton, and
his bride. Apprehension that they might be the objects
of pursuit, raised a tide of tumultuous emotion. The
young man walked apart with the captain, vehemently
demanding that the ship should hold on her course.
And when he again seated himself by her side, whose
azure eye followed his every movement,an unsheathed
weapon was observed to glitter beneath his mantle.
A cavalier closely muffled, with a single servant, leaped
on board. Requesting a private interview with the
captain, they descended together to the cabin. Henry
Elton, passing one arm firmly around his bride, whispered
in her ear,
Till death us do part!
while a sword
gleamed in his right hand. How endless seemed that
interval of suspense.
At length ascending footsteps were heard, with a
suppressed murmur of Sir Walter Raleigh! The eye
of every gazer testified pleasure, as it rested on the noble
form of the most accomplished knight of his times. His
Spanish cloak, thrown over one arm, discovered that
magnificence of costume in which he delighted, and
which his elegance of person so well became. To all
who surrounded him, he addressed some kind or courtly
phrase, with his habitual tact and fluency. Fixing his
eagle eye on the bride, he drew her towards him, and
said,
And thou too, here, pretty Dove? I knew thy
father well, in the Low Countries. A brave man was
he and a noble. Heaven help thee to build thy nest in
you far flowery groves, where I would fain myself be.
Pressing a paternal kiss on her pure forehead, and
once more heartily shaking the hand of the commander,
he said,
My good people, that you will show all due respect
and obedience to so excellent a seaman as Captain White,
I make no doubt. But more than this,I present him
to you as the future Governor of the colony which, God
willing, you are to plant in the new Western World.
Then placing in his hand a sealed paper, containing
instructions for the new government, and the names
of the twelve assistants by whose aid it was to be
administered
,he
bade all a courteous farewell, with good
wishes, and a golden lot.
Loud and long was the voice of cheer and gratulation,
as he departed. Bowing his thanks, and then standing
erect in the tossing boat, he waved his hat with its fair
white plumes. Far in the distance they saw it dancing
amid the sea-foam, and conversed enthusiastically of the
man, who yet scarcely thirty-five, had already become
illustrious in arts and arms,a scholar, courtier, poet and
statesman, liberal as a patron of literature, and the very
soul of all enterprise for the settlement of the new-found
continent of America. As they watched him, until his
barge was a speck on the far waters, no prescience
revealed
the darkening of his fortunes:the conspiracy of
his foes, a tyrant king, the prison, and the scaffold.
Three small ships, long beaten by the Atlantic surge,
approached the shores of that region which, less than a
century before, the world-finder had unveiled. The
conflict
of months with blast and billow had not left them
unscathed, and they moved heavily, like the flagging
seagull
,
towards the desired haven.
It was the summer of 1587, when Virginia, in her
gorgeous robes, gleamed out to the worn voyagers like
the isles of the blessed. Her flowering trees and shrubs,
sent a welcome on the wings of odors, ere the embroidered
turf kissed their feet.
Vines, loaded with clusters, enriched field and grove;
here forming dense canopies and bowers of shade, and
there springing loftily from tree-top to tree-top, with
bold festoons and flowing drapery. Deer glanced through
the forest, and birds of gay plumage filled the balmy air
with music.
The strangers sought out the spot, near the bright waters
of the Roanoake, where, two years before, Sir Richard
Grenville had planted a colony of frail root, whose
remnant
had been borne back by Sir Francis Drake, to its
native soil.
These guests of the hospitality of the broad, green
West, were full of exultation, and zealous to construct
places of shelter and repose. None more ardently
rejoiced
,
when a little dwelling was ready, which they
might call their own, than Henry Elton and his bride.
Its rudeness, its narrow limits were nought to them, so
entirely happy were they to possess a home amid the
charms of nature and the solitude of love. Here was
their most romantic wish fulfilled,a lodge in the green
wood, and a beautiful world to themselves.
Alas for Susan, when a change stole over her dream!
Enthusiastic, and turning, like the flower of the sun, to
one alone, she had not taken into view that the cloud
and the frost must have their season. At first, she
wondered
that Henry could so often leave her, and so long
be gone; or that, at his return, he omitted the tender
words she had been accustomed to her. But the smile
was ever radiant on her brow when he appeared; and
during his absence, she found solace in household toils,
putting her slender, snowy hands, with strange facility,
to the humblest deeds that might render a poor abode
comfortable, or vary his repast who was ever first in her
thoughts. While thus employed, her voice rang out
sweetly from the catalpas that embowered her dwelling,
so that it would seem that the birds and herself were at a
loving strife. But the tuneful emulation ceased, and her
song rose sad and seldom,and then was heard no more.
A deeper shadow had fallen upon her lot.
Captiousness
was added to indifference, by him for whom she had
literally given up all beside. A fearful conviction, which
she strongly resisted, forced itself upon her, of his
frequent
intemperance. Careless of the duties of a
protector
,
he would sometimes be away whole nights; while
at his return, she was doomed to witness the disgusting
gradations from stupidity to brutality.
Compunction, indeed, occasionally seized him; and at
his reviving kindness, her young hope comforted her that
all would yet be well, and her woman's love forgot that
it had ever wept. The adversities of the colony proved
also a temporary remedy. Poverty, and a scarcity of the
means of subsistence, checked the power of revelry, and
drove the inebriate to abstinence. Some fear of savage
warfare drew the little band more firmly together, for
consultation and safety. The fierce Wingina, with his
followers, were observed prowling around the settlement.
There was then no Powhatan to succor the strangers,
no Pocahontas to save the victim, at the jeopardy of her
own life.
In the meantime, she who had staked her all on love,
and lost, was tenacious of its fragments. Every pleasant
look or gentle word, though few and far between, was
treasured as an equivalent for many sorrows. She was
learning, day by day, the lesson that human love may
7
never lay aside the element of forbearance. It was
touching to see so young and fair a creature, so
mournful
,
and yet so calm.
One evening, she had waited long for her husband,
but he came not. This was but too common, since he
had become the slave of intemperance. A step was
heard. Can that be his?so stealthy? The slight
fastening of the door was burst in. Dark faces peered
wild forms glimmered. The stroke of a hatchet, and the
red flame bursting from the low roof-tree, were the work
of a moment;and from the girdle of the tallest warrior,
when he strode from the spoil, hung a scalp, with a
dripping, auburn tress.
That night, the wail of a wretched man was heard
over the ashesand the dead. Daybreak beheld him,
with others, armed, and going forth in quest of vengeance.
The fires of wrath fell on many a quiet wigwam, and
innocent
women and babes perished for the crime of their
chieftain. Such is the justice of the war-spirit; blind,
bloody, and ferocious.
Three years notched their seasons on the trees, and
threw their shadows over the earth, ere England stretched
forth her hand to that far, forsaken colony. Then, three
storm-driven vessels, as the dog-star commenced his
reign, were seen contending with the terrible breakers of
Cape Hatteras. Outriding both surge and tempest, at
length, with strained cordage and riven sails, they neared
the shore.
They fired signal-guns, and anxiously listened,but
there was no sound. They pressed on towards Roanoke,
Governor White, who had been absent on an agency to
England, taking the lead. Where was his sweet daughter
Ellinor, whom he had left in her green-wood home,
singing
the lullaby to her young babe, Virginia, the first born
of English parents in the new Western World? As he
drew near the spot, he kept his eye fixed, with
agonizing
earnestness, on a copse of lofty pines that had
encircled
her habitation. Smoke reared its curling volume
among them, and his heart leaped up.It was the
smouldering council-fire of the Indians.
Not a home of civilized man was there,not a form
or face of kindred or of friend. They call. There is no
answer but echo, murmuring from rock and ravine.
Names and initials are still cut deeply on the trees.
But where are the hands that traced them? All is
silence,save the steps of those who search, and the sighs
of those who mourn.
By the shore there was no boat,over some broken
oars, grass and weeds had crept. Ruins of former abodes
were here and there visible:portions of household
utensils, and implements of agriculture, scattered along
the sands and corroded with moisture. Mingled with
them were fragments of chests, torn charts, and mutilated
books.
Among the latter was a thrilling relic. A Bible, with
the name of Susan Mortimer Elton, covered with
sanguine spots. Ah! were those fair eyes resting upon
that blessed book, when the destroyer came? Was she
there gathering strength for her thorn-clad journey, when
that journey was about to close? Sacred pages! did
she learn from you, that earthly love without divine, is
unsafe for the heirs of immortality? When her heart's
idol was broken, did she hearken to your whisper, Come,
weary, heavy-laden, and I will give thee rest?
Blood-stained Bible, from Virginian sands! we thank
thee for thine enduring friendship,for thy last holy
offices to the Emigrant Bride.
TO COLLEGE STUDENTS,
Who had pledged themselves to abstain from
Intoxicating
Liquors.
Conscripts
in Virtue's holy war,
Who, at your country's call,
Thus gird the diamond cuirass on
Within your classic hall,
Be valiant for your native clime,
Till all that Circean train
Whose cup transforms unwary souls,
Are, with their leader, slain.
So, when the pride and pomp of earth
From life's short dream shall cleave,
And each uncurtained deed and thought
Its due reward receive,
A nobler victory shall be yours,
If faithful to the last,
Than theirs, who wake the clarion cry
Of battle's fearful blast.
Yes; they whose youth hath vanquished sin,
Through a Redeemer's name,
Shall find their record in a Book
That bides the Doomsday flame.
WOMAN'S MISSION.
Written on hearing a young Lady praise Home and its duties.
How sweet to hear those lips of rose
The cause of humble virtue pleading;
While Wit his dazzling weapon shows,
Advancing near, and now receding.
How sweet to see that sparkling eye
The bosom's sacred warmth confessing,
Where sleep those germs of sympathy
Whose fragrance heightens every blessing.
How sweet to know that gentle heart,
So skill'd to soothe the hour of sadness,
Will draw of pain the envemon'd dart,
And bid life's current flow with gladness.
Home is man's Ark, when trouble springs,
When gathering clouds meance his morrow;
And woman's love, the bird that brings
His olive-leaf, o'er floods of sorrow.
HYMN.
We
praise Thee, if one rescued soul,
Too long the slave of guilt and pain,
Hath shuddering left the poisonous bowl,
For health and liberty again.
We praise Thee, if one clouded home,
Where broken hearts despairing pin'd,
Behold the sire, and husband come
Erect, and in his perfect mind:
No more a hapless wife to mock,
Till all her hopes in anguish end,
No more the trembling babe to shock,
And sink the father in the fiend.
Still give us grace, Almighty King,
Unswerving at our post to stand,
Till grateful to thy shrine we bring
The tribute of a ransomed land,
Which, from the pestilential chain
Of foul Intemperance gladly free,
Shall spread its annal free from stain
To all the nations, and to Thee.
INTEMPERANCE AT SEA.
Again, unto the wreck they came,
Where like one dead, I lay,
And a ship-boy small had strength enough
To carry me away.
Howitt
.
The
evils of intemperance at sea, it is impossible for
any pen adequately to describe. The oaths, the quarrels,
the debasing vices that it occasions among sailors, may
in some measure be imagined by what is seen on land.
But the narrow limits to which they are confined, allow
no opportunity of concealment, and more immediately
extinguish all moral sensibility. There are no dark lanes,
in which to sleep off their debauch,no home to which
they may stagger, and in the misery inflicted on wife and
children, hide awhile their sin from the public eye. All
is open and shameless.
But the sufferings inflicted on passengers by the
intemperance
of those to whom they have intrusted their
property and lives,the wrecks that have ensued by a
helm badly steered, or wrong orders from those who have
tarried over the bowl until the storm was highthe
multitudes
thus torn from sorrowing friends, and buried in
watery graves, can never be known or told, till the seas
give up their dead.
7*
It was early during the war that severed the United
States from Great Britain, that an armed vessel sailed
out of Boston. The day before Christmas was the time
fixed for her departure; and though some hearts were
sad at not being able to keep that sacred festival with
loved ones, seated around the pleasant household board,
yet it was a proud sight, when she spread her white sails
to the morning sun, and steered from the harbor of
Plymouth. She was not large, but strongly built, and
balanced herself beautifully amid the waves, like a bird
cutting the air. She carried twenty guns, and a crew of
more than one hundred, with provisions for a cruise of
six months.
There were moistened eyes, and a waving of
handkerchiefs
from the shore, as she weighed anchor and
departed
.
For she bore as goodly a company of bold and
skilful seamen, as ever braved the perils of the deep.
While she hovered round the coast, the skies became
troubled, and the north wind blowing heavily, brought a
rough sea into the bay. Night came on with thick
darkness
.
The strong gale that buffeted them became a blast.
and the blast a hurricane.
Snow drifted through the clouds, and the cold grew
exceedingly severe. The vessel was tossed by the
merciless
waves, until she struck a reef of rocks. Beginning
to fill with water, they hasted to cut away her masts.
But the sea rose above the main deck, and the wild
surges swept over it.
Every exertion was made that courage could prompt,
or hardihood sustain; but so fearful were the winds,
and so piercing the cold, that the stoutest men were
unable to labor, exposed to their influence but a short
time without being relieved by others. When they
found all their efforts to save the vessel hopeless, they
thronged together upon the quarter-deck,not to bewail
their hapless condition, neither to entreat mercy of God,
like men on the verge of eternity. Unfortunately,
they had got access to the stores of ardent spirits, and
many of them were, even then, in a state of
intoxication
.
Insubordination and mutiny ensued. The officers
remained clear-minded, but lost all authority over the
sailors, who raved around them like madmen. The
darkened
sky, the raging storm, the waves breaking against
the rocks, and threatening to ingulf the broken vessel,
and the half-frozen beings who maintained a feeble hold
on life, breathing imprecations instead of prayers, formed
a scene truly frightful.
Some of the inebriated wretches lay in disgusting
stupidity,others, with fiery faces, blasphemed their
Maker. Some, wild with delirium, fancied themselves in
palaces, surrounded by luxury, and abused the imaginary
servants, who refused to do their bidding. Others, amid
the beating of that pitiless tempest, believed themselves
to be in the homes which they were never more to see,
and with hoarse reproachful voices, asked for bread, and
wondered why the refreshing water-draught was
withheld
from them, by those who were most dear.
A few, whose worst passions alcohol had inflamed to
fiend-like fury, assaulted all who came in their way,
raising
their shouts of defiance above the roar of the tempest.
While intemperance was displaying itself in the most
revolting
attitudes, Death began his work. Every hour,
some miserable creature fell dead upon the deck, frozen
stiff and hard, in the extreme wintry cold. Each corpse,
as it became breathless, was dragged to the heap of dead,
that there might be more room for the living. Those who
had drank most freely, were the first to perish.
On the third day of these horrors, some boats that had
boldly ventured from the harbor of Plymouth, reached
the wreck, amid many dangers from breakers and the
storm. The hardy mariners were horror-struck at the
scene that presented itself. Corpses, stiffened into every
form that suffering could devise, were strewed around.
Some were piled in a mass together, like the frozen
soldiers
,
on the retreat from Moscow. Others sate with
heads bent to their knees; others, in their dead hands;
grasped the ice-covered ropes, or the empty spirit-cup,
while some, in a posture of defiance, or defence, glared
like the sculptured gladiator.
Every sign of life was earnestly sought for. One boy
was about to be thrown among the mass of dead, when it
was discovered that one of his eyelids faintly trembled,
and he was saved. The survivors were borne to the
shore, and the strangers kindly sheltered and nursed by
the inhabitants, until they could be removed to their own
homes. It was found that only a small band, besides the
officers of the vessel, had abstained from ardent spirits.
These survived the hardships of the storm and the wreck,
though some of them were in a state of exhaustion.
The angel of Temperance, like the Prophet with his
censer, literally stood between the living and the dead,
so that the plague was stayed. Some, who had been less
deeply intoxicated, were borne to the land alive, but died
in a short time. Others, after long sickness, were
restored
,
but with impaired strength, or mutilated frames.
When the tempest subsided, the boats again approached
the wreck, to remove the dead. What a solemn sight,
as under a clear, wintry sky, they slowly bore over the
heaving waters, the bodies of those who had so recently
parted from their friends, in health and exulting hope!
Their funeral obsequies were mournful beyond
description
.
Nearly one hundred bodies were placed in the
little church, fixing their stony immovable eyes upon the
beholder, their features hardened into horrible expressions
of the last mortal agony. The aged Pastor fainted at
the sight of this terrible congregation. He soon recovered
himself, but his voice was mournful and tremulous, as he
performed the last sacred services of religion.
The bodies not claimed by friends for separate graves,
were interred in a large pit on the south-east side of the
burial ground. And after that generation had faded
away, the spot was still pointed out to strangers, where
the perished crew of that lost vessel await the
resurrection
.
Near by, in a humble abode, might have been seen a
pale-faced widow, with her young daughter, sedulously
attending the couch of a sufferer. The boy lay there,
whose trembling eyelid had saved him on the wreck,
among the dead.
Mother! it was you who taught me to avoid
whatever
would intoxicate. Your lessons have saved my life.
When my poor comrades became drunk around me, it
was as much as I could do to protect myself from them.
Some dared me to fight, and struck me. Others held
strong liquors to my lips, and bade me drink. My throat
was burning, and my tongue parched with thirst. But I
knew if I drank, I must lose my reason like them, and
blaspheme Him who made me.
One by one they fell down, those reeling and maddened
people. Even now, their shouts and groans ring in my
ears. It was in vain that our officers, and a few good
men among us, warned them of the fate that would befall
them, and tried to establish order. They persisted in
swallowing draught after draught, until they grew
delirious
,
and died in heaps.
Our sufferings from hunger and cold, were dreadful.
After my feet were frozen, but before I lost the use of
my hands, I saw a box under water, among fragments of
the wreck. I tried with a rope to bring it up, hoping
that it might contain bread. But my weakened arms
failed, and a comrade helped me. After long toil, it came
within our reach, and we succeeded in bursting it open.
Alas! there was no bread there, only a few bottles of
olive-oil. Yet for these, in our famished condition we
were thankful. Now and then we moistened our lips
with a few drops of the oil; and even found, that to
swallow a small quantity, allayed the severe gnawing
pains of hunger.
But soon my comrade died, and I lay beside him,
benumbed and helpless. Then the roar of the tempest
lulled, and I heard strange voices as if in a dream, and
the hurrying feet of those blessed people, who had dared
every danger to rescue us. They carefully wrapped in
blankets all who were able to speak, or whose slightest
motion betrayed life. Almost every drunkard was among
the dead.
And I was so exhausted with labor, and cold, and
want of food, that I was not able to utter a word,
or stretch a finger to my deliverers. Again and again,
they passed me, where I lay among the dead. Again
and again, they bore the living away to their boats. A
terrible dread took possession of me, lest I should be
left behind. I strained every nerve and muscle to speak,
but could utter no sound. The effort almost stifled my
feeble breath. I strove to lift my hand. All power over
the muscles had forsaken me. It was like some awful
vision.
Then I prayed agonizingly in my heart: `For the
sake of my poor mother and sister, Oh Lord, save me!'
Methought the last man had gone, for I heard no longer
any footsteps. Then I said, `Lord Jesus, receive my
spirit!'
Ah! was there not something like a warm breath on
my cheek? Was not the hand of a human being laid
upon mine? My whole soul strove and shuddered within
me; but my body was immovable as marble. A voice
said, `I think this poor lad lives;one of his eyelids
trembles.' Oh, the music of those words! It was not the
trembling eyelid, but your lessons of temperance, dear
mother, and the prayer to God, that saved me.
Then the loving sister ran with tears to embrace him,
and the widowed mother, bowing her head, said,
I thank thee, Merciful Father, who hath spared my
son, to be the comfort of my age.
DANGERS OF SEAMEN.
They
roam where danger dwells,
Where blasts impetuous sweep,
Where sleep the dead in watery cells,
Beneath the faithless deep,
Where tempests threaten loud
To whelm the shipwrecked form:
Show them a sky that hath no cloud,
A port above the storm.
Beyond the Sabbath bell,
Beyond the house of prayer,
Where deafening surges madly swell,
Their trackless course they dare:
Give them the Book Divine,
That full and perfect chart;
That beacon 'mid the foaming brine,
That pilot of the heart.
Where sin with aspect bold,
And fierce temptations urge,
Their wild and unwarn'd course they hold,
Rude as the reckless surge:
Send forth the Gospel's power!
That pole-star o'er the sea;
That when life's storms no longer lower,
Heaven may their haven be.
THE STORM.
'
Twas
a wild night.
November's storm was out
Upon the murky hills, and at its stroke
The naked forest groaned.
'Twas a wild night
Yet mid the conflict of the howling winds,
The mother's quick ear caught another sound,
Faint though it was,for when was love, like hers,
Deaf to its wailing child!
With flying steps
She sought a distant chamber. There her son,
Roused by the thunder of the elements
From his sweet dream, inquir'd, with pallid cheek,
O'er which his shining curls dishevell'd swept,
The meaning of such tumult.
So she placed
Her lamp upon the table, and sate down
Beside his little bed.
That sound you hear,
Like a hoarse roaring, is the swollen brook
Beating against the stones. For sudden rains
Have raised it brimming to its slender bridge,
And had the violets that you love so well
Not hidden from the frost, they'd all been drown'd
With their young baby buds.
And then that knock
Against the rattling casement, that is sure
The stiff old cedar, frightened at the storm,
Who spreads his green hands o'er the window panes,
As if to ask for help. Those whistling tones,
Half cry, half tune,are from some wandering blast
That sweeps our chimney, and its funnel tall
Maketh an organ pipe.
Oh, mother dear!
Waking so suddenly, I scarce could think
What this great uproar meant. But well I know
God rules the storm.
Thou dost remember right
Thy Sunday lesson, and apply it well.
But here, while in thy nicely-curtained crib
With downy pillows thou art nestled warm,
Like a young birdling, still bethink thee, boy,
Of the poor traveller 'neath the chilling rain;
And of the sailor on the slippery mast,
And of the wrecking ship amid the waves;
And thank our Bounteous Father in your prayer.
Mother, I heard the story of a man,
One, who was cruel to his helpless child,
And drove his wife out in the wintry cold,
They said it was the
wine and
SPIRIT STORM
Made him so bad.
Mother, what storm was that?
The storm that may be kindled in ourselves,
My little son, by strong and evil drinks;
Which wake a wilder tempest in the breast
Than that which troubleth nature.
Then the son
Respecteth not his parents,nor the wife
Loveth her little ones. And men forget
The fear of God, and do such deeds as tears
Can never wash away.
The glorious sun
Will shine again as bright as if the storm
Had never been, and thou, perchance, may'st see
The arch of radiant colors throw its tint
Upon the passing cloud. But that dark storm
Of fearful passions, hath no blessed bow
Of promise for the soul.
I will not be
So wicked, mother, as to drink what makes
Such tempests in the bosom.Mother, dear!
I never will.
And then he pressed his lip,
Sobbing with earnestness, upon her cheek,
While tenderly she said,
Keep thou this pledge,
Oh true, and tender heart!
And when the days
Of manhood come, and thou art tempted sore,
Still gird thy promise to a faithful breast,
And hold thy footing firm.
So shalt thou bless,
Even in such dialect as angels use,
Thy mother's visit, and this midnight storm.
THE SAILOR'S APPEAL.
Ho! dwellers on the stable land,
Of danger what know ye,
Like us who brave the whelming surge,
Or trust the treacherous sea?
The fair trees shade you from the sun,
You see the harvests grow,
And breathe the fragrance of the breeze
When the first roses blow.
You slumber on your beds of down,
Close wrapped, in chambers warm,
Lulled only to a deeper dream
By the descending storm:
While high amid the slippery shroud,
We make our midnight path,
And e'en the strongest mast is bowed
Beneath the tempest's wrath.
Yet still, what know ye of the joy
That lights our ocean strife,
When on its way our gallant ship
Rides like a thing of life?
When gayly toward the wished-for port
With favoring wind we stand,
Or first your misty line descry,
Hills of our native land!
Know ye what danger waits our souls,
When, in that narrow bound,
The fiend Intemperance fiercely breathes
His fiery breath around?
No angel-comforters are near,
Our tempted hearts to stay,
No blessed charities of home
To check our downward way.
There's deadly peril in our path
Beyond the wrecking blast,
A peril that may reach the soul
When life's short voyage is past.
Send us your Bibles when we go
To dare the whelming wave,
Your men of peace, to teach us how
To meet a watery grave.
And Saviour! thou whose foot sublime
The foaming surge did tread,
Whose hand, the rash disciple drew
From darkness and the dead,
Oh! be our Ark when floods descend,
When thunders shake the spheres,
Our Ararat when tempests end,
And the green earth appears.
8
THE HARWOODS.
'Tis she alone, with her constant heart,
Can see all the idols of hope depart,
Yet still live on.and smile, and bless
Man in his utmost wretchedness.
Procter
.
The
flood of emigration which beats against the shores
of the United States, seems to have no ebb-tide. From
the ices of the Baltic,from the dense forests of
Germany
,from
the weeping Isle of the shamrock, exhalations
gather, hurrying drops aggregate, streamlets mingle, and
press onward with a rushing sound. The young West,
like some broad sea, receives them, taking no more note
of each than Ocean of its tribute-waters.
Here and there, in the streets of our cities, the tall,
tasseled cap of the Pole, the rainbow plaid of the
High-lander
,
or the thin smoke curling from the Bavarian
pipe, gleam for a moment, to be dispersed in measureless
distance, or merged in one common mass. The accents
of a strange language may indeed continue to murmur
through a generation or two, but dialects, like the
lineaments
of national character, blend, fade, and are
forgotten
.
Amid this ceaseless influx of foreign material, is also
an under-current of domestic emigration;a change, a
fluctuation, a fluttering of the integral parts. This
elemental
movement and strife, tends ever towards the
setting
sun. Yet the West recedes from its followers, like
the horizon from the pursuing child. Time was, and
that within the memory of the living, when to us, the
dwellers in New England, the untrodden wilds of Ohio
were counted as the extreme West. Now, the stately
cities that glitter there, fall short of the central point of
the empire.
Where, then, is the West? On the banks of the father
of waters?along the pictured rocks of the mighty lake?
at Illinois?at Iowa?at Wisconsin?Scarcely!
The searchers for the West, like the gold seekers among
the settlers of Virginia, still analyze yellow earth for the
invisible and ideal good;pausing only amid the arid
sands of Oregon, or on the sounding shores of the
Pacific.
New England, the fountain of these internal supplies,
still vigorously sustains this drain upon her vitality. The
farmer who has many sons,if the homestead be too
narrow, confidently points out to them a place at the
West. Thither speed the self-denying missionary, with
his Bible, and the persevering teacher with his text-book,
laboring to make the wilderness blossom as the rose.
Perhaps, thither also may turn the briefless lawyer, to
pour his philippics from the stump, and carry the votes
of a whole country by his eloquence. The broken
merchant
there plants himself, changing his ledger for an
axe, and making the trees groan, instead of his creditors.
Every over-stocked profession finds there a safety-valve.
Those who are discontented, and in debt, make to
themselves a captain, and go forth to a more attractive
abode than the cave of Adullam. Lost wealth takes
heart and looks up, where are none richer than itself;
wasted health fattens and grows strong, with the wild
venison
,
and the toil that takes it. The strong passion of
wandering becomes satiated and tame, amidst the
boundless
prairies; and forfeited reputation, and even flying
guilt, fear no reproach amid Texan vales.
From the trains of baggage wagons peep forth the
faces of young children; and on the canal-boat the
careful
matron, while her babe sleeps, plies the
knitting-needles
,
ever steering in the wake of the westering
sunbeam
.
Not many years since, where the lofty forests of
Ohio, towering in unshorn majesty, cast a solemn shadow
over the deep verdure of beautiful and ample vales, a
small family of emigrants were seen pursuing their
solitary
way. They travelled on foot, but not with the
aspect of mendicants, though care and suffering were
visibly depicted on their countenances. The man walked
first, apparently in no kind or compromising mood. The
woman carried in her arms an infant, and aided the
progress of a feeble boy, who seemed sinking with
exhaustion
.
An eye accustomed to scan the never-resting
tide of emigration, might discern, that these pilgrims
were inhabitants of the Eastern States, probably
retreating
from some species of adversity, to one of those
imaginary El Dorados, among the shades of the far
West, where it is fabled that the evils of mortality have
found no place.
James Harwood, the leader of that humble group, who
claimed from him the charities of husband and of father,
halted at the report of a musket, and while he entered a
thicket to discover whence it proceeded, the weary and
sad-hearted mother sate down upon the grass. Bitter
were her reflections during that interval of rest among
the wilds of Ohio. The pleasant New England village
from which she had just emigrated, and the peaceful
home of her birth, rose up to her view, where, but a few
years before, she had given her hand to one, whose
unkindness
now strewed her path with thorns. By constant
and endearing attentions, he had won her youthful love,
and the two first years of their union promised happiness.
Both were industrious and affectionate, and the smiles of
their infant in his evening sports, or his slumbers, more
than repaid the labors of the day.
But a change became visible. The husband grew
inattentive
to his business, and indifferent to his fireside.
He permitted debts to accumulate in spite of the economy
of his wife, and became more and more offended at her
remonstrances. She strove to hide, even from her own
heart, the vice that was gaining the ascendency over
him, and redoubled her exertions to render his home
agreeable. But too frequently her efforts were of no
avail, or contemptuously rejected. The death of her
beloved mother, and the birth of a second infant,
convinced
her, that neither in sorrow nor in sickness, could
she expect sympathy from him to whom she had given
her heart, in the simple faith of confiding affection. They
became miserably poor, and the cause was evident to
every observer. In this distress a letter was received
from a brother, who had been for several years a resident
in Ohio, mentioning that he was induced to remove
farther westward, and offering them the use of a tenement
which his family would leave vacant, and a small portion
of cleared land, until they might be able to become
purchasers
.
Poor Jane listened to this proposal with gratitude.
She thought she saw in it the salvation of her husband.
She believed that if he were divided from his intemperate
companions, he would return to his early habits of
industry
and virtue. The trial of leaving native and endeared
scenes, from which she would once have recoiled, seemed
as nothing in comparison with the prospect of his
reformation
,
and returning happiness. Yet, when all their
few effects were transmuted into the waggon and horse,
which were to convey them to a far land, and the scant
and humble necessaries which were to sustain them on
their way thither;when she took leave of brother and
sisters, with their households;when she shook hands
with the friends whom she had loved from her cradle,
and remembered that it might be for the last time;and
when the hills that encircled her native village, faded
into the faint blue outline of the horizon, there came over
her such a desolation of spirit, such a foreboding of evil,
as she had never before experienced. She blamed
herself
for these feelings, and repressed their indulgence.
The journey was slow and toilsome. The autumnal
rains, and the state of the roads were against them. The
few utensils and comforts which they carried with them,
were gradually abstracted and sold. The object of this
traffic could not be doubted:the effect was but too
visible in his conduct. She reasoned,she endeavored
to persuade him to a different course. But anger was
the only result. Even when he was not too far stupefied
to comprehend her remarks, his deportment was
exceedingly
overbearing and arbitrary. He felt that she had
no friends to protect her from insolence, and was entirely
in his own power; while she was compelled to realize
that it was a power without generosity, and that there
is no tyranny so perfect as that of a capricious and
alienated husband.
As they approached the close of their distressing
journey
,
the roads became worse, and their horse utterly
failed. He had been scantily provided for, as the
intemperance
of his owner had taxed and impoverished
everything
,
for its own vile indulgence. Jane wept as she
looked upon the dying animal, and remembered his
faithful and ill-requited services.
The unfeeling exclamation with which her husband
abandoned him to his fate, fell painfully upon her heart,
adding another proof of the extinction of his sensibilities,
in the loss of that pitying kindness for the animal
creation
,
which exercises a silent and salutary guardianship
over our higher and better sympathies. They were now
approaching within a short distance of the termination
of their journey, and their directions had been very clear
and precise. But his mind became so bewildered, and
his heart so perverse, that he persisted in choosing
bypaths
of underwood and tangled weeds, under the
pretence
of seeking a shorter route. This increased and
prolonged their fatigue, but no entreaty of his wearied
wife was regarded. Indeed, so exasperated was he at
her expostulations, that she sought safety in silence. The
little boy of four years old, whose constitution had been
feeble from his infancy, became so feverish and distressed,
as to be unable to proceed. The mother, after in vain
soliciting aid and compassion from her husband, took him
in her arms, while the youngest, whom she had
previously
carried, and who was unable to walk, clung to her
shoulders. Thus burdened, her progress was slow and
painful. Still, she was enabled to hold on; for the
strength that nerves a mother, toiling for her sick child,
is from God. She even endeavored to press on more
rapidly than usual, fearing, that if she fell behind, her
husband would tear the sufferer from her arms, in some
paroxysm of his savage intemperance.
Their road during the day, though approaching the
small settlement where they were to reside, lay through
a solitary part of the country. The children were faint
and hungry; and as the exhausted mother rested upon
the grass, trying to nurse her infant, she drew from her
bosom the last piece of bread, and held it to the
parched lips of the feeble child. But he turned away
his head, and with a scarcely audible moan, asked for
water. Feelingly might she sympathize in the distress
of the poor outcast from the tent of Abraham, who laid
her perishing son among the shrubs, and sat down a good
way off, saying, Let me not see the death of the child.
But this Christian mother was not in the desert, nor in
despair. She looked upward to Him, who is the Refuge
of the forsaken, and the Comforter of those whose spirits
are cast down.
The sun was drawing towards the west, as the voice of
James Harwood was heard, issuing from the forest,
attended
by another man with a gun, and some birds at his
girdle.
Wife, will you get up now, and come along? we are
not a mile from home. Here is John Williams, who went
from our part of the country, and says he is our
next-door
neighbor.
Jane received his hearty welcome with a thankful
spirit, and rose to accompany them. The kind neighbor
took the sick boy in his arms, saying,
8*
Harwood, here, take the baby from your wife. We
do not let our women bear all the burdens, in Ohio.
James was ashamed to refuse, and reached his hands
towards the child. But accustomed to his neglect, or
unkindness, it hid its face, crying, in the maternal bosom.
You see how it is; she makes the children so cross
that I never have any comfort of them. She chooses to
carry them herself, and always will have her own way
in everything.
You have come to a new-settled country, friends,
said John Williams, but it is a good country to get a
living in. The crops of corn and wheat are such as you
never saw in New England. Our cattle live in clover,
and the cows give us cream instead of milk. There is
plenty of game to employ our leisure, and venison and
wild turkey do not come amiss now and then, on a
farmer's
table. Here is a short cut I can show you, though
there is a fence or two to climb. James Harwood, I shall
like well to talk with you about old times, and old friends
down East. But why don't you help your wife over the
fence with her baby?
So I would, but she is so sulky. She has not spoken
a word to me all day. I always say, let such folks take
care of themselves, till their mad fit is over.
A cluster of log-cabins now met their view through an
opening in the forest. They were pleasantly situated in
the midst of an area of cultivated lands. A fine river,
surmounted by a rustic bridge, formed of the trunks of
trees, cast a sparkling line through the deep, unchanged
autumnal verdure.
Here we live, said their guide, a hard-working,
contented people. That is your house, which has no
smoke curling up from the chimney. It may not be quite
so genteel as some you have left behind in the old States,
but it is about as good as any in the neighborhood. I'll
go and call my wife to welcome you. Right glad will
she be to see you, for she sets great store by folks from
New England.
The inside of a log-cabin, to those not habituated to it,
presents but a cheerless aspect. The eye needs time to
accustom itself to the rude walls and floors, the absence
of glass windows, and doors loosely hung upon leather
hinges. The exhausted woman entered, and sank down
with her babe. There was no chair to receive her. In
the corner of the room stood a rough board table, and a
low frame resembling a bedstead. Other furniture there
was none. Glad, kind voices of her own sex, recalled her
from her stupor. Three or four matrons, and several
blooming
young faces, welcomed her with smiles. The warmth
of reception in a new colony, and the substantial services
by which it is manifested, put to shame the ceremonious
and heartless professions, which, in a more artificial state
of society, are sometimes dignified with the name of
friendship.
As if by magic, what had seemed almost a prison,
assumed a different aspect, under the ministry of active
benevolence. A cheerful flame rose from the ample
fireplace; several chairs, and a bench for the children
appeared
;
a bed, with comfortable coverings, concealed the
shapelessness of the bedstead, and viands to which they
had long been strangers, were heaped upon the board.
An old lady held the sick boy tenderly in her arms,
who seemed to revive, as he saw his mother's face
brighten
;
and the infant, after a draught of fresh milk, fell
into a sweet and profound slumber. One by one, the
neighbors departed, that the wearied ones might have an
opportunity of repose. John Williams, who was the last
to bid good-night, lingered a moment ere he closed the
door, and said,
Friend Harwood, here is a fine, gentle cow, feeding
at your door; and for old acquaintance sake, you and
your family are welcome to the use of her for the present,
or until you can make out better.
When they were left alone, Jane poured out her
gratitude
to her Almighty Protector, in a flood of joyful
tears. Kindness, to which she had recently been a
stranger, fell as balm of Gilead upon her wounded
spirit.
Husband, she exclaimed in the fulness of her heart,
we may yet be happy.
He answered not, and she perceived that he heard not.
He had thrown himself upon the bed, and in a sleep of
stupefaction, was dispelling the fumes of inebriety.
This new family of emigrants, though in the deepest
poverty, were sensible of a degree of satisfaction to which
they had long been strangers. The difficulty of
procuring
ardent spirits in the small and isolated community,
promised to be the means of establishing their peace.
The mother busied herself in making their humble
tenement
neat and comfortable, while her husband, as if
ambitious to earn in a new residence, the reputation he
had forfeited in the old, labored diligently to assist his
neighbors in gathering their harvest, receiving in
payment
such articles as were needed for the subsistence of
his household. Jane continually gave thanks in her
prayers for this great blessing; and the hope she
permitted
herself to indulge of his permanent reformation,
imparted unwonted cheerfulness to her brow and
demeanor
.
The invalid boy seemed to gather healing from
his mother's smiles; for so great was her power over
him since sickness had rendered his dependence complete,
that his comfort, and even his countenance, were a
faithful
reflection of her own. Perceiving the degree of her
influence, she endeavored to use it, as every religious
parent should, for his spiritual benefit. She supplicated
that the pencil which was to write upon his soul, might
be guided from above. She spoke to him in the
tenderest
manner of his Father in Heaven, and of His will
respecting little children. She pointed out His goodness
in the daily gifts that sustain life, in the glorious sun as
he came forth rejoicing in the east, in the gently-falling
rain, the frail plant, and the dews that nourish it. She
reasoned with him of the changes of nature, till he loved
even the storm, and the mighty thunder, because they
came from God. She repeated to him passages of
Scripture with which her memory was stored; and sang
hymns until she perceived that, if he was in pain, he
complained not, if he might but hear her voice. She
made him acquainted with the life of the blessed
Redeemer
,
and how he called young children to his arms,
though the disciples forbade them. And it seemed as if
a voice from Heaven urged her never to desist from
cherishing this tender and deep-rooted piety;because
like the flower of grass he must soon pass away. Yet
though it was evident that the seeds of disease were in
his system, his health at intervals seemed to be
improving
;
and the little household partook, for a time, the
blessings of tranquillity and contentment.
But let none flatter himself, that the dominion of vice
is suddenly, or easily broken. It may seem to relax its
grasp, and to slumber,but the victim who has long
worn its chain, if he would utterly escape, and triumph
at last, must do so in the strength of Omnipotence.
This, James Harwood never sought. He had begun to
experience that prostration of spirits which attends the
abstraction of an habitual stimulant. His resolution to
recover his lost character, was not proof against this
physical inconvenience. He determined at all hazards to
gratify his depraved appetite. He laid his plans
deliberately
,
and with the pretext of making some
arrangements
about the wagon, which had been left broken on
the road, departed from his home. His stay was
protracted
beyond the appointed limit, and at his return, his
sin was written on his brow, in characters too strong to
be mistaken. That he had also brought with him some
hoard of intoxicating liquor, to which to resort, there
remained no room to doubt. Day after day, did his
shrinking household witness the alternations of causeless
anger, and brutal tyranny. To lay waste the comfort of
his wife, seemed his paramount object. By constant
contradiction and misconstruction, he strove to distress
her, and then visited her sensibilities upon her as
sins. Had she been obtuse by nature, or indifferent
to his welfare, she might with greater ease have borne
the cross. But her youth was nurtured in tenderness,
and education had refined her susceptibilities, both of
pleasure and pain. She could not forget the love he had
once manifested for her, nor prevent the chilling contrast
from filling her soul with anguish. She could not resign
the hope, that the being who had early evinced correct
feelings, and noble principles of action, might yet be
won back to that virtue which had rendered him worthy
of her affections. Still, this hope deferred, was sickness
and sorrow to the heart. She found the necessity of
deriving consolation, and the power of endurance, wholly
from above. The tender invitation by the mouth of
a prophet, was balm to her wounded soul,As a
woman forsaken and grieved in spirit, and as a wife of
youth, when thou wast refused, have I called thee, saith
thy God.
So faithful was she in the discharge of the difficult
duties that devolved upon her,so careful not to irritate
her husband, by reproach or gloom,that to a casual
observer, she might have appeared to be confirming the
doctrine of the ancient philosopher, that happiness is in
exact proportion to virtue. Had he asserted, that virtue
is the source of all that happiness which depends upon
ourselves, none could have controverted his position.
But to a woman,a wife,a mother, how small is the
portion of independent happiness! She has woven the
tendrils of her soul around many props. Each
revolving
year renders their support more necessary. They
cannot waver, or warp, or break, but she must tremble
and bleed.
There was one modification of her husband's
persecutions
,
which the fullest measure of her piety could not
enable her to bear unmoved. This was unkindness to
her feeble and suffering boy. It was at first commenced
as the surest mode of distressing her. It opened a direct
avenue to her lacerated heart-strings. What began in
perverseness, seemed to end in hatred, as evil habits
often create perverted principles. The wasted and
wild-eyed
invalid, shrank from his father's glance and
footstep
,
as from the approach of a foe. More than once
had he taken him from the little bed, which maternal
care had provided for him, and forced him to go forth in
the cold of the winter storm.
I mean to harden him, said he. All the
neighbors
know that you make such a fool of him, that he will
never be able to get a living. For my part, I wish I had
never been called to the trial of supporting a useless
boy, who pretends to be sick, only that he may be coaxed
by a silly mother.
On such occasions, it was in vain that the mother
attempted to protect the child. She might neither
shelter
him in her bosom, nor control the frantic violence of
the father. Harshness and the agitation of fear, deepened
a disease which might else have yielded. The timid boy,
in terror of his natural protector, withered away like a
blighted flower. It was of no avail that friends
remonstrated
with the unfeeling parent, or that hoary-headed
men warned him solemnly of his sins. Intemperance
had destroyed his respect for man, and his fear of God.
Spring, at length, emerged from the shades of that
heavy and bitter winter. But its smile brought no
gladness
to the declining child. Consumption fed upon his
vitals, and his nights were restless, and full of pain.
Mother, I wish I could smell the violets that grew
upon the green bank by our dear old home.
It is too early for violets, my child. But the grass
is beautifully green around us, and the birds sing sweetly,
as if their hearts were full of praise.
In my dreams last night, I saw the clear waters of
the brook, that ran by the bottom of my little garden.
I wish I could taste them once more. And I heard such
music too, as used to come from that white church among
the trees, where every Sunday, the happy people meet
to worship God.
The mother knew that the hectic fever had been long
increasing, and now detected such an unearthly
brightness
in his eye, that she feared his intellect wandered.
She seated herself on his low bed, and bent over him.
He lay silent for some time.
Do you think my father will come?
Dreading the agonizing agitation, which in his
paroxysms
of coughing and pain, he evinced at the sound of
his father's well-known step, she answered,
I think not, love. You had better try to sleep.
Mother I wish he would come. I do not feel afraid
now. Perhaps he would let me lay my cheek to his
once more, as he used to do when I was a babe in my
grandmother's arms. I should be glad to say goodby
to him, before I go to my Saviour.
Gazing intently in his face, she saw the work of the
destroyer in lines too plain to be mistaken.
My son, my dear son,say, Lord Jesus, receive my
spirit.
Mother, he replied, with a smile upon his ghastly
features, He is ready. I desire to go to Him. Hold
the baby to me, that I may kiss her. That is all. Now
sing to me,and oh! wrap me closer in your arms, for I
shiver with cold.
He clung, with a death grasp, to that bosom which
had long been his sole earthly refuge.
Sing louder, dear mother, a little louder. I cannot
hear you.
A tremulous tone, as of a broken harp, rose above her
grief to comfort the dying child. One sigh of icy breath
was upon her cheek as she joined it to his,one shudder,
and all was over. She held the body long in her arms,
as if fondly hoping to warm and revivify it with her
breath. Then she stretched it upon its bed, and
kneeling
beside it, hid her face in that grief, which none but
mothers feel. It was a deep and sacred solitude, alone
with the dead,nothing save the soft breathing of the
sleeping babe, fell upon that solemn pause. Then, the
silence was broken by a wail of piercing sorrow. It
ceased, and a voice arose,a voice of supplication for
strength to endure, as seeing Him who is invisible.
Faith closed what was begun in weakness. It became a
prayer of thanksgiving to Him, who had released the
dove-like spirit from its prison-house of pain, that it
might taste the peace, and mingle in the melody, of
heaven.
She arose from the orison, and bent calmly over her
dead. The thin, placid features wore a smile, as when
he had spoken of Jesus. She composed the shining locks
around the pure forehead, and gazed long, on what was
to her beautiful. Tears had vanished from her eyes, and
in their stead was an expression almost sublime, as of
one who had given an angel back to God.
The father entered carelessly. She pointed to the
pale, immovable brow.
See! he suffers no longer.
He drew near, and looked on the dead with surprise
and sadness. A few natural tears forced their way, and
fell on the face of the first-born, who was once his pride.
The memories of that moment were bitter. He spoke
tenderly to the emaciated mother, and she, who a short
time before was raised above the sway of grief, wept like
an infant, as those few affectionate tones touched the
sealed fountains of other years.
Neighbors and friends visited them, desirous to
console
their sorrow, and attended them when they
committed
the body to the earth. There was a shady and
secluded spot, which they had consecrated by the burial
of their few dead. Thither that whole little colony were
gathered, and seated on the fresh-springing grass, listened
to the holy, healing words of the inspired volume. It
was read by the oldest man in the colony, who had
himself
often mourned. As he bent reverently over the
sacred page, there was that on his brow which seemed
to say, This hath been my comfort in my affliction.
Silver hairs thinly covered his temples, and his low voice
was modulated by feeling, as he read of the frailty of man,
withering like the flower of grass before it groweth up;
and of His majesty, in whose sight a thousand years
are as yesterday when it is past, and as a watch in the
night. He selected from the words of that
compassionate
One, who gathereth the lambs with His arm, and
carrieth them in His bosom; who, pointing out as an
example the humility of little children, said, except ye
become as one of these, ye cannot enter the kingdom of
heaven, and who calleth all the weary and heavy-laden
to come unto Him, that He may give them rest.
The scene called forth sympathy, even from manly
bosoms. The mother, worn with watching and
weariness
,
bowed her head down to the clay that concealed
her child. And it was observed with gratitude by that
friendly group, that the husband supported her with his
arm, and mingled his tears with hers.
He returned from this funeral in much mental distress.
His sins were brought to remembrance, and reflection
was misery. For many nights, sleep was disturbed by
visions of his neglected boy. Sometimes he imagined
that he heard him coughing from his low bed, and felt
constrained to go to him, in a strange disposition of
kindness, but his limbs were unable to obey the dictates
of his will. Then he would see him pointing with a thin,
dead hand, to the dark grave, or beckoning him to follow
to the unseen world. Conscience haunted him with
terror, and many prayers from pious hearts arose, that he
might now be led to repentance. The venerable man
who had read the Bible at the burial of his boy,
counselled
and entreated him with the earnestness of a father,
to yield to the warning voice from above, and to break
off his sins by righteousness, and his iniquities by
turning
unto the Lord.
There was a change in his habits and conversation, and
his friends trusted it would be permanent. She, who
above all others was interested in the result, spared no
exertion to win him back to the way of virtue, and to
soothe his heart into peace with itself, and obedience to
his Maker. Yet was she doomed to witness the full
force of grief, and of remorse, upon intemperance, only to
see them utterly overthrown at last. The reviving goodness
with whose indications she had solaced herself, and even
given thanks that her beloved son had not died in vain,
was transient as the morning dew. Habits of industry
which had begun to spring up, proved rootless. The
dead, and his cruelty to the dead, were alike forgotten.
Disaffection to the chastened being, who, against hope,
still hoped for his salvation, resumed its dominion. The
friends who had alternately reproved and encouraged
him, were convinced that their efforts had been of no
avail. Intemperance, like the strong man armed, took
possession of a soul, that lifted no cry for aid to the
Holy Spirit, and girded on no weapon to resist the
destroyer.
Summer passed away, and the anniversary of their
arrival at the colony returned. It was to Jane Harwood
a period of sad and solemn retrospection. The joys of
early days, and the sorrows of maturity passed in review
before her, and while she wept, she questioned her heart,
what had been its gain from a Father's discipline, or
whether it had sustained that greatest of all losses,the
loss of its afflictions.
She was alone at this season of self-communion. The
absences of her husband had become more frequent and
protracted. A storm, which feelingly reminded her of
those which had often beat upon them, when homeless and
weary travellers, had been raging for nearly two days.
To this cause she imputed the unusually long stay of her
husband. Through the third night of his absence, she
lay sleepless, listening for his steps. Sometimes she
fancied she heard shouts of laughter, for the moods in
which he returned from his revels, was various:but
it was only the shriek of the tempest. Then she
trembled
,
as if some ebullition of his frenzied anger rang in
her ears. It was the roar of the hoarse wind through
the forest. All night long she listened to these sounds,
and hushed and sang to her affrighted babe.
Unrefreshed
,
she arose, and resumed her morning labors.
Suddenly, her eye was attracted by a group of
neighbors
,
coming up slowly from the river. A dark and
terrible foreboding oppressed her. She hastened out to
meet them. Coming towards her house was a female
friend agitated and tearful, who, passing her arm around
her, would have spoken.
Oh! you come to bring me evil tidings! I pray you,
let me know the worst.
The object was indeed to prepare her mind for a fearful
calamity. The body of her husband had been found,
drowned, as was supposed, during the darkness of the
preceding night, in attempting to cross the bridge of
logs, which had been partially broken by the swollen
waters. Utter prostration of spirit came over the
desolate
mourner. Her energies were broken, and her heart
withered. She had sustained the privations of poverty
and emigration,the burdens of unceasing, unrequited
care, without a murmur. She had laid her first-born in
the grave with resignation, for Faith had heard the
Redeemer's blessed invitation, Suffer the little child to
come unto me.
She had seen him in whom her heart's young affections
were garnered up, become a persecutor and
injurious
,a
prey to vice the most disgusting and destructive.
Yet she had borne up under all. One hope remained
with her as an anchor of the soul, the hope that he
might yet repent, and be reclaimed. She had persevered
in her complicated and self-denying duties, with that
charity which beareth all things,believeth all things,
endureth all things.
But now, he had died in his sin. The deadly leprosy
which had stolen over his heart, could no more be
purged by sacrifice or offering forever. She knew
not, that a single prayer for mercy, had preceded the
soul on its passage to the bar of the High Judge.
There were bitter dregs in this cup of grief, which
she had never before wrung out.
Again the sad-hearted community assembled in their
humble cemetery. A funeral in an infant colony touches
sympathies of an almost exclusive character. It is as if
a large family suffered. One is smitten down, whom
every eye knew, every voice saluted. To bear along the
corpse of the strong man through the fields which he had
sown, and to cover motionless in the grave, that arm which
it was expected would reap the ripened harvest; awakens
a thrill, deep and startling, in the breasts of those who
wrought by his side, during the burden and heat of
the day. To lay the mother on her pillow of clay,
whose last struggle with life, was perchance to resign
the hope of one more brief visit to the land of her
fathers,whose heart's last pulsation might have been a
prayer, that her children should return, and grow up
within the shadow of the school-house, and the church
of God, is a grief in which none save emigrants may
participate
.
To consign to their narrow, noteless abode, both
young and old,the infant, and him of hoary hairs,
without
the solemn knell, the sable train, the hallowed voice
of the man of God, giving back in the name of his
fellow-Christians
,
the most precious roses of their pilgrim path,
and speaking with divine authority of Him, who is the
resurrection and the life, adds desolation to that
weeping
,
with which man goeth down to his dust.
9
But with heaviness of an unspoken and peculiar nature,
was this victim of vice borne from the home that he
had troubled, and laid by the side of that meek child, to
whose tender years, he had been an unnatural enemy.
There was sorrow among all who stood around his
grave,and it bore features of that sorrow which is
without hope.
The widowed mourner was not able to raise her head
from the bed, when the bloated remains of her
unfortunate
husband were committed to the dust. Long and
severe sickness ensued, and in her convalescence, a letter
was received from her brother, inviting her and her child
to an asylum under his roof, and appointing a period
to come and conduct them on their homeward journey.
With her little daughter, the sole remnant of her wrecked
heart's wealth, she returned to her kindred. It was with
emotions of deep and painful gratitude, that she bade
farewell to the inhabitants of that infant settlement, whose
kindness, through all her adversities, had never failed.
And when they remembered her example of uniform
patience and piety, and the saint-like manner in which
she had sustained her burdens, and cherished their
sympathies
,
they felt as though a tutelary spirit had departed
from among them.
In the home of her brother, she educated her daughter
to industry, and that contentment, which virtue teaches.
Restored to those friends with whom the morning of life
had passed, she shared with humble cheerfulness the
comforts that earth had yet in store for her; but in the
cherished sadness of her perpetual widowhood, in the
bursting sighs of her nightly orison, might be traced a
sacred, deep-rooted sorrow,the memory of her erring
husband and the miseries of unreclaimed intemperance.
THE WEEPING WIFE.
I see
a weeping wife,
What grieves her to the heart?
Has Death amid her treasured joys
Launched forth a fatal dart?
No!'Tis a living woe
That makes her eye so red,
The father of her children bears
The plague-spot on his head.
There's cursing on his tongue,
There's madness in his brain;
He yieldeth to a demon's will,
And darkly clanks his chain.
Haste!stir his blinded soul
With kindly words and strong,
And snatch him from the yawning pit
To which he reels along.
Nor let your pitying cares,
Your earnest labors cease,
Till clothed, and in his own right mind,
He dwells in love and peace.
So, from the heart and home,
Once desolate and drear,
Your names, shall on the household prayer
Go up, with grateful tear.
THE MOURNFUL VISIT.
I
Turned
me toward a cottage, round whose porch
Climbed the gay woodbine, and whose quiet roof
Seemed through its leafy canopy to smile
A welcome to the guest.
My heart was light
As near this rural haunt I drew, to greet
An early friend, with whom the joyous sport
Mid neighboring schoolmates,all our lessons done,
Had oft been shared.
Beside the open door
Two cherub-children gambol'd. One displayed
In vivid miniature, the father's face,
Such as in memory's casket still it dwelt,
The high, bold forehead, and full, hazel eye,
Gentle, yet ardent. On, with winning smile
He led his fairy sister, murmuring low
In varied tones of playful tenderness,
Or sometimes bending o'er her fragile form
In mimic guardianship, with such a grace,
That to my heart I pressed him, as I said,
Show me thy father.
To a couch he led,
Where lay a man. I could not call him
friend
,
So chang'd! Had sickness marr'd the noble brow,
Once wont to beam with intellectual light,
And glow with glad benevolence?
Ah, no!
For then I might have poured a soothing balm
Of sympathy, and raised the sufferer's heart
To God, the Healer.But I knew too well
The coloring of the seal that Vice had stamped
On form and feature.
And she, too, was there,
Who at the altar gave her hallowed vow,
In all the trusting confidence of love,
To this, her chosen one. On her young cheek
There was a cankering grief, and the pale trace
Of beauty's rose-bud blighted.
When I spake,
Recalling memories of our early days,
Where in the paths of science and of peace
We trod with many a friend, his bloated lips
Swelled out with stupid laughter, and such words
As flippant folly utters.
At the voice
Of those young creatures playing near his bed,
His fiery eyeballs flashed, and brutal threats
Appalled their innocent hearts,till that fair girl
From whom intemperance thus had reft the guide
That Nature gave, in terror, hid her face
Deep in her mother's robe.
I would have spoke
In bitter blame of that most poisonous cup,
And of the vice that seared a noble soul,
But that I saw within the sunken eye
Of that long-suffering wife, the pleading tear
Of silent, fond forbearance. So all thought
Of sternness, breathed itself away in sighs.
But as I went my way, I mourned the lot
Of that sad widowhood, and orphanage,
That hath nor hope nor pity.
Sad, I roamed
Along the grassy vale, and when no eye
Beheld me, gave free passage to the tear
And prayer of bitter anguish.
Oh, my God!
Without whose aid the proudest strength of man,
And fairest promise, are but broken reeds,
So shield us from temptation, and from sin
Deliver us,that we unscathed may rise
Our earthly trials o'er, where Virtue dwells
Fast by her Sire, and tastes a deathless joy.
FOR A JUVENILE TEMPERANCE SOCIETY.
Old
History tells of many a land
That bent beneath Oppression's yoke,
Till, with firm heart and fearless hand,
The fetter and the sway were broke.
But we a sterner toil essay,
We struggle with a tyrant foe,
Whose poisoned arrows pierce the soul,
And lay uncounted thousands low.
The warrior's bleeding breast may close,
Though wounded by the keenest steel,
But he, who feels that direr fang,
What art can soothe? what balsam heal?
Yet courage! onward! He whose grace
Hath been the endanger'd hero's shield,
Can bless the stripling's sling and stone,
And make the mail-clad giant yield.
So, when by this dread yoke enslaved
No more our native realm shall be,
How high will swell the tuneful strain
Of Freedom's noblest jubilee.
9*
LOST HOPES.
This child, so lovely and so cherub-like,
Say, must he know remorse? must passion come,
Passion in all, or any of its shapes
To cloud and sully what is now so pure?
Rogers
.
The
deep love that settles on an only child, is peculiar,
and may be perilous. Spread over a wider surface, it
respires freely, and inhales health; but, thus
concentrated
,
becomes absorbing,perhaps morbid, or
idolatrous
.
If the faults of its object pierce through the folds and
mazes of blinding partiality, they cause paternal affection
unutterable anguish. But more frequently they are
perceived
in part, or not at all. The desire that others should
be equally blinded, or inspired with a similar admiration,
sometimes becomes a demand, and ends in
disappointment
.
Dread of losing its sole treasure, magnifies the
slightest exposure, and sees in trivial indispositions the
symptoms of fatal disease.
How touchingly is the utter desolation of such
affectionate
hope depicted in the epitaph upon an only
daughter
,
in Ashbourne Church, England, whose little effigy
upon its marble mattress, mingling the restlessness of
pain, with the meek smile of patience, has drawn tears
from many a traveller.
We trusted our all to this frail bark:
And the wreck was total.
I was not in safety; neither had I rest; neither was I quiet:
Yet this trouble came.
Still, to the excess or perversion of this
heaven-implanted
affection, there are beautiful exceptions, reflecting
honor both on the self-denial of the parent, and the
well-balanced nature of the child. Gentle, shrinking
spirits there are, needing to be soothed and fortified by
an unwavering, exclusive tenderness:grateful, generous
ones also, that do not abuse it. The indulgence that
hardens others into selfishness, renders them more
amiable
,
and disposed to show the same kindness with which
they have themselves been nurtured. The deprivation
of fraternal and sisterly intercourse, often creates in the
earlier periods of life a loneliness, which, acting like a
perpetual discipline, leads to humility and piety. So
that the position of an only child,in itself a severe
ordeal,may either ripen superior excellence, or stifle its
indications in selfishness, disappointment, and sorrow.
In a small and neatly-furnished parlor, might be seen
a group of three persons,the central one being a child,
who occupied the hazardous situation which we have
contemplated. Through his thick curls, the mother's
fingers often moved with delight, arranging them in the
most becoming attitudes around the neck, or the
well-formed
forehead. The father, though what is called a
matter-of-fact man, found a new and growing affection
mingling with the cares of the day, and was never better
pleased at returning from his business at night, than to
be entertained with the smart sayings of his boy, which
were treasured up for that purpose.
Still, these parents were more judicious in the training
of their child than many in similar situations, and though
very indulgent, it would appear that this indulgence had
not been especially injurious. Frank Edwards was
affectionate
,
and not disposed to take an undue
advantage
of kindness. He was cheerful in his attendance at
school, and regular in returning home, where something
to give him pleasure was sedulously prepared. He was
generally satisfied to do what his parents desired, and
this good conduct gave to his naturally handsome
features
,
an agreeable expression; so that the neighbors
remarked they had seldom seen an
only child
so obedient,
and with such good manners.
Among those who took a deep interest in the boy,
was an unmarried uncle, from whom he was named. As
he resided near, scarcely an evening passed without a
visit from him. He interested himself in all that
concerned
Frank, and the most expensive gifts at birth-days,
and New-Year, were always from his uncle. On holiday
afternoons, when the weather was favorable, his uncle
usually came, with his fine pair of ponies, on which they
took equestrian exercise together. Such was his
absorbing
interest in his namesake, that the parents informed
him of all their movements respecting him, and observed
that he was always pleased to give advice respecting his
education.
One of his favorite propositions was, that he should
be sent away from home. This, the parents steadily
resisted; arguing, that their own schools bore so high a
reputation, that many children from distant towns were
sent to be recipients of their privileges.
All this may be very true, he replied; and yet
he ought to go from home, to make him manly. He is
brought up too much like a girl. Here, I see him
putting
his arm around his mother's neck, or sitting with his
hand in hers, perfectly childish, you know. How can be
ever be fit to bear his part among men, cossetted up in
this way?
These opinions being communicated to Frank, made
him constrained in the presence of his uncle. He learned
to repress the expression of his affectionate feelings, from
fear of ridicule; and lest he should not be considered
manly, by one whose good opinion he valued.
My dear, said Mr. Edwards, one evening, my
brother has made a distinct proposal, that Frank should
be sent to a celebrated scholastic institution in a distant
city, for two years, before he enters college; all the
expenses of which he engages to defray.
I pray you not to listen to him. Our boy is doing
well here. We cannot tell how it will be with him,
when he is far away,perhaps exposed to bad example.
I think as you do, with regard to that. Besides, I
should be lost without him, when I come from the store,
in the evening. But brother gives me no peace. If we
do not cross him in this matter, he will be very likely to
make Frank his heir. You know he is rich, and my
possessions are very moderate. I think we ought to
make a sacrifice of our feelings, for the sake of his
future good.
There are other kinds of good, besides the gain of
money, that I covet for our child, said the mother, her
eyes filling with tears; and losses, for which all the
wealth in the world cannot pay.
But she was not slow in perceiving that her husband
had already consented to this arrangement,and the
brother entering soon after, confirmed it. She felt that
longer opposition was fruitless, yet was still moved to
say, with an unwonted warmth and emphasis,
My heart is full of misgivings. While my son is by
this fireside, I know that he is not in bad company.
When he is removed from my sight and influence, how
can I know this? I have reason to think that he does
not neglect his studies, and he is always happy with
me.
That is the trouble, sister; you make him altogether
too happy. Remember, he is an only child,
everybody
can see that. He has got to live in the world, as
well as the rest of us. Yet what does he know of the
world? Your husband is much away, occupied with his
business, and it is almost a proverb, that boys brought
up by women, are good for nothing.
Brother, if he is an only child, I think he has not
been indulged to his hurt. Is not his home a safe one?
Is not his school a good one? Is he not making
respectable
progress? Is he not in good habits? Can you give
assurance that a change will not be for the worse? Do
you know certainly, that his principles will be strong to
resist evil?
The mother argued in vain. She was alternately
argued with and soothed. All her objections were
resolved
into natural reluctance to resign the solace of her
son's company; and as the father had consented, she was
enforced to consent also.
Frank had arrived at an age when the desire of
seeing new places, and making new acquaintances, was
alluring. So he did not heighten the pain of his mother,
by any unwillingness to depart. In the preparations for
his wardrobe, and supply of books, which were on an
unusually liberal scale, he took much interest, and could
not avoid boasting a little to his old companions of his
brilliant prospects.
But when the last trunk was locked, his spirits quailed.
Seated between his father and mother, and expecting
every moment the arrival of the stage-coach, the tears
rushed so fast to his eyes, and he felt such a suffocating
sensation in his throat, that he could scarcely heed their
parting counsel.
At the sound of the wheels, stopping at the door, he
would fain have thrown himself upon his mother's neck
and wept. But his uncle, who was to accompany him,
leaped from the vehicle, and came in. So he busied
himself in arranging his parcels, and after shaking hands
courageously with his parents, said, as he rushed from
the house,
Good by!good by!You shall hear from me, as
soon as I get there.
He dared not look back, until the roof of his home, and
the trees that shaded it, were entirely out of sight. For
he knew that if he trusted himself with another glimpse,
he should burst into tears,and feared that his uncle
would shame him by the appellation of
Miss Fanny
,
before strangers.
In the large school that he entered, everything seemed
new and strange. He found more trials of temper, and
privations of comfort, than he had anticipated. He went
with an intention to make himself distinguished by
scholarship
.
But there were many older and more advanced
than himself, and he did not exhibit the perseverance
necessary, in such circumstances, to insure success.
He also suffered from that sinking loneliness of heart,
which an indulged child feels, when first exiled from the
sympathies of home. In the headaches, to which, from
childhood, he had been occasionally subject, he sadly
missed maternal nursing and tenderness. But he would
not acknowledge home-sickness, or complain of
indisposition
,
lest it should not be manly; and having a good
temper, became gradually a favorite with his new
associates
.
Everything went on well, until his room-mate was
changed, and a careless, immoral boy, placed in this
intimate connection. At length, it was proved that he
had not the moral courage to say
no
, when tempted to
evil,and a sad change in his deportment became
evident
.
He had not firmness enough to reprove his
companion
for what he knew to be wicked,or steadfastly to
resist what his conscience disapproved.
It was not long ere he began to waste his time, and
neglect the appointed lessons. Fortified by bad example,
he scorned the censure that followed, and learned to
ridicule, in secret, the instructors whom he should have
loved. Foolish and hurtful books, engrossed and
corrupted
the minds of those thoughtless comrades,and
there they were, making themselves merry with what
they should have shunned, while their distant relatives
supposed them diligent in the acquisition of knowledge.
Months passed on, and the vacation approached.
Every day was counted by the anxious mother. His
room was put in perfect order, and some articles of
furniture
added, which it was thought would please him.
His little library was arranged to make the best
appearance
,
and his minerals newly labelled, and placed in their
respective compartments. Some of his toys she removed
to her own cabinet, for she said, They will be too
childish
for him now;but I love to keep them, for they
remind me of him, when he just began to walk and to
speak, and was always so happy. His favorite articles
of food were not forgotten, and as the time of his arrival
drew near, she busied herself in their preparation, with
that delight in which only the fond maternal heart can
partake.
When the loved one came, his uncle exclaimed with
exultation, How improved!how manly! He had,
indeed, gained much in stature, and promised to possess
a graceful, well-proportioned form. But those who
scrutinized
his countenance and manner, might be led to
doubt whether every change had been for the better, or
whether the added manliness might not have been
purchased
at too great a cost. Simple gratifications no
longer contented him. He seemed to require for
himself
a lavish expenditure. He ceased to ask pleasantly
for the things that he desired, or to express gratitude for
them; but said churlishly through his shut teeth, with
half-averted face,
I want this, or that. Other boys have all they wish.
I see no reason why I should not.
His mother was still more alarmed at the habits of
reserve and concealment which he had contracted.
Formerly
,
he was accustomed to impart freely to her, all
that concerned him. Now, she could not but feel that
she was shut out from his confidence, and fear that
her influence over him was irrecoverably lost.
Still, she remitted no effort or device, in which the
maternal heart is so fruitful, to reinstate herself in his
affections. Sometimes, she was flattered by a
brightening
hope; then he started aside, like a deceitful bow.
His first vacation was, in these respects, a model of
those that followed;and the two last years at school
passed away, with little intellectual gain, and great moral
loss.
At his entrance into college he was exposed to greater
temptations, and still less inclined to repel them. Let
no parent flatter himself, that it will be well with a son
thus situated, unless he possesses firm principles, and is
willing diligently to labor in the acquisition of knowledge.
Good talents, and good temper alone, will not save him.
The first, without industry, are unfruitful; and the
sunshine
of the latter may be clouded by immediate
self-reproach
.
We will not follow Frank Edwards, through the haunts
of folly and intemperance where his ruin was consummated.
His letters to his affectionate parents were few, and brief.
Those to his uncle were more frequent, because on him
the supply of his purse depended. That gentleman was
heard to say, with a smile of somewhat indefinite
character
,
that truly, he spent money like a man. It was
supposed, however, that in the course of a year or two,
he might have become dissatisfied with the manly expenses
of his nephew, as he ceased to boast of this proof of his
virility.
Though Frank was ignobly contented with the lowest
grade in scholarship, he had still a latent ambition to be
distinguished in some way or other. So he was fond of
speaking of his rich, old-bachelor uncle, and saying
that, without doubt, he should be his heir. His mad
expenditure was praised as liberality; and he called a
fine, noble-hearted fellow, by the gay companions who
walked with him in the way to destruction.
Early in the third year of his collegiate course, he
came home in ill health. He found fault with the laws
of the Institution, and ridiculed its officers. He said it
was impossible to gain a good education there, if one
applied himself ever so closely to his studies. In short,
he blamed every person, but himself. He had left
college in disgrace, and debt, with neither the disposition
or ability to return. His uncle, who had certainly great
reason to be offended, told him that he need have no
further expectations from him; for unless the whole
course of his life was changed, he should choose some
more worthy recipient of his bounty, and find some heir
to his estate, who would not dishonor his name.
The sad, and mortified father, took the youth to his
own counting-house. He enforced on him the necessity
of doing something for his support. But he had no
habits of application, and despised the routine of business,
and the confinement that it imposed. His red, and bloated
face revealed, but too truly, the vice to which he was
enslaved. As he passed in the street, he was pointed out,
as the ruined young man.
Alas! for the poor mother. Long did she labor to
hide the fearful truth from her own heart. Her love,
ingenious in its excuses, strove to palliate his conduct in
the view of others, hoping that he might yet retrieve his
reputation. Patiently, and with woman's tact, she
waited for glimpses of good feeling,for moments of
reflection, to give force to her tender appeals,her
earnest remonstrances. But her husband said to her,
It is in vain that we would blind ourselves to what
is known to all the people. Our son is a sot! I have
tried with, and for him, every means of reformation. But
they are all like water spilt upon the ground, which no
man gathereth up again.
That disgusting vice which breaks down grace of
form, and beauty of countenance, and debases intellect to
a level with the brute creation, has seldom been more
painfully displayed than in the case of this miserable
youth. The pleasant chamber, so carefully decorated by
maternal taste,the very pictures on whose walls seemed
to look reproachfully at him,where his happy boyhood
had dreamed away nights of innocence, and woke to the
exuberance of health and joy,was now the scene of his
frequent sickness, senseless laughter, or awful
imprecations
.
But his career was short, and his sudden death
horrible
.
Those who most loved him, were unable to witness
it With eyeballs starting from their sockets, he raved
of hideous monsters, and fiery shapes, that surrounded
him. One furious struggle,one unearthly shriek of wild
and weak contention,and in the agonies of
delirium
tremens
, died this miserable victim of intemperance, ere
time had impaired his vigor, or ripened the blossom of
his manly prime.
In the suburbs of the city where Frank Edwards was
born and died, was a cluster of humble dwellings, in one of
which resided a widow, with her only son. She was poor,
and inured to labor, but freely expended on him, the
little gains of her industry, as well as the overflowing
fulness of her affections. She denied herself every
superfluity, that he might enjoy the advantages of
education
,
and the indulgences that boyhood covets. Silently
she sate, working at her small fire, by a single lamp,
often
regarding with intense delight her boy, as he amused
himself with his books, or sought out his lessons for the
following day. The expenses of his education were
defrayed
by her unresting toil, and glad and proud was she
to bestow on him privileges which she had never been so
happy as to share. She believed him to be faithfully
acquiring that knowledge which she respected, without
being able fully to comprehend. But his teachers, and
his idle playmates, better knew how he was employed.
He learned to astonish his simple admiring parent with
high-sounding epithets, and technical terms, and to
despise
her for not understanding them. When she saw him
sometimes dejected, at comparing his situation with those
who were above him in rank, she deepened her own
self-denial
,
that she might add a luxury to his table, or a
garment to his wardrobe.
How happy was her affectionate heart in such
sacrifices
.
Yet she erred in judgment, for they fell like good
seed upon stony ground. Indulgence ministered to his
selfishness, and rendered him incapable of warm gratitude,
or just appreciation. As his boyhood advanced, there
was little reciprocity of kindness, and every year seemed
to diminish even that little. At length, his manners
assumed a cast of defiance. She was grieved at the
alteration, but solaced herself with the sentiment, that it
was just the nature of boys
.
He grew boisterous and disobedient. His returns to
their humble cottage, became irregular. She sate up
late for him, and when she heard his approaching
footsteps
,
forgot her weariness, and welcomed him kindly.
But he might have seen reproach written on the paleness
of her loving brow, if he would have read its language.
During those long and lonely evenings, she sometimes
wept as she remembered him in his early years, when he
was so gentle, and to her eye, so beautiful.
But this
is the nature of young men
, said her lame philosophy.
So she armed herself to bear.
At length, it was evident that darker vices were
making
him their victim. The habit of intemperance could
no longer be concealed, even from a love that blinded
itself. The widowed mother remonstrated with unwonted
energy. She was answered in the dialect of insolence
and brutality.
He disappeared from her cottage. What she dreaded,
had come upon her. In his anger, he had gone to sea.
And now, every night when the tempest howled, and the
wind was high, she lay sleepless, thinking of him. She
saw him in her imagination climbing the slippery shrouds,
or doing the bidding of rough, unfeeling men. Again,
she fancied that he was sick and suffering, with none to
watch over him, and have patience with his waywardness;
and her head, which silver hairs had begun to sprinkle,
throbbed in agony, till her eyes gushed out like
fountains
of waters.
But hopes of his return began to cheer her. When
the new moon, with its slender crescent looked in at her
window, she said in her lonely heart, My boy will be
here, before that moon is old. And when it waned,
and went away, she sighed, My boy will remember
me.
Years fled, and there was no letter,no message.
Sometimes, she gathered floating tidings that he was on
some far sea, or in some foreign clime. When he touched
at any port of his native land, it was not to seek the
cottage of his mother, but to waste his wages in revelry,
and re-embark on a new voyage.
Weary years, and no recognition, no letter.And yet
she had abridged her comforts that he might be taught to
write, and was wont to exhibit his penmanship with such
pride. Alas! her indulgence had been lost on an ignoble
nature. But she checked the reproachful thought and
sighed,
It was the way with sailors
.
Amid all these years of neglect and cruelty, still Love
lived on. When Hope withheld nutriment, it begged
food of Memory. It was satisfied with the crumbs from
a table, that must never be spread more. So Memory
brought the fragments that she had gathered into her
basket, when infancy and childish innocence held their
simple festivals, and Love as a mendicant received that
broken bread, and fed upon it, and gave thanks. It fed
upon the cradle-smile, upon the first lisping words, when
with its cheek laid upon the mother's, the babe slumbered
the live-long night, or when essaying the first uncertain
footsteps, he tottered with outstretched arms to her
bosom, as a bird newly-fledged, to its nest.
But Religion found this forsaken widow, and
communed
with her at the deep midnight, while the storm
was raging without. It told her of a name better than
of sons or of daughters, and she was comforted. It
bade her resign herself to the will of her Father in
Heaven
,
and she found peace.
It was a cold evening in the winter, and the snow lay
deep upon the earth. The widow sate alone, by her little
fireside. The marks of early age had settled upon her.
10
There was meekness on her brow, and in her hand, a book
from whence that meekness came.
A heavy knock shook her door, and ere she could open
it, a man entered. He moved with pain, like one
crippled
,
and his red and downcast visage, was partially
concealed
by a torn hat. Among those who had been
familiar with his youthful countenance, only one, save the
Being who made him, could have recognized him through
his disguise and misery. The mother, looking deep into
his eye, saw a faint tinge of that fair blue, which had
charmed her, when it unclosed from the cradle-dream.
My son! My son!
Had the prodigal returned, by a late repentance, to
atone for years of ingratitude and sin? I will not speak
of the revels that shook the lowly roof of his widowed
parent, or the profanity that disturbed her repose.
The remainder of his history is brief. The effects of
vice had debilitated his constitution, and once, as he was
apparently recovering from a long paroxysm of
intemperance
,
apoplexy struck his heated brain, and he lay,
a bloated and hideous corse!
The poor mother faded away, and followed him.
A DREAM.
In
troubled sleep, I seem'd to see a flood
Flaming and fearful.
Far and wide it spread,
And many trifled on its fatal brink
Who never more unscath'd, to life return'd:
For he who reel'd upon its slippery verge,
Did plunge therein and mock his God, and die.
Loud, warning voices call'd the endanger'd back,
And bade them drink pure water, and be whole.
Yet some there were, who strove with eager toil
To form new channels for that baleful tide,
With tna's lava,and they strangelypress'd
The fire-cup to their weaker neighbor's lip,
Till the red plague-spot rankled in his soul,
While in their coffers swell'd the price of blood.
Again I looked:And lo! they did the deeds
That bounty prompts,the sacred fane they rear'd
For Christian worship, and the Gospel-gift
Sent to blind Pagans; holding high their lamp,
That, like a city set upon a hill,
Its light might not be hid.
Yet still they sold
Such poison to their brother, as bereav'd
His wretched wife, and on his babes entail'd
Dire orphanage!
Then fled my dream away;
And words were trembling on my lip to Him
Who giveth skill to read His Holy Word,
That He would grant us hearts to understand
That wealth, obtain'd without His fear, is but
An ill inheritance.
Oh! break the chain
Of Mammon from our spirits, that in love
To all mankind, as well as love to Thee,
With hands outstretch'd to pluck our brother's feet
From the destroyer's net, we so may pass
This evil world, as mid all snares to hold
Our footing firm in Thee.
THE VOICE OF THE COUNTRY.
I heard
a bitter sigh
Break from a mother's breast,
And knew it was my Country's voice
That thus her sons addrest:
Ye are my crown of hope,
Dim not its peerless ray;
Ye are the sinews of my strength,
Cast not that strength away.
There is a fiery cup,
Whose ministry of woe
Can melt the spirit's purest pearl,
And lay the mightiest low:
Turn from its treacherous tide,
Repel its siren claim,
Nor let me mid the nations blush,
And mourn my children's shame.
And will ye, for the sake
Of one brief poison-draught,
The record of my fame debase,
By blood and suffering bought?
And will ye cast a stain
Upon my banner's ray,
That all the rivers of your realm
Can never wash away?
FALLEN BY THE WAY.
From
the parent's fond protection,
From his pleasant native glen,
Youth, with reckless spirit hasteth
To the crowded haunts of men:
Hidden snares and tempters meet him,
Lo! he falleth by the way:
Kneel and raise him,kneel and raise him,
He hath fallen by the way.
Full of pride, and self-reliance,
With a warrior's haughty eye,
Dauntless, to the world's encounter,
Manhood in his strength went by:
Foes in ambush gather'd round him,
He hath fallen by the way:
Kneel and warn him,kneel and aid him,
He hath fallen by the way.
Heavenly Father! Thou who knowest
All the weakness of the breast,
All the sorrow of the lowest,
All the frailties of the best,
Teach us, for our erring brethren,
With a humbled soul to pray;
Deign to help them,deign to save them,
They have fallen by the way.
THE GOOD QUEEN.
I do assert, from all excess
In food,strong drink, or gaudy dress,
To every man doth come
Disturbance in his inward mind,
Imprudence, vengeance, anger blind,
And sorrows fierce, and ills that bind
In dark, and fearful doom.
King Alfred
.
A summer
moonlight lay on the sleeping Seine. It
touched with trembling lustre the thick, waving trees,
and promiscuous roofs of Paris, as it was, thirteen
centuries
since. The elegance and beauty that now mark its
lofty edifices,elysian gardens, and statued, sparkling
fountains, could scarcely have been imagined in its simple
and rude aspect, under the sway of the Merovingian
princes.
Still, it was not without gleamings of those elements
of taste and majesty, which in modern times attract and
charm the lingering traveller from every clime. The
fortifications erected under its Roman masters, gave it
an appearance of strength and grandeur, which awed
the neighboring tribes of barbarians; while here and
there, the towers of a church, or abbey, showed how
early the heathen temples in the Gallic clime, had been
consecrated to the worship of Jehovah.
10*
The Frank monarchs, who, from the time of Clovis,
had yielded to the softening sway of the Christian
religion, displayed in their modes of life and appendages
of royalty, a comparative refinement. The midnight
moon was now silvering the palace, where Charibert
wielded the sceptre of France. He might have been
seen, with rapid steps, traversing its intricate passages,
and seeking a remote apartment. A fair young creature,
with a form and movement of grace, sprang forward to
meet him. He lightly touched her forehead with his
lips, and as he seated her beside him, the smile on her
glowing features seemed to pass under the shadow of
some saddening thought.
Art weary, Bertha? I myself nearly slumbered
amid the long audience I was compelled to give those
Saxon strangers. I spoke heavily to the courtiers, for
my heart turned towards the expecting sweet one in her
lonely chamber.
He paused, but there was no reply.
Thou knowest why I sought this interview, and on
what errand I came.
The gentle girl drooped her head, till the clustering
raven curls veiled her face like a curtain. Passing his
arm tenderly around her, he said, in a lower voice,
Hast thou considered the proposal of Ethelbert, the
King of Kent?
Yes, father.
Not simply King of Kent, but Bretwalda, or ruler of
the Saxon octarchy. So that he is literally the sovereign,
not of a separate province, but of the realm of Britain.
Art thou insensible of the honor thus offered thee?
No, father.
Yes, father!
and
no, father!
Laconic enough, and
indifferent withal. But why this troubled brow, my
daughter? To be the chosen ladye-love of a gallant
and powerful monarch, need not, one would think, be
quite a hopeless sorrow.
Not a sorrow, sayest thou? to leave all that I love,
thee, and my mother, and the young brothers and sisters,
with whom I have been always so happy?
Not a
sorrow
,
father, to make my home among a strange, wild
people, of a foreign tongue?
Bertha, it is woman's lot, to leave the shelter of
childhood, and go forth into the field of duty; where
thorns may indeed spring, but where the blessed
sunbeam
shines on the true-hearted. Knowest thou not
this?
Yet, dearest father, I am so young,scarcely more
than a child.
Thy years are indeed few, but heavenly wisdom has
given a ripeness to thy soul, that age sometimes fails to
bring. Judge not in this matter as self-indulgence
dictates
.
Think of the disinterestedness of parental love.
Wherefore doth it nurture and train the flowrets that
spring around it?Expecting them always to grow by
its side, and cheer it by their expanding beauties? Nay,
my daughter; but that they may bless other hearts with
their fragrance, and in rearing their own young blossoms,
fulfil a higher destiny.
With an earnest, yet tremulous voice, the maiden
answered,
Ah! let me still linger under the shade of the blessed
parent tree. Bid me not to leave thee. I will obey
thine every word. I will study thine unspoken wishes.
Falling on her knees, she raised her clasped hands,
and imploring eyes, in which large drops, like pearls,
were glistening.
Tears, my Bertha! Flow they not from a deeper
source than thy words have revealed? Confess: lovest
thou not already?
The clear depths of the moistened eye disclosed a
guileless
spirit, as she assured him that her heart was free.
Yet these fierce Saxon people, so long known as
pirates, and sea-kings, strike me with terror.
A father's heart weighed every objection, ere it
listened
to this embassy. Remember they are no longer
marauders, and adventurers, but settled in the fair island
which they have won, under separate governments and
advancing in civilization. The stream as it runs, refines.
Ethelbert, the fourth in descent from Hengist, is called
the Magnificent, as well as the brave. Consent to see
him, and then decide for thyself. I promise, that no
force shall be used with thy young affections; for thy
happiness is my own.
Father! I love the faith that our dear Saviour has
taught. How can I wed an idolater! Can I smother
within my soul the breath of eternal life, and be
guiltless
?
Or will God give me strength, for persecution
and martyrdom?
Beloved, thou hast now told me all thine heart. I
see it in the repose that steals again over thy troubled
brow. Thou shrinkest back from a home among
idolaters
.
Who knoweth but for this great purpose thou
hast been called thither, to lead a Pagan prince, and his
realm, to the cross of the Redeemer? Who can say,
that this honor was not intended thee by God, and that
holy angels are not now gazing into thy weak woman's
heart, to see what it will answer.
The beautiful girl fixed a wondering, half-credulous
gaze, upon the face of the king. Then a tide of great
thoughts swept over her. Her dark, deep-set eyes,
radiated
with an unearthly light, as the mission-purpose
entered into her soul.
She rose involuntarily. Her slight, graceful form, in
the dim ray of the night-lamp, seemed to gather majesty.
She pressed the hand of her father, fondly and firmly
between her own. She spoke no word, but he
comprehended
her. He embraced her, and departed. Long
she knelt in her heart-breathed prayer, and then on her
pillow settled in that unbroken slumber, which God sends
the beloved ones who early repose on Him.
Ethelbert, with a fitting retinue, soon arrived at the
palace of the French king. The timid modesty with
which Bertha appeared before him, added new charms to
her loveliness. Every succeeding interview deepened
the love of the royal suitor, and his desire to secure her
preference.
Nor did she, in his company, experience the horror she
had anticipated. Legends of piratical invaders, and
visions of blood-stained Jutes, which had disturbed her
childish dreams, and darkened her youthful reveries,
faded into thin air. In their place was a noble prince,
of commanding person, and elegant costume, revealing
in every action the respect and tenderness that win their
way to the female heart. She could not be insensible to
the devotion of a lofty spirit, or the fervor of its
utterance
.
Her reluctance to leave her native realm vanished,
and Charibert and his queen saw their beloved daughter
filled with those blessed sentiments that form the
happiness
of a new home.
In those comparatively dark ages, the Anglo Saxons
surpassed not only the surrounding tribes, but the more
polished nations of the East, in their chivalrous treatment
of woman. Her rank in society, her position amid the
household, and at the festive board,her permitted
presence at the witena-gemote, or incipient parliament,
all testified their appreciation of her value, and of the
influence she might exercise for good or for evil. Their
earliest written laws recognized her right to inherit and
transmit property, and threw a protection over her
person
,
and over her solitary widowhood. Even in their
rude state of partial civilization, they evinced the elements
of that feeling, which a poet of modern Germany warmly
expresses: Honor to the women! they twine and weave
heavenly roses with the web of this earthly life.
Seldom is a court, encumbered, as it is wont to be,
with ceremony and heartless expediency, favorable to the
growth of affection. Yet Ethelbert and Bertha, both
ardent, and unembarrassed by previous intrigue or
disappointment
,
were soon ready to inshrine each other's
image in their heart of hearts. At his departure she
wore the ring of the betrothed, and it was understood
that his next visit was to win a queen for the throne of
Kent.
When the ships of the royal lover again danced over
the foaming sea that separated their native strands, the
affianced bride was ready to meet him, with the perfect
trust of a pure and affectionate heart. Before them
stretched the fair region of hope, like a newly-created
Eden, whose flowery haunts no tempter had ever dared
to invade.
Sometimes, my heart misgives me, Bertha, lest thy
new home, compared with this beautiful Paris, may not
content thee. When thou shalt walk by my side on the
white cliffs of Doverthine own cliffsand see the huge
billows heave and break far beneath the feet of their
queen,if thou shalt mark beyond them, as a faint cloud,
the pleasant land of France, will thy heart still cling
to mine, and the smile beam as a sunbeam from thy
brow?
The transplanted flower must soon take root, fostered
by tenderness like thine. The love that I plight thee at
the altar, shall be the same in all lands, through weal or
woe, while life is mine.
Ah, that altar! he murmured, for nurtured as he
was, in paganism, he had an undefined dread of the
nuptial
ritual that her religion imposed. That altar, of
which thou speakest, will not its appalling forms blanch
thy fresh cheek with paleness? In my own land, there
is a saying, that tears at a bridal, blight the buds of
happiness
.
Bertha,my own love,I pray thee, let our
bridal drink no pearl-drop from thine eye. Should I see
but one glittering there, it would blast my joy.
Forgive
me this superstition.
Bertha held sacred this wish of Etherlbert. Neither the
thrilling marriage responses, nor the impressive
benediction
of the venerable bishop who had shed the baptismal
dew on her infancy; nor the parting from those who
fondly cherished her earliest affections, were suffered to
draw forth a tear. Around the neck of the queen, her
beloved mother, she almost convulsively threw her arms,
burying her face deep in the bosom where she had so
often found rest. But when she raised her eyes, the long
raven fringes of their lids were dry. Those who from her
childhood had known her impulsive sensibility, and that
she could never part from favorite playmates, even for a
few days, without grief, were amazed at her self-control.
They wondered that the new love should so supersede
the old, as to wash away all the tender traces of memory.
But they knew not that a higher purpose than the
glowing
hopes of personal happiness, swelled the bosom of
that gentle, delicate bride, gleaming before them like a
fairy vision, her rose-leaf lip slightly blanched with
emotion
,
yet wearing the smile of an angel. They penetrated
not the heaven-born motive, that, combining with the
germs of conjugal affection, suddenly ripened and
sublimated
her whole nature.
Soon after the arrival of the nuptial cavalcade at the
palace, in Canterbury, the ceremony of coronation was
performed. It had been an early custom of the
Anglo-Saxons
,
to place with pomp and rejoicing, the crown on
the head of the consorts of their sovereign. Ethelbert
was anxious that nothing should be omitted, that could
render this honor to his queen imposing and memorable
to their people; and the pageantry of the scene seemed
to justify the epithet of most glorious, which was
bestowed
upon him, either by the justice or the flattery of
his own times.
It was at the coronation dinner, that the young queen
first saw the dignitaries of her new realm. At an
immense
oval table, loaded with a plenty, prodigal almost
to rudeness, were seated, each a lady at his side, the
principal
earls, ealdermen, and thanes. Their flowing robes,
richly bordered, were of strong and opposing colors, while
the red gold of their massy bracelets and sword-hilts,
made an array of barbaric splendor. She, the observed
of all observers, was admired for her tasteful dress and
graceful dignity of deportment. She also regarded with
pleased attention, the athletic forms and fair complexions
of those by whom she was surrounded, and thought the
hair of the bearded chieftains becomingly adapted to
their large features, parted as it was at the crown, and
falling low on each side, in full floating curls.
At a separate festive board, the young nobles were
entertained. At its head was Prince Sobert, the
heir-apparent
to the throne of Essex; whose mother, being
the sister of Ethelbert, had caused him to be placed
under the care of his uncle, that he might be trained by
his superior wisdom to the polity of kingly government.
He was conspicuous by his lofty stature, and the profusion
of his yellow hair, whose heavy curls rested upon his
broad shoulders; as well as by his zeal in promoting
conviviality, both by word and example.
His rich tunic gleamed with the hues of the rainbow;
as frequently rising from his seat, to pledge those around
him, he raised to his lips an immense drinking-horn
tipped with ivory, and wrought at the golden brim with
leaves and clusters of the grape. This he seemed always
to drain to the bottom. His fine complexion began to
assume
a blood-red tinge, and his blue eyes to radiate like
orbs of flame. At length, his voice issued in huge bursts
of sound, slightly modified by articulation, and still less
by meaning. Then, lifting a wine-cup of silver, and
calling upon his compeers to drink nobly to the fair, new
queen, he emptied the massy goblet, and fell senseless
on the floor. As he was borne from the hall,his head
resting helplessly on one shoulder, and his gigantic limbs
spasmodically resisting,  Bertha involuntarily turned
away her eyes, with a feeling of humiliation and disgust.
Yet she could not but observe that the scene attracted
little attention from her Anglo-Saxon subjects, who were
accustomed to think the extreme of conviviality, on high
occasions, by no means an indelible blemish.
The royal bridegroom became daily more and more
fascinated by the graces and virtues of his beautiful
spouse. Her sweetness of spirit, the attractions of her
conversation, the identification of her sympathies with
his own,the playfulness of her unclouded spirit, the
dignity of her queenly bearing, the refinement that she
strove to diffuse over his court; above all, the patience
with which she sustained trials, or resigned her own
wishes, were more forcible arguments to his mind than
all the pungency of polemics.
Thou art so lovely, my wife, so like a sunbeam on
my path and heart! How can I ever repay thee for the
happiness thou hast brought me?
By tasting the fountain from whence it flows.
The fountain! What meanest thou? thy faith? Ah!
if I could be indeed convinced that was the source of thy
virtues. But no, I deem it not so; they are the
spontaneous
overflowings of a pure nature. Thou wouldst
still be goodness itself, without thy creed.
Nay, Ethelbert, thy too partial love perceives not, or
forgets, how oft I am wayward. Before the life-giving
Spirit breathed into my heart, it was sad, and in
darkness
.
Even now, at the close of every day, have I need
to humble myself for its doings, or not-doings.
So kind, and forbearing to all beside, how is it that
thou ever judgest thyself severely? Doth not our life
already overflow with joy? I have always a fulness of
bliss, if thou art near. What more could thy faith add?
To the joys of this life, the hopes of another. Oh!
beloved of my soul, ere the death-angel, that must divide
us, cometh; I would fain see thee rejoicing in the promise
that we shall dwell together forever.
The monarch was more moved by these appeals, than
his words admitted. Had they been too frequent, or
strongly reiterated, or attended by that gloom of manner
which he had supposed an element of piety, they might
have failed of all salutary effect. But the exquisite tact
that accompanied them, gave them a pleasant home, and
an echo like music, in his memory.
Would that the God of Bertha were my God! was
sometimes his ejaculation in solitude. Had she imagined
how often, it would have inspired her with new courage.
Before her departure from France, he had promised her
parents that she should be neither opposed nor impeded,
in the exercise of her religion; and even invited the
venerab'e
instructor of her childhood, to accompany her to
her new home, and reside under his jurisdiction. With
the generosity of a noble nature, he not only faithfully
regarded, but transcended his engagements. Her
retirements
in her oratory, at morn and eventide, though they
might, perchance, seem to him protracted, were never
disturbed, and he protected her in the sacredness of
those Sabbath devotions, on which she so much rested
for spiritual strength and joy. For her use, he prepared
the first temple that Christianity wrested from paganism
in England. The traveller who now muses within the
consecrated walls of St. Martin's, or beneath the gorgeous
dome of St. Paul's, hears the tread of the people, like the
sound of many waters, looks back reverentially, through
the dimness of more than twelve centuries, to the
conjugal
love of their founder, Ethelbert, and the faithful
heaven-rewarded piety of his queen.
The pure fountains of maternal affection were unsealed
for Bertha, and infant souls, like unfolding rose-buds,
laid on her bosom. Supplications for their eternal
welfare
were mingled with the orisons which had long been
duly offered for that of her beloved husband. But years
sped, and there seemed no nearer approach to the
accomplishment
of her desires for him. Yet still her
sacred
fervor failed not, while patience wrought out its
perfect work.
At length tidings came, that strangers from a foreign
coast had landed on the isle of Thanet, the very spot
where, a few generations before, the brothers Hengist
and Horsa had debarked, with their ferocious followers.
Yet these peaceful people bore no resemblance, in
character
or purpose, to the fierce adventurers whom the
unfortunate
Britons at first invited as allies, and afterwards
strove with in vain, as usurpers and conquerors. They
were no Scandinavian marauders, led on by piratical
sea-kings
to savage conflict; but Christians from Italy and
Gaul, under the auspices of the missionary Augustine.
That Being, who educeth great events from causes that
blind mortals account as trifles, had made the blue eyes
and fair brows of some English children, exposed for sale
in the slave-markets at Rome, and even the alliterative
phrase on the lips of Gregory, non Angles, sed angeli,
instrumental in the conversion of that glorious island,
which now plants in almost every pagan clime, the cross
of her Redeemer.
This peaceful embassy sought an audience of
Ethelbert
.
His lords and counsellors were dissatisfied at his
compliance.
If you are determined, said they, to grant an
interview
to these believers in strange gods, let it not be
in the royal city, or within your palace walls. Meet
them on the extremity of your shores, where they now
are, and listen to their words only under yon vast vaulted
canopy. For they are dealers in spells and incantations,
whose force the free, open air, somewhat dispels. Our
advice is, therefore, that you encounter their magic under
this protection.
The king, with his retinue, accompanied to the isle of
Thanet, the deputation that had been sent to implore an
audience. When he came in sight of the tents of the
strangers, sprinkled like snow upon the rich
summer-turf
,
he paused, and a seat was erected for him beneath
the spreading branches of lofty trees. Around him
ranged the nobles and pagan priests, darkly frowning,
while beyond, a vast concourse of people, filled with
intense
curiosity, covered dale and hillock in breathless
silence.
Ere long, a solemn procession was seen slowly to
advance
.
At its head came Augustine, afterwards honored
with the title of the Apostle of England. A massy cross
of silver was borne before him. A long train of
ecclesiastics
followed, walking two and two, displaying on a
painted banner the effigy of the Saviour of man, and
chanting hymns antiphonally, in deep, melodious tones.
Ethelbert, rising from his seat, came forward to meet
this singular embassy. On his mind was a soothing
consciousness
that the prayers of his angel wife were
ascending
for him. The consultation that ensued was earnest
and momentous. It was observed that the monarch
listened
with more and more absorbed attention; and that
gradually the lofty forehead of the missionary cleared
itself from traces of anxious thought, and that his
piercing
eye gathered brightness.
We offer you, said he, oh king! everlasting joys,
a throne that hath no end. Our religion cometh not to
you with the sword, or garments rolled in blood. It
boweth its knee to teach the humblest among your
people
.
It bringeth gifts of peace and love to all, from His
blessed hand who died for man's salvation.
Ethelbert answered, with a calm tone and steadfast
countenance,
Your words and promises are fair. But they are
new to our ears, and uncertain. We are not prepared to
change the gods of our nation, or to abandon the rites
which have been common to all our tribes from the
beginning. Yet you have come from afar, and borne
hardships, to bring us what you believe to be good and
true. We will, therefore, hospitably receive you, and
supply your wants while you remain among us. We
will forbid none of our subjects to listen to your words,
nor permit any to be molested who may decide to
become
your disciples.
Delighted with the frankness and liberality of the
monarch, and overjoyed at a reception so much more
favorable than they had anticipated; they departed,
singing anthems of praise, whose sweetly solemn echoes,
softened in the hush of twilight, thrilled the hearts of
the unaccustomed hearers, like mysterious melodies from
the skies.
Lodging and entertainment for the strangers were
provided within the precincts of Canterbury, by order
of the queen, to whom Ethelbert had intrusted the
arrangements connected with their fitting
accommodation
.
She zealously executed her commission, with
heightened love to him, and fervent gratitude to God,
who had thus opened a door for the entrance of the
life-giving
Gospel.
The shades of a night, dark with storms, were
gathering
over the palace. One by one the courtiers withdrew,
when, with little semblance of respect, Prince Sobert
burst into the royal presence. In a tone unbefitting his
youth, and with evident marks of high exasperation, he
began to upbraid the king for what he called abandoning
the gods of his fathers. His language became
intemperate
in the extreme, and his gestures those of an
infuriated
inebriate. Ethelbert was at first disposed to pay
slight heed to the madman, but then fixing on him a
stern eye, exclaimed in a voice of thunder,
Rash young man, will there never be an end of
these follies? Slave to your ungoverned passions, and
to this beastly intemperance, hence! Leave the society
of men, for which you are unfit.
Motioning to his guards he bade them remove him,
and keep him under arrest, until he should regain a
better mind. Agitated and harassed with the cares of
royalty, Ethelbert retired to the apartment of the queen.
He imparted to her his recent cause of perplexity, and
the anxiety he had long felt for the courses pursued
by the young prince, his nephew. He represented him
11
as full of generous and noble impulses, but all obscured
by the growing habit of intemperance, against which
every admonition was in vain. He besought her aid
to extirpate this vice, to soften his waywardness, and
render the son of his favorite sister, and the heir of a
powerful realm, more worthy of his high destination.
The perfect sympathy with which Bertha entered into
his trouble, the fervent promise of whatever assistance
it might be in her power to bestow, and the cheerful
hope with which she spoke of His sustaining strength,
who loved to seek and to save the lost, calmed his
perturbed
spirit, and lightened the load that had long lain
heavy there. Afterwards, he often beheld, with
ineffable
gratitude, the wayward young prince seeking the
society of the queen, half-reclining at her feet as a
childlike
listener, or fondling her little ones fondly in his
arms. He felt how imperative was the influence of female
loveliness and piety, that could thus soothe the savage
and tame the lion,
For passions in the human frame,
Oft put the lion's rage to shame.
Multitudes of the Kentish Saxons were induced by
curiosity to visit the stranger-teachers at Canterbury,
who now assumed, in some measure, the importance of
royal guests. Many were moved by the warmth of their
appeals, and the sanctity of their example. Animated
by an attention and success that surpassed their
expectations
,
the missionaries extended their benevolence to the
despised and humbled remnant of the Britons, who soon
after their subjugation to the Roman yoke, had nominally
embraced Christianity. But the lapse of nearly six
centuries
,
with the agony of an almost exterminating struggle
against their present idolatrous lords, had quenched both
the hope of earth, and the light from heaven. The lives
of even their clergy were so debased by ignorance and
vice, that there remained scarcely a fragment of right
example, or correct discipline, among the people.
At length, Augustine obtained from their principal
priests, a promise to meet him in Worcestershire, and
confer on the subject which he proposed for their
investigation
.
Thither they came, few in number, men of sad
countenances, and a bitter spirit. He earnestly strove to
convince them of error, both in doctrine and observance,
and to lead them to reformation. But, suspicious and
vacillating, they neither yielded to his arguments, nor
were able to establish their own. A second consultation
was appointed, and ere its arrival they had decided to
seek the advice of an aged hermit, long renowned in
that region for austere wisdom.
The shades of night had gathered, and a chill rain fell
like hail-drops upon the leafless trees, as, through tangled
and precipitous paths, they wound their way to the cave
of the recluse. With difficulty they obtained admittance.
It was not until after prolonged parley, that the stone
which secured the entrance, was rolled away. The glare
of their torches revealed a subterranean cell, of unequal
height, and a man with a forbidding aspect, apparently of
great strength, but wasted by abstinence and seclusion.
His long, lean limbs, protruded from a mantle of skins,
in which he was scantily wrapped. Through the thick,
grizzled hair and beard, that formed an almost
continuous
mesh, only the prominent points of his features
were visible, and his cold gray eyes looked luridly forth,
as if to petrify the beholder.
Wherefore come ye hither? he cried, in a startling
discordant tone.
His visitants recounted their troubles, their doubts,
their need of counsel, and their reverence for his reputed
wisdom. Without movement of muscle, or eyelid, like
one fashioned from the rock that surrounded him, he
regarded their words.
More strangers, say ye? Has not the coming of
strangers, and their laws, already been our destruction?
Brought not Csar, and his legions, a new faith, upon
their swords' points? Did not your Saxon lords, with
the battle-axe, hew it away? And now, there come
other strange men, to talk about the soul. Are there no
souls in their own country, that they thus traverse sea
and land to find them?
Moving his lips for a while, inarticulately, as if
marshalling
bitter thoughts, he exclaimed with added
violence
,
The soul! what know they, or what know ye, of that
mysterious thing? And ye would fain make laws for it,
blind and foolish as ye are. The soul! whence cometh
it? And when with the death-cry, it teareth a passage
through the clay, whither goeth it? Ha! answer me!
Whither?
Alarmed at his excitement of feeling, they hasted to
lay before him the gifts they had brought. Without
deigning a glance at them, he raised his harsh voice to a
shout,
New religions! Another god! Our fathers
worshipped
the blue Woden, and the Druids cut the sacred
misletoe, with a knife of gold, and the bards sang to the
harp the praise of heroes; and from the stateliest oak, to
the smallest moss-blade,from every grove and fountain,
came the whisper of in-dwelling, and friendly spirits.
Hath it ever been better with us, than with themfreely
launching their wattled boats upon their own peaceful
waters?
Better!
with British blood in your veins,
clinging to some shadow of deity, to some vile flapping
bat, that nestles in the mind of your tyrannous lords?
Better!
rooted out, and trampled down, and finding
beasts of prey more merciful than men?
And he laughed, a bitter and scornful laugh. Then,
drawing himself up to his full gigantic height, till his head
touched the roof of the cavern,his eyes reddening in
the torch-light with a baleful glare,he continued to
murmur in hollow whispers, and hoarse recitative, as if
holding converse with demons. The Britons, inly
shuddering
,
fancied that they heard the rushing of swift and
heavy wings, mixed with unearthly shrieks. It was the
swell of the tempest. After a long interval, he added
in a more subdued tone,
Ye have asked me for a sign.
A sign!
What is it to
me, with whom ye collude, or whom ye choose for your
masters,slaves as ye are, and hypocrites,professing to
believe in Christ, yet crouching under the mace of Thor,
the thunderer? For a sign ye ask me! Go your way
unto this stranger-priest. If he rise to receive you, listen
to his words, and obey them. If he rise not, refuse a
faith that is not able to abase his pride. This is all the
sign I give you. And now, go your ways, for the day
breaketh.
The British prelates, superstitiously yielding to the
ascetic, were content to stake on a mere accident, on the
whim of a maddening brain, a negotiation so momentous.
At the appointed time, they repaired to Worcestershire.
Augustine, sitting under the broad shadow of an oak,
chanced not to rise as they approached. Therefore, to
all his arguments, they were immovable, and met every
conciliatory proposal with a negative. The ravings of a
semi-savage in his cavern, prevailed to neutralize the
eloquence
of the missionary; even though assuming
somewhat
of prescience, it depicted the impending evils of
contumacy
.
Yet this disappointment was effaced by the success
that awaited him amid his Saxon hearers, throngs of
whom renounced the delusions of paganism. For Bertha,
the faithful wife, and lovely queen, was reserved an
exquisite
joy,her royal husband's avowal of his belief in
the Christian religion. This event, which makes
memorable
in the annals of England, the year 597, was followed
by the conversion of ten thousand of his subjects, who, in
one day, abjured idolatry, and received the rite of
baptism
.
Rapidly the knowledge of the truth overspread
the kingdoms of Kent and Essex, until gradually the whole
Saxon octarchy drank of the light that cometh down from
heaven.
The influence and earnest efforts of Bertha, were blessed
in the reformation of the young Prince Sobert.
Instilling
into his mind noble sentiments, and generous plans
of action, he was led to despise the animal appetites in
which he once gloried, and to break the chains of the
vice that had so long held him in bondage. Clothed
and in his right mind, he became assiduous to acquire
that knowledge which should enable him to advance the
welfare of his future realm. His faithful and gentle
monitor rested not until she had led him to the foot of
the cross, and seen him fortify all his good resolutions by
humbly trusting in the Friend, strong to suffer, and
mighty to save.
The reign of Ethelbert was long and prosperous. To
the other cares of royalty which accumulated with years,
and were deepened by his own sense of responsibility as
a Christian, he added the devotion of much time and
labor
to the formation of a code of laws, to regulate the
crude and discordant ideas of justice that prevailed among
the people. To the influence of the Gospel, we probably
owe this earliest specimen of Saxon jurisprudence. In
retracing its various provisions, we fancy that we perceive
in the double penalty which he inflicted on all crimes
committed in a state of inebriation, the intense anxiety
that had long preyed upon his mind for the nephew, whose
training had been committed to his care, and by whose
intemperance
he had been so often fearfully disgraced.
His gratitude for the change wrought in the young
Prince Sobert, was without bounds. Next to the
life-giving
Spirit, whose breath renovates the sinful heart, he
recognized in this blessed result, the agency of his
beloved
wife.
When the being once so reckless, strove wisely to wield
the sceptre, and to become the benefactor of his people,
Ethelbert, regarding him with paternal pride, yet
remembering
his former horrible slavery to the most debasing
of all vices, would say affectionately to Bertha, See
your own work.
But the crown of her reward, and that for which she
most fervently gave thanks to the Giver of every good
and perfect gift, was his tremulous whisper in retirement,
Thy hand, my wife, hath led me to the crossthy
pure example, the beauty of holiness.
WHAT THEN?
Light
was his step, his eye was bright,
The youth with gesture proud,
Who thus, as Fancy prompted, spake
The exulting thought aloud:
Oh! when the blessed time shall come
That studious toils are o'er,
And this stern college-durance past,
Like uncaged bird I'll soar.
What then?
a reverend sage inquired:
High honors shall be mine,
And listening crowds my wisdom seek,
As to a Delphic shrine,
For learning from my lips shall flow,
And eloquence divine.
What then?
Where'er my footsteps tend,
A tide of wealth shall roll;
And gems, and wine, and luxuries rare
Be mine, from pole to pole,
And men shall find my nod of power
Their destinies control.
11*
What then?
Around my secret bower
The wreaths of love I'll twine,
And all that youth and beauty yield
In transport, shall be mine,
Cloudless and long my life shall be
Till stars of evening shine.
What then?
When all hath been enjoyed
That charm the ear and eye,
To mortal life's extremest verge,
In sculptured tomb I'll lie,
Because the sentence hath gone forth
That all of dust must die.
What then?
A lightning flash of thought
Quelled the proud spirit's dream,
And conscience, with a lifted scourge,
Broke in on Folly's theme,
And for the mercy of his God
He learned in prayer to bow;
And seek a refuge in His Love,
When Time's illusive span should prove
One everlasting Now.
UNKNOWN HEIRS.
He heapeth up riches, and knoweth not who shall gather them.
David
.
They toil for heirs, they know not who,
And straight are seen no more.
Watts
.
His
brow was worn with care. Too deep a thought
Had settled there, for lingering sleep to shed
Its poppy dew unblamed. He said of mirth,
And every social joy,They profit not,
For he had sold his life to gather gain,
And rear a palace for his only son,
That crowds might envy. To his wearied heart
Amid its slavery, still he said, Plod on!
'Tis for my son.But lo!an icy grasp
O'ermastered him at once, and down he lay
Reluctant and unmourned.
The heir roamed wide
In distant lands, with light and lavish haste
Scattering his spoils.
In the ancestral halls,
Are guests, and banquet-board, and music-strain,
But not for him.They bear his name no more;
And on his bloated features are the stamp,
Of libertine and exile. In the wards
Of foreign hospitals, with parching lip,
He feels the fever-thirst, and none are near
Of all the many servants of his sire,
To give him water. On his tongue there lurks
The drunkard's mutter'd curse, mixed with no word
Of grateful memory for that father's care,
Who toiled so late and rose ere dawn of day
To toil for him the waster, and enrich
Heirs, all unknown.
A mother, strange to say,
Repressed the claims of pity, and withheld
The surplus of her stewardship from God.
The poor, pale sempstress, with her trembling nerves,
And timid voice, perceived the scanty dole
Narrowed and grudged and tardily bestowed,
And wept, despairing, o'er her lonely crust.
The beggar came not twice to that proud door,
Remembering the refusal, couch'd in words
Scornful and sharp. The mission-vessel spread
Its snowy wings, and sought a heathen clime
Without her aid.
And so the yearly gold
Swell'd in its hoard; and to herself she said,
'
Tis for my daughter's use, when I am gone:
Cheating her vexed soul with empty names
Of fond maternal duty,veil too thin
To hide her nature from the eye of Heaven.
Oh lady! in the damp and mouldering tomb,
Is there no loop-hole, whence a restless ghost
Might scan thy lofty mansion?
See! behold!
Who sitteth on thy daughter's rich divan,
And in her costly mirrors idly looks?
Who strews the flowers that deck'd her gay parterre,
And revels in her fruits?
A stranger bride
Calls it her home.Thy daughter is not there.
Her bed is in the clayand by her side
The babe, whose fleeting life with hers was bought:
While he, who briefly on his finger wore
The circlet of her love, forgetteth her.
Yet for that daughter didst thou grind the poor,
And seal thine ear against the Pagan's moan;
Calling it prudence, and a just regard
To thine own offspring.
'Twas a specious lure!
Oh, mother, did it shut thy soul from Heaven?
THE
CENTENNIAL ANNIVERSARY OF PRINCETON COLLEGE,
NEW JERSEY; JUNE 29th, 1847
A distinguished guest, on this occasion, remarks:The dinner,
of which more than 800, principally Alumni, partook, was under a
spacious and beautiful tent, on a verdant lawn, behind the old
College
edifice, once alternately occupied by the British and American
armies. This festival was conducted entirely without spirituous or
fermented beverage. Toasts drank in pure water, or lemonade, and
a series of enlivening addresses, gave exhilaration and enthusiasm
to the memorable scene.
An
hundred years have sown
The rose-cup, and the thorn,
And more than thirty thousand days
Diffused the light of morn,
And in their mighty cradle slept,
Since Old Nassau was born.
Look to yon tented lawn,
Enrobed in glorious green,
Where winds the long procession on
Amid the classic scene,
And birthday melodies arise
As to a crowned queen.
She hath no hoary hair,
No dimness marks her eye,
Her children cluster round her side
As when her youth was high,
And at the festal board she pours
The nectar of the sky.
Such nectar as the Sun
Exhales in crystal tears,
And filters through the silvery cloud,
The fruitful earth that cheers,
So, here's a health to Old Nassau
For another hundred years.
LETTER TO FEMALES.
Sisters, and friends,come, let us talk awhile,
'Twill do no harm.
Heaven grant it be for good.
Gordon
.
We
, my dear friends, to whom are intrusted the
structure
of domestic life, and the framework of families, are the
natural and interested guardians of temperance and purity.
Without these, there can be for us neither happiness nor
safety. Presiding not only over the rites of hospitality,
but over those seasons of refreshment around the
household
board, which return as duly as morn, noontide, and
evening vary the sky and landscape, are we fully aware
of the responsibilities of our office?
Home, that green, sheltered islet, amid the great waves
of an unquiet world, is our blessed province. Have we
considered the dignity of the sphere in which we are thus
placed?a realm, whose antiquity is coeval with the
creation
;
whose foundation and laws are the work of almighty
wisdom; whose constitution consults both the necessity
and the highest good of its subjects; whose chief
ministers
are of kindred interests and kindred blood; whose
reverence is drawn from the deepest, least fluctuating
resources
of humanity, and the results of whose policy are
as sublime and boundless as eternity?
Is it not important that we should correctly estimate
our position, and its influences? The keen eye of
philosophy
long since discerned, that to have power over
the senses, was to hold the key of the mind. Let me
make the songs of a nation, said a wise man, I care
not who makes the laws.
Has the
ear
then such authority? and has not power
over it been delegated to those who rule a household?
Is not
his
ear ours, who has installed us as the presiding
spirit over his hearth and home? Is it not ours for the
melody of hallowed sentiment?for the eloquent
interchange
of knowledge?for the charms of music?for
that highest of all harmonies to man's heart,the voice
of love?
Are not all in the domestic department, thus modified?
The infant, who, being a part of the mother, draws in
her tones with the food that sustains, and the smile that
cheers it; the child, who perchance will take onward to
gray hairs, or to the grave, her voice, as the only
unforgotten
lesson; the daughter, whose dawn of womanly
beauty is heightened by the docility with which she
listens
to her beloved guide; the son, who, going forth to
the trials of the world, lingers for one more accent of her
perfect affection;even the servant, watchful of words,
as well as of example,the guest,the stranger within
the gates,each and all are thus influenced:how
much, another world will more clearly unfold.
Can we, then, be too careful of tones?of things
uttered
?of
the spirit-harp, on which we are permitted to
play? Lest, peradventure, our careless touch might
untune
it for the brief concert of earth,the purer melody
of heaven!
If, by the respect due to our station, the ear is
subjected
to us, is not the
eye
ours also?ours, for the
charm of a cheerful countenance,for the fascinations of
grace and kindness,for the beauties of a well-ordered
home,for that symmetrical adjustment of economy with
comfort, which those who fill the throne of a household
should be able to exhibit?
There are some apartments, which, from the carpet to
the pictures on the wall, are a lesson of refined taste and
harmony of color. There are others, unadorned by aught
save neatness, which, in the absence of all ornament, are
still more admirable to an accurate observer, from their
fitness, and the balance of circumstance with duty. The
arrangements, and costume of the mistress of the family,
may display elegance, but if they go beyond the finances
of her husband, they lose that beauty of adaptation which
is necessary to please a clear-judging mind. Indeed,
where ornament may be allowed without improper
expenditure
,
simplicity, rather than gorgeousness, has more
complete power over a true taste, and longer retains it.
The attraction of flowers, within and around a
habitation
,
is in accordance with His plan, whose touch
perfumes
them, and whose pencil paints. This makes the
cottage-homes of England sweet to their inmates, and a
pleasant memory to the passing traveller. The simple
plants require little labor of culture, and a good spirit
seems to prevail where they are reared. It is beautifully
designated by the Germans, as the angel of the
flowers
.
Its ministry is to charm the senses, and teach the
heart a lesson of His love, who thus deigns to make even
the field and the wayside beautiful.
If it has been felt, that the eye and ear are such
powerful
ambassadors to the soul, that Devotion has appealed
to them in the Gothic arch, the storied window, and the
solemn organ, and War labored to enlist them by pomp
and circumstance; and if these two direct avenues are
open to woman, will she not enter them, bearing the
symbols
of temperance and of virtue? When such power
was delegated by civilized society to the weaker hand,
was there not an expectation that it would be made an
ally of those principles that give to that civilized society
permanence and peace?
The eye and the ear, then, it would seem, are among
the legitimate subjects of those who rule home wisely.
Are not the appetites, also, a part of their legislation?
The way to a man's heart is through his stomach, said
a caustic writer. Without fully indorsing the sentiment
of the satirist, it is evident, that by supervision of the
table, the elements that refresh weariness, cheer
depression
,
sustain physical vigor, and minister to social delight,
are among the perquisites of our sex. Mighty
instruments
,
in this our combination of matter with mind. Let
us see how they are applied.
Thou, who spreadest the household board, say, why is
this or that alluring condiment and perilous beverage
added? To show how cunningly agents unfriendly to
health, may be disguised by culinary chemistry?how far
indulgence may go, yet stop short of actual inebriation?
Or to test and trouble the feeble virtue of children, by
bidding them abstain from what they see others partake?
and disturb their trust in your own Christian sincerity,
by setting an example which they are forbidden to
follow
?
Yet even where there is no allurement to
absolute
intemperance, the effect of habitual absorption in the
pleasures of the table, and their preference to intellectual
enjoyments, are so pernicious to the young, that the
ultimate
ruin of families may be frequently traced to that
source.
But, if any strangely fancy that they possess the power,
ad libitum
, to weaken the body, or darken the minds of
those, who, by the structure of the family state, are
committed
to their care and love; by what right or edict do
they exercise this Circan policy over strangers and
guests?
Thou, who makest a feast, whence this increased
activity
in the mixture of dangerous elements?this array
of excitement and the means of intoxication? What evil
hath the stranger done, that thou shouldst send the
physician
to his lodgings?or perhaps deepen in him that
plague-spot which no physician can heal?
The invited guest came trustingly under thy roof,
beguiled
by words of courtesy. Send him not away
sickened
or sorrowing, but cheered by that simple, safe
entertainment
,
which has left your own thoughts unwearied
and fresh for the social intercourse, appropriate to
beings
who have a mind as well as a body. Surely, no
housekeeper, or mother, would deliberately make the
sacred rites of hospitality, or the table where her
olive-plants
daily gather, in their blossoming hope,
subservient
to gluttony and intemperance, or to the education
of habits that might lead to vices so degrading.
It is happily now, less the custom than formerly, to
press as a mark of welcome or pledge of hospitality, the
draught that may inebriate. Still, it is not extinct. And
though, in the majority of cases, it may be harmless, can
we be sure that it is so in all?that it might never serve
as fuel to some latent taste, subdued with difficulty, and
which, but for our temptation, might possibly have been
overcome?
If it is asked, why the Christian inhabitants of a most
Christian land should choose, as the herald of their
hospitality
,
the pledge of their friendship, an usage as
dangerous
as the sword of Damocles, we hear only the
answer
,
It is the fashion
. To the inquiry, how woman,
whose safety is so deeply involved in the moral purity
of the land, should venture to tamper with the
foundations
of temperance,still the same answer,
It is the
fashion
. It has been seriously demanded by the
guardians
of virtue and religion, why she should ever be
faithless
to her sacred trust, and she hath herself answered,
It is the fashion
.
When, to efface a stigma from national character, the
philanthropist and statesman are combining their energies,
it becomes not those of humble name or obscure station,
to remain inactive. Our sex, depending by physical
weakness as well as the structure of refined society, on
the protection of others, has immense interests at stake
in the prevalence or suppression of that lunacy, which
may transform protectors into murderers. The plea of
want of influence is not available, since far-sighted
politicians
admit that no vice can obtain great
preponderance
in a civilized community, without the permission of
females.
If the cause of temperance, which has made such
advances, has still a giant's labor to perform, let us
not withhold the aid that, in our province of home, it is
our part to render. Can we, whose duties and felicities
are interwoven with the conjugal and maternal relations,
be too vigilant against whatever threatens to desecrate
our sanctuary?
Sisters and friends! who in your own regulated tastes,
have no temptation to excess of animal indulgence, who
without effort abstain from all that could cloud the mind,
or inflame the passions, are you thus absolved from
further
responsibility? Is not the prevention of evil in
others, according to the measure of your ability, a duty?
To the teaching of example, are we not bound to add the
weight of that influence which the courtesy of an
enlightened
age, and the condescending spirit of the religion
of Jesus, has in these latter days accorded to us? Secure
in our own unfallen estate, is it not possible that regret or
remorse may in future years extort the confession,We
are verily guilty concerning our brother?
If the spoiler may yet effect an entrance at the fireside,
the household board,the nursery,have we nothing
to do? We, whose fondest affections take root at that
fireside,who, at that household board have precedence
and power,to whom that nursery is the garner of
the dearest hopes, for time and eternity, can we trace
amid those hallowed retreats the footsteps of a foe, and
not tremble?
Wife!who by solemn vows, before men and angels,
hast entered into an union that death alone can dissolve,
has it been your fate to see the vice of intemperance
casting deadly shadow over the heart, where your
highest
earthly confidence reposed? And day by day, and
hour after hour, as you watched its fearful ravages, were
you careful not to upbraid, not to provoke, not to argue
reproachfully; but to repress your own sense of
suffering
,to
make home desirable,to revivify those
affections
,
which are the fountains of purity and joy? Above
all, were your supplications unceasing to Him, who alone
can turn the heart, as the rivers of waters are turned?
Then, though the harvest of your toils may have
perished
,though
the desolation of your peace nothing
earthly can solace,still, you will have escaped the
rankling torture of the reflection, that you are verily
guilty concerning him who was your more than brother,
and your next to God.
Mother!whose duties are laid deeper than any vow
of the lips, even in the immutable strength of a love
that cannot swerve,did you counsel your children in
this matter, rising early, and late taking rest? With
the developments of character, did you strive to impress
the control of the appetites,the excellence of
pleasures
derived from intellect and benevolence,the true
heroism of subjugating the flesh to the spirit? Did
you oppose with your authority every infraction of these
principles? Did you warn them of the infirmity of their
nature,of the trials, the tempters that await them,
of their need to seek help from above? At dawn, and
at the hush of midnight, was there a fervent lifting up
of your soul, that they might be temperate in all
things?
Still, should it be your lot to behold one whom you
had nurtured, stain the heritage of his athers, and go
down to a drunkard's grave, may it never be your fearful
doom to stand at the bar of the High Judge, and say,
I am verily guilty concerning
whom?
Not the
brother, whose course you might have been unable to
influence,not the husband, whom it was never your
prerogative to control,but the child, whom you brought
into life, and loved more than life;the
child
, for the
first pencillings on whose soul you were accountable,
intrusted to you as it was, like unsullied wax, to be
stamped with the signet of Heaven.
Yet there are other evils than those that flow from
excess in drinking, which they who would be
temperate
in all things, must avoid. There are other
excitements
than those of the table, which it is our duty, both
by example and precept, to discourage.
One is the stimulus of light conversation, vernacularly
called gossip, in which the integrity of facts is too often
sacrificed to their embellishment. Our position as a sex
supplies a redundancy of such subjects, while a desire of
adding novelty, or variety to soci I intercourse, gives to
slight circumstances undue inflation and expansion.
Censoriousness
springs less frequently from unkind feeling,
than from the ambition of surpassing others in pungency
of narration. The flattering verdict of possessing wit,
must be maintained, though a fair reputation suffer, or
a weak one fall. Even kindly disposed natures may be
led to this intemperate mode of serving up character, by
the tastes and habits of those around. But on the hard
heart, the tongue may sharpen itself, till one becomes a
spear, and the other a millstone.
If thou art bidden to a feast of mangled reputations,
12
sit not unduly long, nor lift with complacence the cup in
which thy neighbor's faults are infused. Through the
same process of fermentation thine own good name may
also pass, for at the wine-press of slander, there is no
respect of persons. The sour grape that setteth the
teeth on edge, and the rich cluster from the valley of
Eshcol, which the Lord commended,go in alike,and
the mingled wine is pleasant to the perverted palate.
Doth it not behoove us rather to uplift the banner of a
charity that thinketh no evil? For, in the words of a
fine writer, if we are capable of showing what is good
in another, and neglect to do it, we omit a duty,we
omit to give rational pleasure, and to conciliate right
good-will. Nay more, are we not abettors, if not aiders
in the vilest fraud,the fraud of purloining from respect?
Being intrusted with letters of great interest, what a
baseness not to deliver them!
The influence of words and sympathies, is seldom
fully estimated. Like the falling pebble in the stream,
they are surrounded by circles far beyond their own
circumference
,
which continue to widen, after the parent
cause is buried and forgotten. The words and
sympathies
of woman, though moving in a narrow and secluded
sphere, have peculiar force of propagation. They are not
impeded in their action, by those pre-occupations of
prejudice
,
rancors of political strife, or intrigues of state, with
which the eloquence of man contends. They often fall
on soil, prepared for their reception, by the dews of
infancy
,the
sunny skies of childhood,or the tranquil
culture of friendship and affection. Can our
responsibility
on their account be too strongly impressed?
In the fumes of vanity there is also a species of
intoxication
,
to which our sex, from their position, are exposed.
A young female,especially if possessing beauty or
accomplishments
,is
often nurtured with the food of
adulation
.
But, in her ultimate sphere of action, she finds a
different aliment, to which it would have been well, if
the mental appetite had been early trained. The essence
of conjugal and maternal duty, is disinterestedness. The
undue study of dress, the extravagant expenditure of time
and money, for luxuriant display, the predominance of
self as a ruling motive, should pass away, as the dawn
when the sun ariseth. The true happiness of our
nature
is in doing good,in conferring, rather than in
receiving
benefits. The holy estate of matrimony is made
more holy, by its facilities for these ends. A
well-ordered
,
agreeable home, is both a preventive to vice and
a refuge for those who have been hurt by the archers.
Strength is given us here, that we may do an angel's
work.
The preponderance of pursuits comparatively trifling,
is hazardous. For though none of the employments that
minister to the comfort of domestic life, however minute
in detail, or lowly in character, should be overlooked or
despised, yet time must be reserved for the culture of
intellect, for retaining knowledge once acquired, and
increasing
its store by those who would desire to maintain
durable empire over the heart. The first enthusiasm of
youthful love must suffer abatement. It has been aptly
compared to the shadow of early morning, decreasing
as the day advances. That in its transition it may take
the form of that more sober and sublimated affection,
which deepens till the sunset of life, and blends with the
parting smile a pledge of deathless reunion, it must be
fortified by a steadfast mental, moral, and religious
progress
,an
elevation in the scale of being, which labors
to bear upward those whom best it loves.
A too excitable temperament is to be guarded against.
Its tendency is to cloud the judgment, and impair those
defences which our weakness needs. The domination of
passion, partakes of the frenzy of intemperance in
drinking
.
It destroys the balance of thought, and the sway
of reason. It taketh away the armor in which we
trusted, and divideth the spoils. The loss of clear
intellectual
guidance, even for brief and long separated
intervals
,
is not safe for those who often find their best
wisdom inadequate to the trials and emergencies of life.
Would the helmsman, amid shoals and quicksands,
occasionally
lay aside his vigilance, trusting that any error,
thus committed, might be rectified in his future course?
Should the bird of passage linger, and lose sight of its
leader, might it be sure to join the flock unscathed, when
its reverie was over? And must not she, who holds the
helm of a household, and would so pass this troubled
pilgrimage
,
as not to miss with them the Better Land,
spread the safe sail of a meek and quiet spirit, and labor
to preserve, amid blast and billow, the serenity of a
self-possessed
mind?
Wealth is also said to have an inebriating tendency,
which its possessors are not always able to withstand.
Through its excitements, pride mounteth to the brain, and
the mind dwelleth only upon its own greatness, and the
heart, having no unsatisfied want, forgetteth how to
sympathize
,
and its alms become ostentation, and the charity, that
might have made them acceptable to God, hath no part
in the matter. Even the fine eyes of youth become so
sprinkled with the sleep of self-indulgence, as to see
dreamily, both this life and the next. Gold and silver,
like the poppy-poison, lay the heart in the grave, while
the body lives. Let those who are in danger of such
inebriations, temper the exultation of riches, by a sense
of the stewardship they involve,the reflection how soon
they must resign them for the poverty of the grave, and
learn the philosophy that pronounced at the close of
life, nothing its own, save that which it had given away.
And now, dear friends, I take my leave, having had
pleasure in this interview. As it regards the sight of the
countenance, or sound of the voice, we may be strangers;
yet has this intercourse made you to me, as friends.
Perchance
,
oceans separate us; still it seemeth as if we sate
side by side. We have seen that ability is committed to us,
to make home the nursery of virtue;and that to be
temperate in all things, it is not sufficient simply to
shun the wine-cup, and the glutton's feast. We have
together
contemplated some of the dangers that surround
us,some of the temptations which we must repel, for the
sake of those whom we love. Other dangers and
temptations
might also have been pointed out.
But the field is broad, and time, with me is short. I
have scattered a few seeds, whose fruits may be
gathered
,
when I am gone;a few hints, which you will
expand
and illustrate in the beauty of your example.
There is no service, said Lord Bacon, comparable to
good counsel,since no man can do so much for us, as
we may do for ourselves: and good counsel helpeth us
to help ourselves. A still greater teacher, incites us to
add to knowledge, temperance; and to temperance,
patience; and to patience, godliness; and to godliness,
brotherly-kindness; and to brotherly-kindness, charity.
May the spirit of this glorious climax animate and
uphold
us, while we labor to grave on the signet-ring of
this fleeting life, the motto,
temperate in all things
.
WOMAN'S PATRIOTISM.
How shall we aid the land we love?
O'er dusty tomes to pore,
And catch the warrior's wrathful mood
From Amazonian lore?
To turbulence, or pride incite,
And quench of peace the angel light?
Relinquish for a meteor's glare
The boon of Love's protecting care?
Ambition's wind-swept heights assail,
And shun the sweet, secluded vale?
No, sister, no.
How aid our land?The boastful voice
In public haunts to raise?
Or barter for a fickle fame
Affection's priceless praise?
For
Woman's Rights
to clamor loud,
And dare the throng, and face the crowd?
Or wrapped in wild desire to roam
Forfeit those charities of home,
That pain can soothe, and grief control,
And lull to harmony the soul?
No, sister, no.
In her own place, the hearth beside,
The patriot's heart to cheer,
The young, unfolding mind to guide,
The future sage to rear,
Where sleeps the cradled infant fair,
To watch with love and kneel in prayer,
Cheer each sad soul with pity's smile,
And frown on every latent wile
That threats the pure, domestic shade,
Sister,so best our life shall aid
The land we love.
THE PRECIOUS GIFT.
ON SEEING A GOLD CHAIN, AMONG THE CONTRIBUTIONS,
AT A MEETING FOR TEMPERANCE.
Would
that ye had a voice, ye links of gold,
To tell me of your giver.
Fancy paints
A young, expressive brow, and a clear eye,
Beaming with purer light, as from the neck
Your clasp was loosened.
Whisper, tissued chain!
Wert thou the favored talisman of love?
Or friendship's bright memento?
Still, 'tis well
That thou art here.For now, that love may be
Remembered by the deeds that bless mankind;
And holiest friendship, might be well content
With such a token.
Stranger! who perchance
Didst find this graceful ornament awake
The throb of vanity,we give thee praise
For this, thy wise exchange. The pleasant thoughts
Of pure benevolence, which they who live
12*
Only for self, know not,be thy reward,
And crown thy life with joy.
Still be thou true
To Pity's angel-prompting. What thine hand
Findeth in duty's sphere, do with the might
Of woman's tenderness. By flowery bands
Of soft persuasion, draw the wanderer back,
From ruin's slippery verge. Toil to uproot
Those weeds of vice, that by the wayside spring,
And e'en amid our garden's choicest flowers
Unblushingly intrude. Show gently forth
In thine own hallowed life, the blessedness
Of that meek mind, which Temperance and Peace,
Fair-handed sisters, lead in duty's path,
And crown with beauty that surmounts the tomb.
THE SPOILER.
Parent
,who with speechless feeling
O'er thy cradled treasure bent,
Every year new charms revealing,
Yet thy wealth of love unspent:
Hast thou seen that blossom blighted
By a drear, untimely frost?
All thy labor unrequited,
Every glorious promise lost?
Wife,with agony unspoken,
Bending 'neath affliction's rod,
Is thy prop,thine idol broken,
Fondly trusted, next to God?
Husband,o'er thy hope a mourner,
Of thy chosen friend ashamed,
Hast thou to her burial borne her,
Unrepentant, unreclaimed?
Child,in tender weakness turning
To thy heaven-appointed guide,
Doth a lava-poison burning
Change to gall affection's tide?
Still that orphan burden bearing,
Darker than the grave can show,
Dost thou bow thee down despairing
To thine heritage of woe?
Country,on thy sons depending,
Strong in manhood, bright in bloom,
Hast thou seen thy pride descending
Shrouded, to the unhonor'd tomb?
Rise! on eagle-pinion soaring,
Rise! in all thy godlike birth,
And Jehovah's aid imploring,
Sweep the Spoiler from the earth.
THE END.Dear Frederick,
Louisa is worthy of you.Return.
E.
Carlton
.